Vol. II.2
CHAPTER I.
A conversation between Robin Day and his friend Captain Brown,
in which the latter throws some light upon the adventure of the
highwayman.
Much
as I had reason to fear and detest this
remarkable personage, Captain Brown, by whom I
had been so basely defrauded and cheated into a
participation
in knavery, and who, I had cause from
his own confessions, to believe was, or had once
been, a noted pirate; yet my feelings at sight of
him mingled something like satisfaction with my
fear and resentment. I was so forlorn and helpless
in the midst of embarrassment and danger, so much
in want of a friend to counsel and assist me, that
even Captain Hellcat's countenance appeared to me
desirable: at such a moment, I could have accepted
the friendship almost of Old Nick himself. He had
done me a great deal of mischief, to be sure; but, in
my present situation, it was scarce possible he could
do me any more. From his courage and worldly
experience, nay even from his good willfor I
almost looked upon him as a friend, though a
mischievous
and dangerous onemuch was to be
expected
:
and, besides, our adventures together had
established a kind of community of interests between
us, at least to a certain extent, (were we not
house-robbers
and runaways together?) which, I thought,
must ensure me his good offices, at this moment of
difficulty and distress. I resolved, in a word,
having
no other way to help myself, to throw myself
upon his friendship, and trust to him for rescue from
the dangers that beset me.
Yet I could not avoid opening upon him in terms
of reproach; the more particularly as he followed
up his first questions by demanding, with another
laugh as obstreperous as the first, what curse of a
scrape I had got myself into now? and why I sat
there gasping on the river-bank, like a stranded
catfish?
Sir, said I, whatever scrape I have got into,
is all owing to you, who imposed upon my
ignorance
so grossly, and so brought me to ruin. And
I could scarce avoid again bursting into tears, at the
thought of it.
I
bring you to ruin? quoth Captain Brown;
why, hang me, you look very comfortable,
considering
all things; and I don't think the first
lieutenant
of the Lovely Nancy, d'ye see, intends to
break his heart for a small matter.
You may call it a small matter, Mr. Hellcat,
or whatever you entitle yourself, said I, nettled
into courage by the grin of derision, with which he
emphasized the title of first lieutenantto pass
yourself off for another man, (Captain Hellcat
grinned harder than ever,) to open letters not
addressed
to you, to pocket money that did not belong
to you
Only a hundred dollars, shiver my timbers!
quoth he, the grin becoming still broader .
And, after cheating me so unhandsomely, to
make me an accomplice in a house-robbery, to the
ruin of my character, and almost the loss of my life;
for, I assure you, I escaped from Mr. Bloodmoney's
house almost by a miracle.
Did you? by but the oath may be omitted:
did you, indeed? cried Captain Brown, with
another explosion of merrimentand so did
I;
it
was only by knocking out the watchman's brains
with a poker, and
Good Heavens! said I, starting with horror,
you did not commit a murder?
No, said Captain Brown, innocentlyonly
knocked out the brains of a watchman, and stabbed
one of the niggers.
And if these are not murders, said I, petrified,
what is?
What
is?
quoth Captain Hellcat, giving me a
ferocious starewhy, dn my blood, stopping
the weasand of a crying babydrowning a woman
at seatwisting the neck of your own brother
there's
a kind of murder for you, split me; but
there's plenty more, when you come to think of it;
such as defrauding widows, robbing orphans, belying
honest men, grinding the face of the poor, and
stabbing
men in the darkall murder,
that
, dn my
blood, and bloody murder too! But as for breaking
a head, or sticking a gizzard, in open fight, why that's
all fair and square, and above board, split my
timbers
.
But you don't mean to say, quoth I almost
ready to take to my heels, and fly from the
desperado
,
that you killed the watchman and the negro?
I'll be hang'd, said captain Brown, if I know
what was the end of it; for d'ye see, I left them in
a sort of tornado, having neither time nor weather
for observations. But, I say, my hearty, how did
you
slip your moorings? and what brings you into
these sand-fly latitudes?
You
brought me here, said I, with a sigh: I
fled here to escape the consequences of your
imposition
to
avoid arrest, imprisonment, shame and
ruin. You see me now what you have made me, a
fugitive from the laws.
Shiver my topsails, said Captain Hellcat, but
you speak as if that was a great matter! Where's
the difference. You don't think Bloodmoney and
the constables are still after you?
I don't know but they are, I replied; adding
But that is not the worst of my misfortunes.
And here I hastened to explain the later evils into
which I had fallen, and all which I properly laid to
his doormy unlucky treason, the narrow escape I
had just had from the court-martial, and the danger
I was still in, a story, which, told in few words and
with all the energy of distress, only renewed the
mirth of Mr. Jack Brown,
alias
Captain Hellcat,
who swore I was a rum one, born to die on salt
water; or, why, I must have been triced up by Jack
Ketch long ago.
And so you think there's nobody in a pickle
but yourself? he added, with profane emphasis,
and laughing furiously; I'll be hang'd if you a'n't
mistaken though. Here am I, your commander,
split me, making foul weather enough to sink an
Injieman, with great-guns blowing on one quarter
and hellcats spitting on the other, a white squall
2*
astern, and ahead, a sea whereof I knows as much
as a pig does of a mizzen-top, no chart aboard,
logline
lost overboard, sextant broken all to smash, and
the compass gone to the devil. Here comes I down
hereaway, an honest man, to fight the battles of my
country; and, split me, didn't I offer the same thing
in Philadelphia? and a fine return I got for my
venture
.
There's Bloodmoney, sink him! first turned
me the cold shoulder, and then would have clapp'd
me in the bilboes, for playing him a little bit of an
innocent trick, split me: (A very innocent little
trick! thought I, amazed at the cool composure
with which he spoke of that adventure:) and so,
shiver me, I had to slip my cable, and leave their
cursed Quaker port under a press of canvass. Then
brings I up here at Norfolk, to fight the bloody
British, along with the lubberly milishy; and, hang
me, I could have shown them what fighting was,
either at long shots with the great guns, or at close
quarters with pistol, hanger, and Spanish-knife,
whereof I knows the use; when, as Davy Jones
would have it, who should come up but a dog-faced
villain named Duck
Skipper Duck? cried I, interrupting mine
honest friend, now extremely earnest and eloquent
in his relation. But earnestness and eloquence
vanished at the interruption; and he turned upon
me, with another roar of laughter, to which he
seemed ever uncommonly prone.
What! you know Skipper Duck then? he
cried; an honest dog as ever lived, may the sharks
eat him!
As big a knave as ever went unhanged! said I;
and immediately informed him how my present
dangers were all owing to the malice of Duck, who
had accused me of the treason I had so unluckily,
though with no evil intention, committed.
Exactly my own case, shiver me! cried
Captain
Brown, laughing harder than ever: Up comes
the lubber, that was one of my dirty dogs of old,
and spins his yarn to the Posse Come-atibus, or
Come-at-us, or whatever you call it; and then there
was a hellaballoo; for, sink me, says he, d'ye see,
`Here 's Hellcat the pirate'the horse-marine! So
there was no cruising longer in them latitudes,
d'ye see; and away I scuds, a ship in distress, with
a whole fleet of small-craft land-thieves peppering
after me; for, hang me, them cursed Britishers have
brought them down hereaway as thick as landcrabs
on a sea-beach. And in the midst of the row, up
comes another enemy on the weather bow, and
claims the very ship I sails onmy horse, split me
as honestly borrowed as need be; and then there
was another storm about my ears; and it was, on
one side, `stop pirate!' and, on the other, `stop
thief!' and all that. And here I am, my skillagallee,
in as dirty a kettle of fish as may be; and here are
you, in another; and here we are both of us, hard
chased, a regiment of Jack Ketches under full sail
behind, and a whole forest of gallows-trees around
us.
Here Captain Brown paused to take breath, and
to indulge another peal of laughter. His account
increased my dismay, for, it was evident, his
presence
only doubled my perils, by adding those
peculiar
to himself; and, it was equally clear, if arrested,
I should gain nothing by being caught in his
company
.
Here, then, was a man who made no attempt
to conceal that he was a rogue and reprobate of the
highestor lowestgrade, whom I had known, to
my cost, a swindler and burglar, and who was, from
his own showing, a pirate, horsethief, and, most
probably, a murderer; who was, besides, closely
pursued, and in momentary danger of arrest; and
who was of so callous and hardened a nature as to
make mirth equally of his danger and his crimes.
From association with such a wretch I should, at
another moment, have revolted with horror; as,
even now, I felt I ought to do. But, alas! my fears
conquered my scruples. The very indifference with
which he spoke of his villanies and perils, his
furious
mirth and savage gayety, proved a consciousness
of power to escape all embarrassmentsa power of
which my necessities urged me to accept the
advantage
.
It was better even to be the comrade of
Captain
Hellcat than to be hanged, or shot, by a court
martial. Besides, I felt that I was already, in a
measure, degraded: why then should I recoil, as one
with an untarnished reputation might have done,
from the profit of another step in dishonour?
It is, alas! such a consideration that confirms the
ruin of half the rogues in the universe. Reputation
is the Palladium of virtue, (where religion has not
substituted a diviner bulwark;) and it is scarce
possible
to lose it, or think we have lost it, without
slackening in the defence of integrity.
Alas, what is to be done? I cried; we shall
be caught and condemned to death.
Speak for yourself! said Captain Brown: as
for me, I've no notion of any such cursed nonsense.
And as for being outnavigated, or outwitted, by any
snubface of a landsman, why there, my skilligallee,
you're out of your reckoning.
I hope, Captain Brown, said I, you won't
desert me.
Desert you, my hearty! quoth Brown, I
never deserted a shipmate, that was willing to stand
by me; and split me, I said you should be my
lieutenant
on board the Lovely Nancy, and I mean to
stick by the articles. But, I say, you Bob Lucky
Robin Day, said I.
Well, Mr. Robin Day, I say, have you any idea
how to play nigger? Look you, my lad, he added,
seeing that I did not understand the question, I'm
for a voyage to see the world, sink methat is, the
land part of it; and I goes under false colours; and
why, d'ye see, can't
you?
Sir, said I, I'll do whatever you tell me;
provided
it is not criminal. And I give you to
understand
,
I added, boldly, that I will neither steal
horses, nor rob houses, nor knock out watchmen's
brains, nor stab negroes, nor
Hold fast there, cried Brown, laughing, I
intend to try an honest life myself, shiver my
timbers
,
for I loves variety.
And he directed me to hold his bridle, which he,
without leaving the horse, proceeded to effect some
changes in his outward appearance, for the purposes
of disguise. The first thing he did was to clap to
his face a set of false whiskers and beard, extremely
huge and ferocious looking, and yet so natural withal,
that no one would have suspected they were placed
there in any other mode than by the natural process
of growth; and it was wonderful the change they
made in his appearance.
The transformation was to me the more
astonishing
,
as I immediately recognised in the hairy visage
the grim looks of the highwaymanthat identical
villain, who, at the beginning of my misfortunes, in
the night of flight, had made the unsuccessful attack on
the purses of Dicky Dare and myself, and succeeded
in shifting the charge of his crime upon me, and
running
off with Bay Tom and my saddlebags.
CHAPTER II.
The two friends put themselves into disguise. and make preparations
for a career of philanthrophy.
My
start of fear made the honest Proteus
acquainted
with the discovery, which he distinguished with
a fresh peal of merriment, exclaiming, Aha, my
cock of the game! you've discovered another old
friend, have you? Happy dog, to be so well
provided
!
But, I say, you confounded baby, he added,
do you know, you came within a hair's breadth of
shooting my brains out.
It was not Iit was my friend Dicky Dare,
said I, sighing to think of his braver spirit and
happier
fate. But, now we talk of it, I should like
to know upon what principles you justify that
nefarious
attack?
Principles! quoth Captain Brown, it is long
since I have sailed in them latitudes, split me! But,
after all, my skilligallee, it was only a bit of a joke:
for there was I on the road, and here came two
cursed cub-headed schoolboys, just run away from
the master, bragging of their money; and so the
devil got into me for a spree, and says I, `Strike,
my hearties!'And who would have thought of an
unlicked schoolboy firing a pistol in Jack Brown's
facehalf blowing his brains out?
Perhaps, said I, that was a mere joke too,
your accussing me of being the robber?
No, hang it, said Captain Brown, laughing,
that was quite a serious piece of business; for how
else was I to get out of the jaws of them jackasses,
the wagoners?
And pray, Captain Brown, said I, allow me
to ask what you did with my horse, Bay Tom?
Sold him, hang me, quoth Captain Brown,
with the utmost coolnesssold him to a lubber of
a Jerseyman;and, shiver my timbers, he added
with energy, the money was all counterfeit, and
was nigh getting me in limbo in Philadelphia, where
not a rogue of 'em would take it. Nevertheless,
he continued, I find it very good here in Virginia
at a discount!
By this time, the worthy gentleman, who made
all these confessions with equal frankness and
composure
,
had completed his disguise, having
substituted
for the long-tailed coat he had on, a seaman's
jacket, which he took from a bundle behind him,
and which was, I believe, that identical garment he
had worn at his introduction on the highway. The
coat took the place of the jacket in his bundle; a
handsome cloth cap which he had on his head, was
turned wrong-side out, and converted into a worsted
bonnet; and he looked the sailor to perfection.
Having thus effected his own
transmogrification
,
as he called it, he proposed making some
changes also in my appearance; to which, being
convinced by my fears of their necessity, I
reluctantly
consented. They were extremely simple,
and consisted merely in gathering my hair into
sundry
tails or queues, which he knotted with
ropeyarns
,
produced from his storesin placing on my
head a kind of turban made of a bandanna
handkerchief
,
instead of my cap, which I found room for in
my pocketand, finally, in darkening my naturally
tawny complexion, by rubbing my face and hands
with moistened tobacco, a chunk of which he
furnished
me for the purpose.
What particular object he had in view in thus
transforming me, and especially in knotting my hair,
I believe he did not know himself; but when the
task was finished, he swore he had made a man of
me; though it was my own opinion, as I looked at
myself in the river, the only convenient
lookingglass
,
that he had made me a scarecrow. I was
ashamed of my appearance, ashamed of my disguise;
but Brown assured me, over and over again, it was
essential to my safety, and I was forced to submit.
This matter finished, we crossed the river, which
was fordable, and proceeded on our adventures,
Brown saying we could complete our arrangements
as well while travelling as while lying at anchor
there on the road, to be boarded all of a sudden by
our enemies.
As I walked along at his side, my faithful friend
began the completion of the arrangements as above
mentioned, by asking me how I was off in the
lockers? which question not suiting my
comprehension
,
he explained it by asking how much
money
I had in my pockets?
As I had not the greatest confidence in the world
in my comrade's honesty, I felt but little disposed
to put it to any greater temptation than was
absolutely
necessary, and therefore replied ambiguously,
that if he would remember how he himself had
appropriated the contents of my letter of
recommendation
to Mr. Bloodmoney, and call to mind the
disasters I had suffered ever since, he might imagine
my funds were light enough.
That is, I suppose, quoth he, you mean to
say you are as bare as a beggar's platter; and if
I
say so too, why there's two of us, that's all; only
there's some of them Jersey counterfeits yet lying
under hatches. But where's the difference? Them
that knows how to fish, never dabbles among
herrings
for nothing; and money, my hearty, is just
the same thing as herrings, split me. There's
enough of it scattered about among the lubbers here
along shore; and it will go hard if we don't light
upon some way of grabbing our portion.
I give you to understand, as I did before,
Captain
Brown, said I, alarmed at what I deemed a
hint of evil designs upon my integrity, as well as upon
the pockets of the good people of Virginia, that,
however you may think it a joke to seize upon the
property of other people, I don't; and I won't be
drawn into any kind of swindling or roguery, I
assure
you.
At this, Captain Brown grinned with amiable
contempt, and repeated that he was going to live as
honest a life as any body; for, shiver his timbers,
he wanted to know what it felt like. But, said
he, in his usual emphatic manner, we must put on
some kind of character, my skillagallee, hoist some
sort of colours, split me; and if they happen to be
false ones, where's the difference? Since not a
lubberly
rascal of us all ever sails under his own
bunting
.
With that, he asked me what I was good for
what I knewwhat I was brought up to? and I
replied, that I had not yet devoted myself to any
particular study, but that I had some little knowledge
of the languages, the mathematics, and other
academic
sciences.
Hang the languages, and mathematics, and
Vol. II.3
academy sciences, quoth the Vandal,
contemptuously
;
Can you sing a song, dance a jig, jump on
a tight rope, play hocus-pocus, eat fire, transmogrify
shillings, or any of that sort of thing?
I was obliged to reply in the negative; upon
which he expressed so much disappointment and
contempt of my ignorance, that I was compelled,
in my defence, to remind him, that I had but just
emerged from my schoolday existence into the life
of manhoodthat I had not yet had time to learn
much, and, although about to commence the study
of a profession, when my wanderings began, I had
done little more, as yet, than read a few medical
books in my patron's office.
Doctor's books? quoth he, with great
animation
;
what, you can play Pilgarlic then? I'll be
hang'd if that won't suit exactly. Nothing better:
we'll set up doctor, and physic the folks, wherever
we catch them.
I assured him, hastily, I had not knowledge of
physic sufficient to undertake the part of a
practitioner
.
Oh, never mind the knowledge, said Captain
Brown, grinning at the happiness of the conceit;
it's the idea we want, and that will do the business.
And as for being regular doctors, I don't mean no
such thing, sink me: I goes entirely for the quacking
system.
I gave my friend to understand I had no more
appetite
for quacking than for scientific physicking
that I knew my own incompetency, and knowing it,
was too conscientious to be willing to trifle with the
lives of my fellow-beings, in a medical way; and
was pursuing the argument warmly, when he
interrupted
me with sundry oaths, declaring he intended
to do all the physicking
himself
, and required
nothing
more of me than to look wise, while he
administered
to the wants of the afflicted, and when
appealed
to by him, to reply in certain cabalistic
phrases, which he proceeded to teach me.
You see, d'ye see, said he, with the glee of a
schoolboy, setting traps for the neighbours' cats,
I
passes for an old sailor that has seen the worldand
shiver my timbers, I'm just the man that
has
seen
it, and that knows it; and
you
passes, my lark,
for one of them wise Injiemen, d'ye see, that
knows all things, an Injun
Magi
, or Midge-eye, or
whatever you call it, that can make white black, and
black white, and see a blasted heap farther through
a millstone than other people.
But, said I, I
can't
make white black, and
black white, nor can I see further through a
millstone
than other people.
I'll be hang'd if you can't, though, said Captain
Brown, laughing. Harkee, my skilligallee, can you
say
Holly-golly-wow?
Yes, replied I, repeating the mystic word;
but I don't know what it means.
And
Sammy-ram-ram?
quoth Captain Brown.
Sammy-ram-ram
, said I.
Bravo! said Captain Brown, with another
explosion
of merriment, that, will do. Them two
words will make a man of you; and, harkee, my
hearty, they are the only ones you are to speak. You
don't understand English, d'ye see, and speaks only
in your native lingo.
But what, said I, do
holly-golly-wow
and
Sammy-ram-ram
mean?
What do they mean? why, hang me if I know
nor any body else, for that matter, quoth
Captain
Brown. All that you have to do is to roll out
the one or the other, when I speaks to you, and with
as much of an owl look as you can, and understand
nothing that's spoke in English; for, you see, d'ye
see, you don't know the language. Yes! he added,
surveying me with rapture, with that
tobacco-coloured
mug, (here the gentleman meant my visage,)
them monkey-tailed streamers, (here he
designated
my dishonoured looks,) that dishclout
turban
,
(meaning the bandanna cap,) and a small
matter of wise looks,
holly-golly-wow
, and
sammyram-ram
will carry it against the world! But now
for laying in a stock of physic.
With these words, my accomplished associate
drew from his pocket a twist of tobacco, which, as
he rode slowly along, he bit into sundry small pieces,
suitable for his purpose; and then, commanding me
to pick up some clay from a puddle on the roadside,
he formed of it a number of formidable looking
boluses
,
in each of which was imbedded a morsel of
tobacco. Of these he gave me some to carry exposed
to the air, that they might dry the sooner; and others
he stowed away in a paper in his cap for the same
purposes, swearing that his head was the hottest part
of his body.
I ventured to express a hope that he had no
intention
to administer these highly original pills to
any human being; as, from what little I had learned
of the medicinal powers of tobacco, I feared that
some of them were strong enough to produce very
dangerous consequences.
The consequences be curst, said he, with
sublime
disregard of all petty contingencies; that's
the lookout of the patient. However, he added
more amiably, I don't think any pill of tobacco
under a pound in weight would stir the stomach of
folks in these latitudes; because how, they eats it,
and it is meat and drink to them.
Being moved, however, by my remonstrances, he
consented to add a store of less energetic
medicaments
to the boluses. He directed me to pick him
up a handful of sand from the road side, which he
wrapped up in paper and deposited in his pocket,
declaring that he had now physic enough to cure all
the diseases that flesh was heir to.
These important preparations completed, he
assured
me we were now safe from all danger and
suspicion, and might enter any house or village in
Virginia without fear; which I was the more happy
to believe, as I was now half dead with hunger, and
the night was beginning to close around us. And,
by and by, approaching a little hamlet, consisting of
a tavern, a store, a blacksmith shop, and one or two
scattered cottages, we proceeded up to it without
hesitation, though, on my part, not without some
misgivings, because of a great number of persons,
who, at sight of us, came rushing out the
taverndoor
.
3*
CHAPTER III.
Containing Robin Day's first essay as a quack doctor, and the
wonderful effects of the Magian medicines.
Now, quoth Captain Brown, with one of his
customary expletives, remember to hold your
tongue, and to know nothing, except when I talks
to you in the East-Injun tongue, or, what's the
same thing, any nonsensical gibberish that may pass
for it; and then out with the
Holly-golly-wow
, or
Sammy-ram-ram;
and, my skillagalee, you'll see
what will be the end of it.
With these words, he rode boldly up to the
taverndoor
,
I following, with what face I could, at his
heels.
For a moment no one noticed me; all were
occupied
with Captain Brown, of whom they eagerly
asked the news from Norfolkwhether the British
had attacked and taken it? whether they had
murdered
every body, and burned the houses? whether
they were on the march into the interior, and might
be soon expected in
their
town? with similar
questions
expressive of their anxieties and fears.
To these Captain Brown made answer, by
invoking
the usual benediction on his eyes, and begging
the gentleman to know he had more important
business in the world than to concern himself about
the doings of sodgers and milishymen, because why,
their
business was to knock one another on the
head, while his was to relieve the distresses of
mankind
.
However, quoth he benevolently, as I
see you are curious on the subject, I may as well
inform you, that the milishymen have, this time,
won the victory, saved Norfolk, licked the enemy,
and driven them clear out of the land.
At this, there was a great rejoicing among the
villagers, who gave three cheers for Old Vawginnce
and Uncle Sam, followed by a tremendous shaking
of hands, each of the happy republicans crossing
palms with the bearer of good news, and insisting
upon treating him to something to drink; while
even mine host, who was a vinegar-faced man, with
a hole in his hat, awoke to love and munificence,
and swore, stranger should have meat, drink, and
lodging for himself, and his hoss into the bawgain,
and he would n't take one fo'pence ha'penny for it,
or his name war n't John Turnpenny.
So into the bar-room, nothing loth, went Captain
Brown to enjoy the reward of his happy tidings;
and I, having received no hint to the contrary,
followed
also into the room; where my presence attracted
the regards and excited the surprise, of one of the
party, who horrified me by demanding of Captain
BrownI say, stranger, by Jehoshaphat, what
kind of niggur do you call that? and where did you
come by him?
Oh, said Captain Brown, with gravity, after
despatching the first glass of the juice of the maize
put into his hand, and extending his hand for another,
he an't exactly a niggur, hang me, but a blacky of
the East Injun breed, and such a piece of man's flesh
as, I reckon, was never seen before in these parts,
and will never be seen again. You've heard tell
of the Magi breed?them great wise fellers in the
Injies, that knows all thingscan eat fire, chaw
swords, find money, read the stars, raise the devil,
cure the consumption, and draw rum out of a
beer-barrel
Well,
shiver my timbers, he's a Magi!
Lord bless us, you don't say so! quoth the
landlord, eyeing me, as all the rest now did, with
wonder and admirationdraw rum out of a
beer-barrel
?
raise the devil! How did you come by him?
Bought him, if you must know, my hearty,
said Captain Brown, of the King of the Injies, for
ten half-joes, two hunks of tobacco, and a jack-knife;
and then had to kidnap him away; for these Magi
fellers, d'ye see, ain't to be had every day, and the
king he rued his bargain.
Draw rum out of a beer-barrel! again ejaculated
mine host, to whom this faculty appeared most
surprising
and enviable: perhaps he can draw good
French brandy out of a cider cask, hah? I say, boy,
hah! can you do
that?
he added addressing
himself
to me; who, astounded and indignant at being
mistaken for a scion of the Ethiopian race, and
petrified
at the impudence and audacity of my comrade,
was now afraid that the attention he had drawn upon
me, and the incredible account he gave of my
qualities
,
might eventuate in suspicion and danger. But
Captain Brown stepped immediately to the rescue
that is as soon as he had despatched a second glass of
liquor.
Harkee, shipmate, said he to Mr. John
Turnpenny
;
you might as well preach a Dutch Sermon
to a ship's fiddlehead as ask any of your palavering
questions of that young whelp of a Magi; because
how, he don't understand English. And as for
drawing rum out of a beer barrel, raising the devil,
and so on, why, I will just take the liberty to inform
yon, d'ye see, he don't do no such tricks; because
how, I bought him young, before he had finished
that part of his education. No; in all them things,
he is no better nor wiser than any other jackanapes.
But what I bought him for was for the good of
human natur', whereof he knows things enough to
make your hair stand on end. Look at him! There's
the boyChowder-Chow they called him in the
Injieswho is the seventh son of his father, which
was the seventh son of his grandfather, and the
greatest doctor in all the Injies, and cured the king's
wife of the cholery, after she had been lying dead
three days in her coffin; and Chowder-Chow here,
for all of his being so young and looking so like a
jackass, is just as great a cure as his father.
Can he cure the aguy? cried an indigo coloured
personage, who, with his hands buried in his
trowsers
pockets, his head sunk on his breast, and,
otherwise
,
looking very chilly and disconsolate, now
stared me with solemn eagerness, and a doleful
yawn, in the face.
Can he cure the aguy? repeated Captain Brown
with disdain; aguy and the bilious cholery, and the
small-pox, consumption, happyplexy, sore eyes and
stitch in the side, lockjaw and the falling-sickness,
liver complaint and the horrors, rheumatiz,
toothache
,
and water in the brainevery unfortunate
disease you ever heard of; besides all the ills of horses,
cows, sheep, dogs, asses, pigs, and niggurswhat is
he the seventh son of a seventh son, which was an
Injun Magi, for, if he can't cure the whole of 'em,
just as easy as look at 'em?
Because, said the blue-visaged man, his visage
growing still bluer, I have a touch of the complaint,
which has been hanging about me, on and off, I
reckon now for about seven years; and, I fancy, I
about am having a shake of it, right off now; because
my nose is as cold as a dog's, and it is coming on to
the time, which is about early candle-light. And if
so be as how this Injun doctor can cure me, why
I'll pay him for his trouble, that's all.
And to prove that the poor fellow was not
mistaken
in his reckoning, his speech was ended by a
sudden snap of the teeth, that was followed by
another, and another, until presently there was such
a chattering and clattering among his jaws, as might
have moved an alligator to surprise and envy.
Can he cure a weakness in the small of the back,
with a pain in the inwards? quoth the landlord
Turnpenny. Can he cure a misery in the tooth?
demanded another. Can he do any thing at a weak
stomach, and the hopthalmy in the eyes? cried a
third; and presently there was not a man of them
that was not busy recounting his bodily infirmities,
and inquiring my abilities to remove them.
Captain Brown was not satisfied with replying
boldly in the affirmative: he assured them my powers
were so wonderfully great that I could remove half
the diseases of the world merely by looking at them;
and, for the other half, I required only two
remedies
,
each of such peculiar, yet incompatible virtues,
that, although, either was a perfect specific for all
the diseases to which it was applicable, it was certain
death, if administered to the maladies requiring the
use of the other.
And, said he, with a great oath, here's the
wonder of the thing; for, whereas you might think
that with two such drugs, you, or I, or any body
else, might go into the world and spoil the regular
doctors' business, you would think, axing your
pardon
for saying so, like so many jackasses; because
how, we should never know which of them to give,
and if we gave the wrong one, we should send your
sick man to Davy Jones in no time: no I'll be
hang'd, none but a magi knows
that
. Now,
said he, turning to the shivering subject of ague, and
producing his wondrous medicinesviz., the
tobacco
boluses and the paper of sand; here I have
the great cure-alls, split me, the holy medicines of
the Magies, one in one hand and t'other in the t'other;
and I knows
one
of them will cure you, d'ye see,
the other kill you; and that's all
I
knows, or
you
knows, or any body else knows; and if you want to
try your own luck at 'em, here's at your sarvice
you may have a trial all for nothing:I allows all
people to do
that
, for the good of human natur'.
But, he added, if you axes the Magi to tell you
the true one that will cure you, why, then, here's
the case, shiver me, all in shortout with your
rhino; for that's not a thing to be done free gratis for
nothing.
Fever-and-ague recoiled from the perilous choice,
so charitably offered him, and fell to fumbling, as
well as the shakes would permit, in his pocket for
the means of engaging the services of the young
Magi; while the others, gazing with reverent
curiosity
on the magical drugs, begged to know their
names and natur's, if it was axing a fair question.
Fair enough, quoth Captain Brown, with
conscious
dignity; I am not one of them ignoramus
quacks that makes a secret of their kill-dog stuffs,
which does no good, except to kill off jackasses,
whereof there is too many in the world: because as
how, if they tell the secret, any body may lay hold
of the same nonsensical trash, and set up a-quacking
in opposition. But there is no fear of that with me;
because as how, if any body gits the medicines, he
can't use 'em, d'ye see, without a Magi to help him;
and, secondly, he can't get them, without he sails all
the way to the Injies, and then buys them of the
Magies. These here, quoth he, extending a
handful
of boluses, is them rare and precious things,
Mermaids' Eggs, fished up by the pearl divers from
the pearl banks of the Injun Ocean.
Lord bless us! quoth Mr. Turnpenny; do
mermaids lay eggs? I thought they war half fish and
half woman!
And so they are, quoth Captain Brown; but
they lays eggs notwithstanding. I harpooned one,
off the coast of Coromandel; and I'll be hang'd if
she wasn't as full of eggs as a tortoise; and, split
me for a ninny, (because as how, I didn't then know
of their virtues,) I had 'em all cooked in a mess, and
the sailors eat 'em for dinner; but the carcass we
threw overboard, because as how, it was too human
looking for eating.
Here Captain Brown had very nearly forgotten
himself, as was proved by one of the men present
asking what were the medical effects of this
extraordinary
dinner upon his crew? to which,
however
,
he immediately replied, that the effects were,
in the main, bad enough, as they killed twenty seven
men, out of thirty that eat of them; though they
cured
him
of a terrible Bengal fever, that then
possessed
him, and that so thoroughly that he had never
been sick since, and never again expected to be
because how, it was the virtue of these Magi
medicines
,
that, when they cured a man of any disease,
no matter what it might be, he was never sick
afterwards
of any malady whatever, and always died of
mere old age.
And this here stuff that's in the paper, quoth
Captain Brown, displaying the second treasure
Lord bless us, said Mr. Turnpenny, it looks
for all the world like common sand!
And so it is, said the voyager, but such sand
as you, nor any other man, never before saw in
America. It is that wonderful sand, more precious
than gold or silver, the Holy Sand of the Ganges.
Lord bless us! ejaculated Mr. Turnpenny.
It comes from the holy places in the mountains,
where the river comes out of a rock, and where none
but the Magies goes, said Captain Brown; and it
has such a wonderful power, that if you throw one
single grain of it into a pine-wood fire, it will blow
the house up; and where you give it in the wrong
cases, and the man swallows it, he falls to pieces like
an unhooped hogshead. And to tell you the honest
truth, d'ye see, he added, it is not safe to swallow
it in any case: the true way to take it is to put it
into a bottle of water and shake it, and then smell at
the bottle when you get up in the morning, seven
days fasting.
By this time, fever-and-ague had collected all
the small coin in his pocket, which he proposed to
exchange for a dose of the wondrous physic,
provided
the Magi Chowder Chow should select it, and
provided also Chowder Chow's master should
warrant
him against all danger, and guarantee a perfect
cure into the bargain. Captain Brown deposited
the money in his pocket, after swearing that he had
never before taken so small a sum for such valuable
physic, no, not he; but that something was better
than nothing, split him, and he would go a great
way for the good of human natur'; and then bade
them observe in how wonderful a manner Chowder
Chow would proceed in deciding upon his case, and
its proper specific.
You see him, there he stands, quoth the villain,
and knows no more of our lingo than I do of a cat's
conscience or a monkey's mathematics. Well now,
Vol. II.4
mayhap, you may think he will have to ask a whole
heap of questions, and I to answer them, in his
lingo, for this here gentleman that is a shaking like
a shutter in a high wind, as to the state of his
inwards
,
and all that, like a common physicianer;
which is all nonsense, d'ye see; because why, a Magi
looks into a man's face, and sees through him, and
knows all about him, inside aud out; and where
then's the use of asking questions? I shall just put
the poor devilwhich is to say, begging his pardon,
the poor gentlemanbefore his eyes, and you'll see
what will come of it.
With that, he took the shiverer by the shoulder,
and placed him before me, saying, Well now,
Chowder
Chow, my hearty, what do you think of the poor
man, and what is to be done with him?
Chowder Chow, in spite of the reluctance he felt
at being made a party to a fraud so impudent and yet
so ridiculous, felt, nevertheless, the necessity of
acting
up to the character he had assumed; and, taking
the hint from the words of his master, of which he
was supposed to understand not a syllable, and from
instructions previously given, he stared in the man's
face, with as much courage as he could muster,
backed
by a suitable proportion of solemnity, and
Holly-golly-wow
!
he muttered.
Ah, indeed! quoth Captain Brown, turning with
admiration to the expectant companythere you
see the use of having a Magi: for shiver me, if I
didn't think, from my own numskull notions, that
the Holy Sand of the Ganges was the very thing
to cure the gentleman of his aguy; whereas Chowder
Chow says, says he, `The man has got the
fever-and-aguy
,
and has had it for seven years, and it has
turned his liver into milk and molasses:give him
a Mermaid's egg, and wash it down with half a pint
of whiskey.'
Lord bless us! said the landlord; and By
Jehoshaphat! said the others, expressing their
wonder
and admiration. One of them, however, looked
a little perplexed, and repeating the word
Holly-golly-wow
,
asked how it was possible it could
express
so much as honest Brown had rendered as its
meaning. To this, Brown replied the Magi lingo
was a short-hand language, which crammed a barrel
of notions into a pint of words, and was extremely
difficult to learn, it was, split him. Then, having
thus ingeniously satisfied the doubter, he made the
sick man, to my horror, swallow one of the hugest of
the boluses, and immediately after wash it down with
an immoderate glass of whiskey.
He then turned to mine host Turnpenny, who was
eager upon Brown's offering, out of respect to the
house, as he said, to physic him for nothing, to have
the great Magi at work upon his weakness in the
small of the back, and pain of the inwards; and
Brown having brought him before me accordingly, I
was about to deliver another oraculous opinion; when
the bolus we had administered to the ague-patient,
being, I suppose, at length dissolved by the whiskey,
produced such a sudden and tremendous effect upon
his
inwards, as to discompose the company, and
interrupt
my Magian proceedings. The poor man
turned from blue to pale, gave a hideous gasp,
clapped
his hands upon his epigastrium, arching his back
up, like a frenzied cat; and then, with a yell of
astonishment
and distress, he rushed from the room
into the porch, where his rebellious digester
discarded
the Magian medicine; but not without such throes
of anguish and convulsions of nausea, as left the poor
fellow, when the operation ceased, more dead than
alive.
I was very much frightened, when they brought
him in; and so, indeed, was every body else, except
Brown; who grinned, declared all was right, and
ended the scene by ordering them to give him
another
glass of whiskey, and carry him to bed; which
was immediately done.
This calamitous termination of the first miracle of
Chowder Chow, the Magus, (or
Magi
, as Captain
Brown would have it,) cast a discredit, at least for a
time, over the Mermaid's Eggs; and the company
no longer showed an inclination to be physicked.
Even Turnpenny, upon being appealed to, to resume
his station before the dispenser of panaceas, excused
himself, giving as a reason, that supper was now
ready, and he could not think of losing so great a
luxury; which, it was evident, he must do, if the
Magian medicines produced so strong an effect upon
him as they had done on his aguish neighbour.
The word supper was music to my ears, and quite
banished the fears I had felt as to the ulterior effects
of the bolus; and while despatching it, which I was
obliged to do at a side table, (for, as a slave, which
my audacious friend had represented me to be, no
one thought me a suitable companion at the table;
while my Magian character fortunately preserved
me from the ignominy of the kitchen,) I was
resolved
to bear the ills and degradation of my present
state, as long as circumstances made it necessary,
with as much resignation and philosophy as I could.
CHAPTER IV.
The Mermaids' Eggs effect a miraculous cure, and Chowder Chow
rises in reputation.
When
the supper was over, Turnpenny, with
some others, went up stairs to visit the victim of the
bolus; whom wonderful to be said, they found
relieved
of his ague, and, according to his own account,
as well as ever he wasbetter, indeed, as he said,
than he ever remembered to have felt before in his
life, and desirous to know the great doctor's will,
whether he might not get up to enjoy the company,
or, at least, have another glass of whiskey, to
recompense
the pains of solitude.
This wonderful cure, which I suppose was owing
to the tremendous shock of the bolus upon the
martyr's
whole system, produced the effect that might
have been expected upon Turnpenny and his friends;
especially as Captain Brown declared the man would
never be sick again as long as he lived; and their
eagerness was renewed to have the extraordinary
Chowder Chow administer to their various
ailments
.
Turnpenny again offered himself to my inspection;
though it must be confessed, his resolution faltered
a little at the moment; and he assured Captain Brown,
if it was all one to him, and to the Doctor, he
would rather prefer having a dose of the Holy Sand
4*
of the Ganges to smell at, than a Mermaid's egg to
swallow; because his stomach was naturally a tender
one, and, he was sure, any violent attack upon it
would be the death of him. Captain Brown averred
upon his honour, that his Magi medicines,
administered
by his Magi, never were the death of any
body; and comforted him with the assurance, that,
if severely handled by them, he might be sure he
had been desperately in need of their assistance;
because as how, quoth Captain Brown, with
exhaustless
ingenuity, or impudence, the way these
Magi medicines cures a disease is by fighting it out
of a man's bodyit is pull dick, pull devil between
them; when the disease is strong, the fight is strong;
but when it is a small matter, why the fight is a
small matter; and that's exactly the way of it.
Then, turning to me, he said, Well Chowder
Chow, my lad,
polly wolly smash?
which he
interpreted
to the company as meaning, What is to
be done with the landlord?
Fortunately for this anxious worthy, his doctor
was as desirous as himself that his medicine should
be of the mildest character: I had no inclination to
bring him within an ace of his life, for the sake of
removing a weakness in the back and a pain in the
inwards. I, therefore, after giving him the wisest
look I could summon to my assistance, pronounced
the magical
Sammy ram ram
, which, I justly
inferred, would condemn him only to a dose of the
Holy Sand of the Ganges. Captain Brown picked,
with the utmost care and circumspection, a single
grain from his paper, and presented it to Mr.
Turnpenny
.
Put this, said he, into a bottle, and
fill it up with water; which being immediately
done, he bade Turnpenny smell it seven times; and
then asked, if he did not feel much stronger in the
back and easier in the inwards?
Well! returned mine host, with a look of
wonder
,
I don't know but I do. But, I declar,' it has
the most powerful smell I ever
did
smell!
Has it? quoth Captain Brown; that is a sign,
then, that there is a powerful strength in the
weakness
of your back, and the Holy Sand is taking a
powerful pull at it. But this is nothing to the good
it will do you, when you smell it in the morning;
which you must do, fasting, seven times, and for
seven days running; when, if you ain't clear of all
ailments for ever and a day after, I give you leave to
eat me, that's all. But, I say, shipmate, he added,
solemnly, take care you don't let that grain of sand,
by any mischance, get too near a pine-wood fire, or
sky-high goes the house to Davy Jones in a
twinkling
.
The landlord vowed he would take great care to
avoid such a misfortune; and Captain Brown turned
him to the others, all of whom, in turn, now applied
to Chowder Chow for relief. Nay, business
thickened
on my hands. Turnpenny brought in his wife
and children to be prescribed for; an example that
was followed by two others present, being the
blacksmith
and shopkeeper of the hamlet, who went out
for their families to have them doctored; not because
they were sick and wanted doctoring, but because
Captain Brown, in the plenitude of his impudence,
assured them, that the Magi medicines, administered,
according to the constitution, (and it was the
peculiarity
of constitution, he swore, and not of disease,
that indicated the medicine,) to people in good health,
were sufficient to prevent the takers ever being sick
of any disease in their lives.
From all these happy people, for whom I took care
to order nothing but the Holy Sand of the Ganges
or from as many of them as had any moneythe
brazen fellow exacted a reward, being every penny
he could get; so that, when the entertainments of the
evening were over, and we retired to bed, he swore
he had pocketed at least five or six dollars. I told
him, the money was not acquired honestly; to
which he replied, that he had often heard of money
being acquired honestly, but had never yet seen a
case of it; and all the honest people he ever knew
were as poor as King David's goslings, and expected
to remain so.
I would have argued with him upon the knavery
of our proceeding; but, I saw,
argument
was all
wasted upon a man who seemed actually to think
that cozening and swindling were excellent pastime,
the finest thing in the worldor, as he called it, as
good as a glass of grog. But I gave him warning,
it was against my conscience to persist in such
deception
,
and that I would abandon the Magian
vocation
,
as soon as I found myself beyond the reach of
pursuers and courts martial.
This protest I made in the chamber assigned to
the honest Captain; in which was spread upon the
floor a bundle of straw, a bed scarce worthy of the
dignity of an East India doctor, but fit enough for
the favoured boundman of a traveller. Upon this
score of bondage, too, I had some indignation to
express
;
for I saw no reason why he should represent
me in so degrading a light as his slave. Oh, said
he, it is your only safety: who will think of
court-martialling
a slave for high-treason? With that,
he bestowed a profane benediction on my eyes, and
closed his own, being in a moment sound asleep;
and I, being weary and heavy enough, was glad to
follow his example.
CHAPTER V.
The progress of Chowder Chow and his master, continued.
We
arose at an early hour in the morning to
resume
our journey, but not until Captain Brown,
from an impulse of friendship, had bought of our
host, for my use, a sorry nag with saddle and bridle;
for which, as he told me afterwards, with great
delight
,
he had paid in counterfeit money, being some
of the remaining portion of the notes he had got for
Bay Tom. This grieved and disconcerted me
greatly; but I was not informed of it until it was
too late to make restitution.
I discovered, during the previous evening, from
some expressions of honest Turnpenny, that his little
hamlet was in possession of a post-office, at which
mails were received once a week; and that the
dignity
of postmaster, along with that of publican,
centred in his honoured person.
This recalled to my memory the letter I had
written, and still carried about me, while in the
Jumping Jenny, to Dr. Howard, informing him of
my misfortunes and captivity, of the extraordinary
and most happy discovery I had made of his son
Tommy, and of my intention to effect for him and
myself a speedy escape from the hands of the
invaders
.
I sighed to think how I had been baffled in
regard to Tommy, who was still a prisoner; but I
felt the necessity of informing my patron of the
discovery without further delay. For this purpose,
I determined to seize the present opportunity of
committing my letter to the post; and I designed,
in the morning, to add an envelope, in which to
acquaint him with my having escaped alone, and the
necessity of his taking some steps to effect the
liberation
of his son.
But when the morning came, I found our early
setting-out, which Brown declared was necessary to
our safety, deprived me of the power of adding any
thing further to the letter; which I was therefore
enforced to send as it was. As I was sensible it
would be an obviously suspicious step for
me
, in
person, to hand the letter to Turnpenny, I was
obliged to request Captain Brown's good offices in
the matter; and, as I gave it to him, I begged he
would not think it necessary to make as free with it
as he had done with my letter of introduction; for
which there was the less reason, as there was no
money in it. Brown laughed, and carried the letter
to Turnpenny; but I took care to keep my eye
upon him notwithstanding. As it was addressed to
Dr.
Howard, which Turnpenny observed, Brown
took the occasion, and such an occasion he
manifestly
could never resist, to tell him a very big
falsehood
,
namely, that it was a letter of his writing to
a very great and rich doctor, who wanted to buy the
secrets of the Magi and the Magi himself; for which
and whom he had offered twenty thousand dollars
in hard money; but which Brown had refused,
because
as how, it was not half the value of the
articles
.
This business settled, and to my satisfaction, for
I saw the letter safely deposited in a trunk, the
strong box of the post-office, we mounted our
horses, and rode forth upon our adventures, taking
care, however, for very obvious reasons, to seek
them upon the most retired and unfrequented roads.
We stopped to dine at another out-of-the-way
hamlet; where I was compelled a second time to
assume the character of a Magus, and dispense the
wonderful drugs of the East to such as were willing
to be administered to, in our wonderful way.
As I had my reasons for preferring the Holy
Sand of the Ganges to the Mermaid's Eggs, I took
care, when the first patient appeared before me, to
pronounce the Magian
Sammy-ram-ram
, not
doubting that the lucky sufferer would get off with
the mildest dose of our medicines. But I soon
found that I had reckoned without my host; for
Captain Brown, who, I began clearly to perceive,
was possessed by a devil of mischief, and preferred
the energetic operation of the boluses to the gentler
effects of the Holy Sand, interpreted, this time,
Sammy-ram-ram
to mean Mermaids' Eggs; and
a Mermaid's Egg he forthwith administered to the
patient. And, indeed, on all future occasions,
whether I commenced
my
proceedings with
Sammy-ram-ram
or
Holly-golly-wow
, he was sure to
begin
his
with a tobacco bolus.
Our efforts in the cause of humanity, in this way,
were continued for rather more than a week, and
might, but for an accident of which I shall presently
speak, have continued much longer; as our Magian
pretensions, and the miraculous cures, which, it
seems, we effected, began to swell the trump of fame.
And, I believe, we might have made our fortunes,
too, so great became our renown, and the eagerness
of our patients, had we not unfortunately
commenced
operations in a poor and but thinly settled
district, where credulity was much more plentiful
than money. Nevertheless, I inferred from what
Captain Brown said, that we did a pretty fair
business.
Another inference I also made, namely, that of all
the modes of swindling mankind, and, in particular,
American mankind, yet devised, drugging them with
quack medicines, is at once the easiest and most
profitable: and this opinion, drawn from my own
youthful experience in the honourable trade, I find,
in these my riper years, confirmed by the accounts
of others, and especially the accounts daily
published
in the newspapers; by which it is apparent
that the quack trade has arrived at a pitch of
stupendous
importance, and bids fair to become, in
time, the great business of the country.
To Captain Brown this kind of life, which
entirely
fulfilled his ideas of an honest one, presented
a variety of charms, which my conscience did not
permit me to find in it. To gull was the first of his
delights, and the more impudent the cheat, the
better; and as to the consequences of his roguery,
whether serious or not, they gave him not the least
concern. His only regret, as constantly expressed,
was that my obstinate adherence to the Holy Sand
of the Ganges, prevented his oftener administering
the Mermaid's Eggs; which he had the greatest
satisfaction in doing, as well as in watching their
lugubrious effects upon the visages and stomachs of
his patients.
Next to this, was the pleasure he took in
stretching
the credulity of his patrons to the utmost. He
was not even content with exacting full belief in
the extraordinary pretensions he put forth in favour
of his medicines; he vowed Chowder Chow could
cure a patient without seeing him, nothing more
being necessary than that some friend should step
forward as his representative, and pronounce his
name; whereupon Chowder Chow could, and would,
immediately, he declared, with unerring sagacity,
determine the medicine that was necessary for his
case and constitution; which medicine was
warranted
by him just as certainly to effect a cure, as if
administered by his own hands. In this
assumption
,
in truth, we found our greatest advantage and
profit; since, as we never tarried at any one place
longer than to eat or sleep, and, therefore, did not
wait until the sick and ailing could be brought to us
to be physicked, we must have lost a great many
patients, had we not thus possessed the power of
physicking them at a distance.
To me, as I have already hinted, this life of
deception
and roguery was distressing enough, and only
endured for a time to serve the purpose of
self-preservation
.
Every day increased my longing to
throw off the humiliating mask of the
merry-andrew
,
which I was compelled to wear, and, with
it, the friendship and company of Captain Brown;
whose character, now fully exposed, his wild,
graceless, unprincipled, devil-may-care disposition,
I knew not whether I most wondered at, or
detested.
Of this desire, I did not scruple to make him
acquainted; but he only laughed, and asked me,
how I was to navigate clear of the officers of
justice, if I lost his convoy?a question that
commonly reduced me to silence and submission.
Towards the end of the week, however, I began to
think I was now so far removed from the coast, and
from the theatre of war, for we had been
journeying
westward all the time, as to be no longer in
danger of a court-martial; and one fine, but sultry
evening, upon the banks of the river Roanoke,
Vol. II.5
which we had now reached, I resolved that that
should be the last day of my humiliation.
To-morrow, quoth I to myself, I will tell
Captain Brown, or Hellcat, or whatever he may
call himself, that he must, in future, be his own
Magus; pronounce the absurd
Holly-golly-wow
with his own lips; and dispense with his own hands
(as he has, in fact, done all along,) his confounded
Mermaids' Eggs, and the Holy Sand of the
Ganges.
CHAPTER VI.
Another miraculous cure, but the credit of which Chowder Chow
is willing should rest with Captain Brown entirely.
As
these resolutions were forming in my mind,
we perceived of a sudden, in a cotton-field, which
we were riding by, a group of men, all of them
negroes, except one, who seemed an overseer,
surrounding
a fellow labourer, who had fallen down in
a fit, as it afterwards appeared; though, with all my
Magian knowledge, I had not the least notion what
was the matter, until my comrade dd his eyes,
and swore there was meat for our market,
meaning
that there was a case proper for our medicines.
With that, he rode into the field, bidding me follow
him, and coming up to the group, demanded of the
overseer what was the matter.
Oh, said the overseer, with a drawling voice,
it's nothingit's only a gone nigger;fell down
smack with the happyplexy.
Did he? quoth Captain Brown, with an oath;
then here's just the lad, the great East Injun
Doctor, that can cure him.
And with that, he descended from his horse, and
turned the negro, who lay terribly snorting on his
face, over upon his back.
Well! quoth the overseer, turning from the
officious stranger to me, whom he regarded with a
languid, yawning curiosity; while the negroes,
forgetting
their comrade, grinned a stupid amazement
in my faceWell, I did hear some 'un say
something
of the East Injun Doctor: but, I reckon, he
added, looking round again to Brown, he can do
nothing for the boy; because as how, he is done for,
and I don't allow any physic can touch the
happyplexy
.
Nor I neither, said Brown, except the Magi
physic; which is a thing, my hearty, whereof you
knows no more than a cat of the forte-piano. But
you shall see, shiver my timbers, what Chowder
Chow can do; and if he don't cure him, why, I'll eat
him, that's all. You shall see Chowder Chow look
through his black carcass in no time.
With that, he turned to me, saying, How now,
Chowder Chow
polly wolly smash!
which he,
as was his wont, interpreted for the overseer's benefit
to mean, What is to be done with the man!
I was amazed, nay, confounded, at the audacity of
Brown in offering my services in a case so desperate;
for to me the poor negro seemed at the very last
gasp,
in articulo mortis
, as the doctors say; and it
was with a faltering voice, and rather from the
associations
of habit than any operation of the will, that
I muttered out the customary
Holly golly wow
.
My amazement was increased by the interpretation
Brown immediately gave this phrase, which had
never before meant any thing but Mermaids' Eggs
or the Golden Sand of the Ganges; but which, now,
he declared, signified nothing less than that the
overseer
should use the whip he had in his hand, and
apply it to the back of the dying negro.
Lash a feller that's dying! ejaculated the
overseer
,
his dull eyes opening with astonishment,
perhaps
with humane indignation: no, stranger, I don't
do no such thing as that, no how.
You wont? quoth Brown, snatching the whip,
from his hand: I'll be hang'd if
I
don't, then; for,
d'ye see, when Chowder Chow says whip, he means
whip, and no mistake about it.
With that, he fetched the poor creature a terrible
thwack over the shins, which happened to be bare,
and with an effect the most astonishing in the world.
The legs, that seemed stiffening in death, were jerked
upwards with convulsive vivacity; the snort of
apoplexy
was changed to a yell of pain; and up jumped
the dying negro, dancing about to avoid the slashes
Brown still aimed at his shins, and lustily roaring,
Lorra gor, Massy! all cure now, Massy! all cure!
And I heard him add,
sotto voce
, when the operation
was over, dis here niggur nebber play' possum no
more!
Well! ejaculated the overseer, surveying first
the resuscitated negro, (who the moment Brown
ceased to castigate him, caught up a hoe, and began
to annihilate weeds and blue grass with astonishing
zeal and industry,) then Brown, the performer of the
cure, and, lastly, him, the sagacious Chowder Chow,
who had directed itWell now! I'm hanged if I
ever did hear of trouncing a feller out of the
happyplexy
!
I say, stranger, he added, addressing Brown,
do you cure any other diseases that way?
The way, quoth Brown, depends upon
Chowder
Chow, the Magi doctor, who always cures every
ailing exactly the right way; and never misses,
because how, shipmate, a miss isn't in him.
It an't? said the overseer, giving me another
admiring stare; well then, all I have to say is, if
that's the sort of short work he makes upon a sick
man, he has just come to the right place, here upon
5*
this plantation, to get his hands full of business;
because
we've a heap of hands here among us, and this
here Roanoke air always keeps us a full hospital.
With that he invited us to follow him to the
mansion
of his employer, who lived in seclusion upon his
estate, which was a very great and valuable, but not
very healthy one, and would, doubtless, be very
happy to engage our services, as well as reward them
handsomely. To this proposal Brown immediately
consented, and we rode to the housemuch,
however
,
against my secret will; for I feared lest the
owner of the estate should prove a man of education,
intelligent enough to penetrate our shallow devices,
to laugh at, and perhaps to punish the imposition.
CHAPTER VII.
Chowder Chow performs, as he hopes, his last cure, at the expense
of Mr. Fabius Maximus Feverage.
Fortunately
, as it proved, my fears were in this
case groundless; for Mr. Feverage (which the
overseer
told us was the proprietor's name,) received us
with the greatest possible respect; and upon being
told the miraculous cure we had wrought upon the
apoplectic slave, which the overseer did his best to
make still more miraculous, swore (for Mr. Feverage
though a rich and respectable man, could swear too,
and that roundly,) that he had never before heard, or
read, of there being such good doctors in the East
Indies
,
but that he could now believe it; asked if I cured
all diseases, like the apoplexy, instantaneously;
and upon Brown replying I never required more
than seven days to cure the most desperate diseases,
said I was a wonderful young devil; demanded
what were the nature of my remedies, and if I had
a good store of them; and ended by desiring to carry
me to the hospital, or sick cabins, where, he said, he
had some twenty or thirty hands down with various
diseases, which I should be handsomely rewarded for
administering to.
To this last proposal Brown, to my great relief,
demurred, saying he had travelled all day and was
tired and hungry, because how, he was a
mortal
man, and so was Chowder Chow, although a
Magi; and, split his timbers, the niggers might wait
till morning: to which proposition Mr. Feverage
very politely submitted, and ordered supper to be
brought in.
Upon this, Captain Brown, charmed by his
hospitality
,
told him, that although Chowder Chow was
too weary to attend to the negroes, he would not
object to his giving him a proof of his skill in his
own person, provided he had any ailing he wished to
be rid of. Mr. Feverage, who looked to me the
picture
of robust health, notwithstanding the
insalubrity
of his estate, declared he hadhe did'nt know
what to call ithe could not say he was a sick man
but he believed he had, and
had
had ever since last
fall, when he had a bilious feverhe would not call
it a pain, or a weakness, or a stiffness, but a kind
of coldness, and yet it wasn't cold neitherbut his
left leg wasn't exactly the same as his right one.
Well, quoth Captain Brown, that may be a
small matter, or a great one, which neither of us
knows nothing about; but Chowder Chow does; and
if you stands up before him, and looks him straight
in the face, he'll tell you what it is in no time.
Oh, said Mr. Feverage, I shall be glad to
know.
And up he jumped before me; who, perceiving I
was to say something, and not knowing any thing
better to say, murmured out a modest
Holly-golly-wow
.
How! you don't say so! quoth Captain Brown
looking very much surprised, or pretending to be;
and immediately turning to Mr. Feverage, he
assured
him, with great solemnitythat is, with one
of his choice execrations, which not even the
presence
of so respectable a gentleman could check
that it was a fortunate thing he had consulted the
wonderful Chowder Chow, who had told him that
that coldness, or stiffness, or weakness, or whatever
he thought it, was nothing less than the beginning of
a palsy in his limb.
A palsy! God bless me! cried Mr. Feverage,
looking prodigiously alarmed; I hope not;I never
should have believed it;I'm not that sort of man
yet.Yet, I remember, I had an unclethat is, my
wife had an unclewho died of a palsy; and such
things run in a family!
Oh, said Brown, with an encouraging air, you
needn't be frightened; for if you had all the palsies
in the world, Chowder Chow would clear them out
of you in less time than I could empty a glass of
grog, he would, split me. And if you are for
making
an end of the matter, before it goes any
farther
Oh yes, by all means! interrupted Mr.
Feverage
,
in great agitation: I remember that my wife's
uncle lost all the use of one side; his arm dangled,
and his leg hung, and one cheek was all out of shape,
and his mouth awry:I would n't look so for the
world! And if the doctor can prevent it
Prevent it! quoth Brown, with an air of pity:
if he don't, just consider me bound to make a
supper of him, that's all.
With that, he bade the gentleman again take his
station before me, which he did, and I cursing in
my secret thoughts Brown's officiousness in
procuring
a patient, when I could have done so well
without
one, was obliged to pronounce the words of
wisdom; and
Sammy-ram-ram
, concluded my
part in the exhibition.
I took it for granted, that Brown would be
content
,
in this case, with dispensing the Holy Sand of
the Ganges, our patient and host being a man of too
much consequence and dignity to be condemned to
the infernal boluses. But Brown's audacity was
not of a kind to be subdued by the rank of a patron,
and his affection for the boluses too great to permit
the loss of any opportunity to use them. A
Mermaid's
Egg, therefore, he immediately administered,
and with such effect, that, within five minutes, Mr.
Feverage grew deadly sick, and gulped and retched
in a manner doleful to behold. And to make the
matter worse, Brown, at every qualm, plied him
with questions, how his leg felt?Was not the
coldness going off?Had not the weakness
diminished?Was not the pain entirely gone?
until the poor gentleman, driven to phrenzy by the
pangs of his stomach, and the impertinence of his
physician, burst into execrations, dd his leg, the
weakness, the pain, and the coldness, and called for
a basin to prepare for that catastrophe he could no
longer doubt was coming, and which was, indeed,
not much longer deferred.
In this way, he was, at length, relieved of the
chief part of his distresses; and the remaining qualms
were conquered by a glass or two of cold toddy he
had previously ordered to be mixed; after which,
being now restored to that happy state of ease he
had been in before, he fell into a rapture, and vowed
I was a wonderful doctor, and my medicines most
extraordinarythat they had certainly removed all
his symptoms, his coldness, weakness, &c.; and he
could take his oath upon the gospels that one leg
now felt exactly like the other.
He now asked a great many questions concerning
me, which Brown answered by the story he had, by
constant repetition, almost commited to memory, viz.
that he had bought me of an Indian king for ten
half-joes, two hunks of tobacco, and a jack knife,
&c. &c.; all which Mr. Feverage heard with interest
and admiration, especially the fact of my being a
slave. He declared he would swap any ten of his
hands for such a paragon, and offered to buy me on
the spot, if my master would put any thing like a
reasonable price on me. But Captain Brown swore,
with affectionate emphasis, he would not part with
me for the world, because how, split him, he was
not going to sell the bread out of his mouth.
By this time, the supper was laid, and a sumptuous
one it was too; and down sat the hospitable host,
having previously directed Captain Brown to do the
same.
As for me, who had with longing eyes and
dissolving
lips, surveyed the dishes as they were brought
in one after the other, and so far forgot myself as to
anticipate the pleasure I should have in making away
with them, I received a sudden hint that I was not
expected to be of the party, by Mr. Feverage bidding
one of the negro footmen, of whom there were some
half a dozen or more that came into the room to wait
on the table, to take the doctor to the kitchen, and
give him his supper; an order, however, that he
immediately revoked by sayingBut,after all, he's
no common blackey, or company for blackeys: and
so take him to the housekeeper's pantry, and there
feed him like a white-man.
Alas! how my cheeks reddened beneath their
brown covering at my unworthy fate! how my blood
boiled to think that Captain Brown, a vulgar
ignoramus
and desperado, should sit down to a
gentleman's
table, from which I was driven to the half
menial feast of a housekeeper's pantry! Alas, alas!
However, I was too hungry to remain long in a
passion.
My sable attendant, by whom I was taken to the
pantry, assisted by her highness the housekeeper, in
whom I expected to discover a respectable matron of
my own hue, but found only an old mulatto wench,
supplied me with abundance of cold victuals; to
which was, by and by, added a dish or two that had
been removed from the parlour table, after serving
the turn of my honoured master. I sighed as I fell
foul of them; But never mind, quoth I to myself;
this is the last time the vile Captain Brown shall
have such an advantage over me. To-morrow, I cast
off the slough of a slave, and resume the character of
a gentleman. This thought comforted me, and I
made, doubtless, as hearty a meal as Captain Brown
himself did.
My supper finished, I had some hope of being
conducted again to the parlour, where Captain Brown
was enjoying himself over the good cheer of Mr.
Feverage, and telling him, no doubt, a great many
unconscionable stories; but in this I was
disappointed
,
being leftnot to myself, for every minute there
came, at least, one blackamoor visage to the door to
survey the great Magus with looks of superstitious
wonder and fearbut to enjoy my own company in
the pantry for a couple of hours or more. At the
end of this time, there came a blackey, who made
me many signs, which I could not understand, until
he expressed his wishes in an ejaculation of
perplexity
Guy
now! he no talk me, and I no talk him!
How I make dis Injie niggah go up de garret to
bed?
I liked not the epithet Injie niggah, but I made
the Ethiopian happy by understanding his gestures,
and following him up the stairs of the spacious
mansion
(for a spacious one it was, and I wondered to
see it occupied only by Mr. Feverage and his
domestics
,)
to a doleful little garret, where the servant
showed me a blanket stretched upon the floor, and
signified that there lay my bed. This done, he
marched away, carrying the light with him, as if
that were a superfluous luxury for one of my
condition
,
and I got into bed in the dark. And here,
notwithstanding the mortification I felt, I presently
fell sound asleep, and did not awake until rather a
late hour in the morning.
Vol. II.6
CHAPTER VIII.
Robin Day meets an astonishing reverse of fortune, and plays the
Magian on his own account.
I was
called up by the same negro who had
ushered
me to bed, and now motioned me to follow him
down stairs to his master, whom I found no longer
alone, but surrounded by quite a familyhis wife
and childrenwho, it seemed, had been away at a
ball, or other merrymaking, at a neighbouring estate,
and had either just returned, or had arrived late in
the night, while I was sound asleep. I was greatly
abashed to find myself in such good company,
particularly
as two of the children were young women
grown, and extremely handsome and genteel, and
another a young gentleman of nineteen or twenty:
besides these, there were three or four smaller
children
.
Here he comes! cried Mr. Feverage, with
great exultation, as I entered the room: don't
understand
a word of English, but is the most
astonishing
fellow ever brought to America. Never could
have believed in such things, but for the actual
proof; cured lazy Jim of the apoplexy without
physic
;
and as for meAh! my dear Mrs. Feverage
ah! my dear children, he added, pathetically,
you never knew what was the matter with me;
I could not find the heart to tell you any thing so
afflicting;besides I wasn't so sure of it: but the
truth is, it was a palsy beginning in my leg
Ah, lauk! said Mrs. Feverage.Yes, my dear,
quoth Mr. Feverage, a palsy; but the Lord be
thanked, Chowder Chow (for that is his name,)
cleared it out with one single dose of physic, and I
am now free of it for ever. A most surprising
fellow
,
by G!begging your pardon, my dear!
worth his weight in gold.
Dear me! cried one of the Misses Feverage,
who, like the rest, surveyed me with curiosity,
what an ugly, awkward looking wretch it is!
Quite ridiculous, said the other.
All the East Indians, quoth the brother, with
the air of one conscious of superior learning, the
Hindoos, Chinese, and all, are of the Tartar race,
which is a kind of half-man, half-monkey family:
but I don't think the fellow is so ill-looking; only
he looks to me more like a sheep than a
philosopher
.
I don't care one curseI beg your pardon, my
dear!about his looks, quoth Mr. Feverage,
apparently
disturbed (but by no means so deeply as
myself
)
by these disparaging remarks: it is
commonly
the case that your wise people, your men of
genius and learning, your Tullies and Mirabeaus,
your sops, Socrateses, and Alexander Popes, are
born scarecrows: but who thinks the worse of them
for their want of beauty?
Oh, dear! said Miss Feverage senior, I'm
sure he may be wise enough for me; but I thought
all the Oriental people were handsome, like the
princes we read of in the Arabian Nights'
Entertainments
.
I looked round for Captain Brown to help me
out of my difficulties, but he was not present; and
such was my rage and mortification at the
contemptuous
remarks, of which I was the object, but
which, of course, I was not supposed to understand,
that I was rejoiced, notwithstanding my great
repugnance
to the Magian practice, when I heard Mr.
Feverage say he was going to conduct me
immediately
to the hospital, to cure all his sick negroes at
a blow.
But I did not thereby, as I had fondly hoped,
escape from those unamiable young ladies, (for
unamiable
enough they now appeared in my eyes,) in
whose regards I had found so little favour: moved
by curiosity, they, with their mother, brother, and
even the little children, declared they would go
with papa, to witness the miracles I was expected
to perform. Come along, Chowder Chow, said
Mr. Feverage, making me a sign to follow him to
the hospital; which I found was nothing more than
a row of log cabins, though kept pretty clean and
comfortable, among which the sick were distributed.
Here I had no doubt I should find Captain Brown,
whose absence in the parlour had previously caused
me some surprise; but no Captain Brown was there,
nor did he even seem to be expected by any body
but myself. Mr. Feverage took me by the elbow
and marched me up to a form, on which lay a poor
negro man in what I judged was the last stage of
consumption: If he can cure
him
, quoth Mr.
Feverage, with a look of confident expectation, he
can cure any body. So, Chowder Chow, boy, begin
I wish to G!I beg your pardon, my dear!I
knew something of his lingo.
I looked around me again, and with uneasiness,
for Captain Brown; without whose powerful
assistance
and encouraging audacity, I felt no great
confidence
in my Magian abilities.
What is the scoundrel gaping after? quoth Mr.
Feverage, waxing impatient; when, perceiving I
must play my part, whether Brown came or not, I
put on the look of wisdom, and pronounced the
Magian
Holly-golly-wow
.
Hang your
holly-golly-wow
, said Mr.
Feverage
;
why don't you give him the physic?
I
give the physic, indeed! That was the province
of Captain Brown; who, moreover, carried the
Mermaids'
Eggs and Holy Sand of the Ganges in his
own pockets, I not having about me so much as a
single dose.
Holly-golly-wow
, repeated I, in great
perplexity
.
Curse your gibberish, I tell you! reiterated
Mr. Feverage, begging his wife to excuse him for
swearing; it's the physic I want, you numskull
can't you understand me?
Dear me! cried Miss Feverage, junior, how
can he, pa, when he don't understand English? You
should have asked the sailor-man how you were to
do things.
Dn the sailor-manpray, my dear, excuse
me!he told me all about it, said Mr. Feverage,
growing hotter than ever; he told me, all that was
to be done, was to put the staring jackanapes before
the sick man, and that he would cure him in from
seven minutes to seven days, and no mistake about
it.
I was frightened at the violence of my worthy
host, but still more at what he said of Captain
Brown, whoBut could it be? Had he, afraid, as
I might well suppose, of the difficulty of making
good his impudent boasts, afraid of the responsibility
of practice among so many
really
sick persons
had he deserted me, sneaked away, left me to cure
6*
them the best way I could? and cure them, too,
without Mermaids' Eggs or the Holy Sand of the
Ganges? Certainly he hadI could no longer
doubt it; how otherwise was I to understand the
fact of his having instructed Mr. Feverage how he
was to do things, how he was to put the
jackanapes
before the sick man, coupled with his
extraordinary
absence at such a time of need? My
heart died within me to think of his baseness and
duplicity; my blood ran cold, as I thought of the
scrape he had left me in. How was I to get out of
it? But the intemperance of Mr. Feverage left me
little time for reflection; and so I acted upon
instinct.
Holly-golly-wow!
I cried again: then turning
upon Mr. Feverage, before he could vent another
volley of abuse, which I saw him preparing, I
resorted
to the Magian language, (for, of course, I
knew no other,) and demanded, with the looks of
one asking the most important question in the
world,
Willy-whary-gonny-doggy
-Brown?
What is the infernal rascal jabbering about
now?
quoth Mr. Feverage: do you suppose I understand
your diabolical jargon?
Willy-whary-gonny-doggy
-Brown? I
repeated
.
He says
Brown!
cried Miss Feverage; who,
notwithstanding her want of judgment and taste, was
the shrewdest person present: he says
Brown;
and that was the name of the sailor-man: and
perhaps
he is asking for him.
Are you, you baboon! said Feverage: why,
he went off at daylight. But what has that to do
with our business? why don't you physic the sick
man?
Willy-whary-gonny
Holly-golly-wow?
willy
whary-gonny
-Sammy-ram-ram? I again
demanded
,
hoping the gentleman would understand I was
asking for the Magian physic; which, however, he
did not, until I had expended a great deal of
ingenuity
in explanatory gesticulation, and then hit upon
the device of putting my finger into my mouth, by
which I meant physic, and next of turning a pocket
wrongside out, to indicate that I had none.
Miss Feverage again penetrated my meaning; and
nothing could exceed the mingled consternation and
rage of the parent, when the conception first flashed
upon his mind that I had no medicines to administer
to his tenants of the hospital.
Oh! that infernal villain! he cried, that
swindling
Brown! He has gone off with the Mermaids'
Eggs and the Holy Sand of the Ganges! And what
is the doctor good for without them? Bitten,
swindled
,
most atrociously swindled! No wonder the
rascal was willing to trade so reasonably; for what's
the doctor without his physic?
It was now my turn to be struck with
consternation
;
and the reader may judge the horror into
which I was thrown by finding from the expressions
of the gentleman, that Captain Brown, my villanous
confederate, had not merely deserted me, but had
actually
sold me
, sold me as a
slave
, forbut I do
not know what sum it was he got for meto my
present
master, Mr. Fabius Maximus Feverage;
having
also disposed of my nag, which he represented
as being a Tartar pony from some royal stable in the
East Indies.
Yes! it was true!astounding, horrifying as it
was, it was true; the intolerable villain has sold me,
and gone off with the money.
What was the difficulty I had previously lamented,
of being left to play the doctor alone, compared with
this newer and more dreadful dilemma in which I
was now plunged? It was fortunate, perhaps, that
my agitation, which was for a moment inexpressibly
greatand how could it be otherwise?was, in a
manner, lost and unnoticed in the tumult of my
master's
(my master's!) rage; and after that had blown
itself away, and the family could again turn their
eyes upon Chowder Chow, his confusion was most
naturally and charitably attributed to the loss of his
Magian medicines, the infallible Mermaids' Eggs and
the panaceal Holy Sand of the Ganges.
But not a thought, or a care, gave Chowder Chow,
at that moment to his medicines. I had more
important
matters to excruciate my mind; which, at
first overwhelmed by the greatness of my
predicaments
,
was next filled by a whirl of hurrying projects
to escape them.
My first idea was to tell the truthto unlock my
lips, and in plain English, expose the fraud that had
been practised upon Mr. Feverage and my
unfortunate
self, and assert my freedom as a freeman
should.
But alas! my fears (not to give the credit to my
common-sense,) told me, that expedient could only
serve to translate me from the culinary vessel, in
which I may well say I was frying, to the fire
wherein I must suffer the equal pangs of broiling.
To tell the truth, would be to confess myself an
accomplice
in fraud, the confederate of a swindler who
had been cheating the good people of the district
for more than a week; and whether I (to prove that
hard necessity, and not my own will, had forced
me into the reluctant complicity,) should reveal the
cause of my submission, or keep that secret to
myself
,
I must encounter a similar danger;in the one
case, take my chance before a court-martial for high
treason, in the other, before a court-civil for felony.
To tell, moreover, to a man who was already
raging over the loss of the Mermaids' Eggs and the
Holy Sand of the Ganges, a truth which must add
to that the loss of the money he had paid for me,
was, even of itself, an undertaking of highly
questionable
expediency; and when I reflected, that to
the indignation at the loss of his money must be
added the mortification, of having been so grossly
played upon, in the matter of the palsy, I shrank
from the dangers of confession.
No, no, thought I to myself; honesty is
undoubtedly
the best policy in the main; but it won't
do in this case.I have since learned to put
another
interpretation upon the old saw of the
copybooks
,
which is, that honesty is the best policy,
where one wishes to go to heaven; but where
earthly
prosperitythe attainment of wealth, and honour,
and poweris the only thing aimed at, it may be
often very conveniently dispensed with.
What thensince I durst not claim my freedom,
by telling the truthremained for me to do? Must
I remain a slave, because the unparalleled Captain
Brown had thought fit to sell, and the unsuspicious
Mr. Feverage had deemed proper, to buy me for
one? No, by mine honour, I had no idea of
that
.
There were but two ways I could think of, in
which my liberty was to be retrieved; and one
having been considered and rejected, I was
compelled
to place all my reliance upon the other, which
was considered and adopted during that brief period
of agitation which the rage and fury of Mr.
Feverage
gave me leisure to indulge. I resolved to submit
that is, to allow myself to be considered a slave
just so long as I could not help it, and recover my
freedom by running away, at the very first
opportunity
.
And this, all things considered, was
perhaps
the wisest resolution I could have adopted.
But I had been bought as a Magusa dispenser
of life and healthand it was necessary I should
continue to preserve the character. The difficulty
was how I was to do it, being robbed by Captain
Brown of what Mr. Feverage seemed to consider
the most important part of his purchase, the
Mermaids'
Eggs and the Holy Sand of the Ganges.
And this difficulty, which was now the main source
of grief to my master (fortunately, as I could not
speak English, I was not obliged to
call
him so,)
might have continued a long time, had it not been
removed by the sagacity of `young missus,' (I have
less shame in giving her the title, though I shall
never forgive her reflections upon my good looks,)
who said, that if I was a good doctor, my
knowledge
could not certainly be confined to but
two
medicines; and therefore recommended I should
have the family medicine-chest brought me, to see
what I could do with it.
The father caught at the idea; the medicine-chest
was brought; and signs made that I should select
from it such drugs as were suitable to my purpose.
I
select, indeed! My knowledge of the Materia
Medica was somewhat too limited for selection; but
I affected to do so. I tumbled over the bottles of
potions and powders, taking good care to appear not
to read or understand the labels, but to judge of
their qualities by smelling. Some I rejected with
a learned contempt, others with frowns of knowing
detestation; until coming upon a bottle of salts,
thinks I to myself, Salts can't hurt any body,
and was going to administer a dose to my patient,
the consumptive negro, before whose bunk had been
acted the whole of the preliminary play. His ghastly
looks fortunately frightened me into a doubt of the
propriety of giving him such a medicine; and the
same reason deterred me from a dose of calomel and
jalap, which association presented as the next most
natural, because best known remedies; when my
eye fell upon a bottle of laudanum, of which I
immediately
gave the poor fellow a dose, taking care,
as I did so, to look round upon my master with a
melancholy shake of the head, as if to inform him
I had but little confidence in the medicine, and only
gave it because I could find nothing better.
He knows what he is about, after all! said my
master, returning the melancholy shake: he means
to say, poor Joe is beyond all common remedies
(May the devil seize that rascal Brown, for carrying
off the Mermaids' Eggs! for who knows but that
one of them might have cured him?)and that all
that can be done for him is to give him laudanum,
and let him die easy.
Of my next patient, all that I can say, is, that he
was sick, and I did not know what was the matter
with him; but as he was a robust young fellow, I
thought no harm could come of giving him a dose
of salts, which I accordingly administered. And
this prescription had also the merit of meeting my
master's approbation which he expressed by saying,
After all, I believe the rascal is worth the money,
and sees through a disease with a look.What a
pity we had not some of his own Indian medicines!
To the third patient, whose case was as
mysterious
to me as that of the second, and who appeared
to be neither particularly strong nor particularly
weak, I ventured to administer a little calomel and
jalap; upon which my master observed, My
practice
was just like that of the regular physicians: it
was plain there was no quackery about me; and
he ended by a hearty execration upon Brown for
not leaving some of the Holy Sand of the Ganges,
which was undoubtedly of greater efficacy than all
the regular physic in his drug-box.
In short, (for I have no design to record my
experimental
essays upon the lives of all the sick in
the hospital,) I went through my task the best way
I could; and my hap-hazard practice quite contented
my master, who seemed, since I had no Magian
medicines to administer, not to expect any very
miraculous cures of me; and I heard him afterwards
assure his wife, who, with all her children had left
the hospital as soon as they found I was to do
nothing astonishing, that he believed he would
have his money's worth of me, as I would save him
two or three hundred dollars a year in doctors' bills;
but he never would forgive that cursed sailor-man,
Brown, (begging her pardon,) for having cheated
him out of the Mermaids' Eggs.
CHAPTER IX.
Robin Day escapes from slavery, is chased by a bloody-minded
pursuer, and relieved by an unexpected friend.
The
extraordinary fatality which had attended all
my previous efforts to escape from the different
misfortunes
that had befallen me, plunging me only
from one difficulty into another, had now taught me
a lesson of prudence; and I resolved, this time, to
act with the greatest circumspection, and arrange
such a plan of escape as should, besides most certainly
restoring me to freedom, result in as few
inconvenient
consequences as possible. To run away, I
perceived
,
was not of itself sufficient to secure my
liberty; the fugitive slave always expects pursuit;
and from my uncommon value, it was but reasonable
to suppose my master would take uncommon pains
to recover me. It was necessary I should make
myself
acquainted with the country through which I
was to fly, so as to decide upon a route the most
advantageous for my purpose; it was necessary to
anticipate every possible danger that might arise, and
the means of avoiding it:in short, it was necessary,
to think, and do, a great many things; none of which
could be thought, or done, in a moment.
While arranging these indispensable preliminaries,
I submittedor seemed to submitwith great
gravity
and resignation, to my lot of servitude, and
Vol. II.7
played the part of the Indian doctor to perfection.
The servitude itself was no great matter, and but for
the name would have been nothing, since my learned
character, and perhaps my complexion, which
favourably
distinguished me from the sons of Africa,
(and which, by the way, I was obliged to renew
every day,) prevented my receiving the treatment of
a common blackey. Without being flattered by any
particular marks of respect, I was neither kicked nor
cuffed; and I had the happiness of not being
compelled
to any kind of slavish occupations. It is true,
I heard my master once talk of making me wait at
table; but he came to the conclusion that I was unfit
for such service, while incapable of understanding a
word of English.
My only business was to physic the sick, to attend
upon the hospital, where I spent nearly all my time,
as much to deceive Mr. Feverage with an
appearance
of zeal, as to keep out of the sight of his family.
What good I did the patients I am not yet learned
enough in the medical art to say; but I physicked
away at them with the best intentions. All that is
certain is, that some died and some got well; but
whether I killed the former, or cured the latter, I
was not so sure, even at the time of practice. And,
indeed, I did not trouble myself greatly to inquire,
or to think upon the subject: my mind was, all the
time, engaged with the thought of escape.
As in most sudden transformations of character,
or changes of conduct, one commonly jumps into
extremes; so it happened with me upon this unlucky
occasion. I was determined, as I have said, to act,
in my project of escape, with the utmost prudence
and circumspection; and so prudently and
circumspectly
I
did
act, that I was like never to have put
my project into execution. To provide against
difficulties
and dangers, it was necessary to anticipate all
that could happen: and I anticipated so many that I
was almost afraid to encounter them. My
imagination
,
as I dwelt upon them, drew them in such
formidable
colours as frightened herself: and the
enterprise
looked daily more doubtful and dreadful. I
trembled, faltered, vacillated, and the beginning of
the seventh week from the desertion of Captain
Brown found me, to my own astonishment and
affliction
,
still a slave. And it is not improbable I might
have consumed still seven weeks longer in hesitation,
had not a circumstance arisen, which frighted me
out of fear, and desperately nerved me to action.
This was nothing less than a project my master
suddenly
formed of selling mefor, I believe he was
now tired of his bargain, being a fickle-minded man
to a Carolina planter, who had a higher opinion of
my abilities, or greater need of my services. The
subject was freely discussed in my presence (who
was still ignorant of the English languageand,
truly, that same ignorance caused me to hear a great
many conversations I should not otherwise have been
made privy to,) in the hospital, whither my master
brought the purchaser, to examine me and my
proceedings
among the sick.
The effect of their discussion upon my mind did
not tend, I fear, to the benefit of my patients; for
such was the consternation into which I was thrown,
that I, from that moment, began to lay about me
among the sick with a maniacal activity and
forgetfulness
of consequences; which, however, only
recommended
me more strongly to the stranger's regard:
he observed I was a bold practitioner, and knew
how to treat negro constitutions. He then, with
Mr. Feverage, left the hospital, the one agreeing to
purchase, the other to sell, the only subject of
controversy
being the price, which I had no doubt they
would soon agree upon.
It was then late in the afternoon, and they
adjourned
from the hospital to supper; after which, I heard
Mr. Feverage say, we will be able to settle the
matter
to our mutual satisfaction.You may settle it
to your satisfaction, quoth I to myself; but I
doubt whether either will be so well satisfied in
the morning. In truth, I resolved to run away that
very night.
I stole back to the house, and into the housekeeper's
room, where my presence never caused any surprise,
as, indeed, the medicine-chest was kept there, to which
I had, of course, continual access; and the yellow
lady, the mistress of the place, had accommodated
me with a little table in the corner, where I used to
measure out, and sometimes compound, (for I grew
bold with practice,) the drugs that so insufficiently
supplied the place of the Magian medicines. I
entered
the room for no other purpose than to fill my
pockets with food to sustain me in the flight; but
the housekeeper being there at the time, engaged
making a pot of chocolate, I was obliged to conceal
my object, and pretend to busy myself with the
medicine-chest
.
While I was thus occupied tumbling the drugs
about, the housekeeper stepped for a moment out of
the room; when the devil (for I know not how else
to account for the desperate prompting,) put it into
my head, that, as nothing would more certainly
facilitate
my escape than the soundest slumber on the
part of every member of the family, including also
my intended purchaser, so nothing would more
manifestly secure them a sound nap than a dose of
opium thrown into their chocolate.
This brilliant idea was no sooner formed than put
into execution; and without thinking, (for, verily, I
had no time to think,) of the consequences that
might result, I snatched up a huge mass of the
narcotic
,
enough to physic the whole household, and
with trembling hand tumbled it into the pot. In
another instant the housekeeper returned, gave her
chocolate the finishing stir, and carried it off into
the parlour. I took advantage of her second sortie
to gather up a hasty supply of eatables; and then
retreated to my medicine-chest again, to await the
period of my own supper, which I thought it
necessary
to take, to avoid suspicion; for I had planned
to begin my flight in the dead of night, after a
pretence
of going to bed: and Chowder Chow, with all
his bothers and afflictions, never went to bed in Mr.
Feverage's house without his supper.
But by and by, there arose a great scolding in the
parlour; and I could hear my master and his family
finding fault with the chocolate, declaring that it had
a very odd and unaccountable taste; and her
ladyship
the housekeeper was forthwith summoned to
the room to explain the mystery.
I was terribly frightened at this unexpected turn
of affairs; and scarce doubting but that the inquiry
thus instituted must result in a discovery of the
liberty I had taken, I saw no hope but in immediate
flight. I slipped from the pantry and the back
door, and fled through the fields to a wood not far
off, which I reached without difficulty or notice, it
being then almost dark.
One of the chief, and, as I esteemed it, most
necessary
preparations for escape consisted in the study
of a large state map of Virginia, which my master
had hanging up in the hall or main passage of his
house, where I had many opportunities of viewing
it unobserved. And I pored over it so often and
7*
long, that I had fairly committed to memory all the
roads, rivers, towns and mountains in that part of
the state through which I designed to fly; nay, I
had even taken the pains to construct in secret a
little rude but sufficient map of my own, on which
I could better rely than on my memory alone. My
course I had long determined should be westward,
towards the interior; which I flattered myself would
be precisely the direction in which no fugitive slave
would be believed to bend his steps. In that quarter,
I should soon reach the mountains, among which, in
case of extremity, I might find hiding places and
rocks of safety in abundance; and, following among
their sequestered valleys, or along their wild
ridges, I must soon penetrate to the great West,
whose name associated the most agreeable ideas of
freedom and independence.
My course thus resolved upon, a map of the
country in my head, and an itinerary in my pocket,
I struck boldly through the woods, seeking for a road,
which, I knew, led to a ferry over the Roanoke,
some seven or eight miles from Mr. Feverage's
house. The road I found, and the ferry also; where
not having the courage to call the ferryman to my
assistance, I helped myself to a canoe, which I
discovered
on the bank, and paddled across the river.
The bank being gained, I immediately removed
from my person every vestige of my late Magian
character and servitude. The vile complexion,
which I had been compelled daily to renew, to avoid
detection, I washed away in the river; into which I
also threw the detestable bandanna and the horrid
yarns that bound my hair. Then, drawing my cap
from its concealment in my pocket, to be remounted
upon my head, and securing the canoe, so that the
owner could get it again if he pleased, I resumed
my steps, walking with such diligence and speed,
that, if my map was to be relied on, I had by
morning
put at least thirty miles between me and my
master's house.
And this was exactly what I had calculated upon,
in my plan of escape; I had always esteemed it a
matter of the first necessity to get over the greatest
possible distance the first night; and thirty miles
was just what I assigned myself, besides thirty more
to be accomplished during the day.
Unfortunately, however, in thus calculating the
distance, I forgot to calculate the strength necessary
to carry me through it, as I soon discovered to my
cost; for I had scarce congratulated myself upon having
done so much, when I found I was unable to do any
more. I was, in a word, completely exhausted, worn
out, knocked up, incapable of proceeding further,
compelled to come to a stand, when every moment
of delay, I knew, was big with danger. The
inactive
life of Chowder Chow had melted away the
strength of Robin Day; and, besides, Robin Day had
overtasked his powers.
I sat down upon a stump on the roadside, to draw
breath, and consider what was to be done; and I had
just come to the conclusion I could do nothing better
than hunt up some hiding-place in the woods, and there
sleep till night, at which period I hoped to be able
to continue my journey; when I perceived a
traveller
,
in a military garb, come riding up from behind
on a sorrel horse.
I had no particular reason to apprehend a pursuer
in the person of a gentleman of the army, regular or
militia; but I held it most for my interest at that
time to avoid the observation of all persons. I
therefore
rose from my stump, and slipped aside into the
wood, hoping I had escaped the stranger's notice.
But I was mistaken; and as he rode up, he uttered a
loud halloo, and turned into the wood after me; at
which I was thrown into such a panic that I forgot
my fatigue, and immediately took to my heels to
bury myself among the trees and bushes. But, alas,
the stranger instantly spurred after me, ordering me
to stop, to surrender, and I knew not what; but I
only ran the faster; at which, growing furious, he
pulled out a pistol and fired at me, and then let fly
another
;
and ended by drawing a long sword, with
which, being now close at my heels, he offered to cut
me down; so that I was fain to come to an immediate
halt, and beg for mercy. What was my amazement
what my joy, when, turning round, and looking into
the face of my bloody-thirsty pursuer, I perceived
the features of my friend Dicky Dare!
CHAPTER X.
In which Robin retrieves his reputation in the opinion of Dicky
Dare, and is restored to the friendship of that heroic adventurer.
Oh
, Dicky! cried I, do you mean to murder
me?a question for which there was good reason,
as my martial friend was in a towering passion, and
still brandished his cut-and-thrust about my ears, as
if half of a mind to carve me to pieces.
Robin Day! quoth he, in equal astonishment:
may I never smell gunpowder, by Julius Csar, if
I didn't think you were some flying jailbird of a
prisoner of war, or a rascal broke loose from a county
prison, or some such rabblement stuffto run away
in such a cowardly style, when I only wanted to ask
about the road! But I say, by Julius Csar, what are
you doing here?
It was some time before I could reply to the
question
,
so great was the ferment of joy into which I
was thrown by this happy encounter; for in the
presence
of Dicky I saw a release from every affliction,
a protection from every danger.
Oh, Dicky, said I, fate has sent you here to
help me out of the greatest difficultyas great an
one perhaps as that you saved me from, when I was
taken prisoner by that caitiff, Duck, and accused of
high-treason. I shall never forget your kindness,
that time, in saving me from a court-martial.
Sir, said Dicky, in a lofty way, that was in
memory of our old friendship; but I beg you to
observe that I am not to be called upon to interpose
in your favour, under such circumstances, a second
time. Friendship, sir, is one thing; but honour,
sir, by Julius Csar, honour is another.
Yes, said I, Dicky, it is: but I hope you
don't regret saving me from being shot or hanged?
I'm sure I would have done as much for you.
Oh, said Dicky, as it turned out, I don't
think they would have altogether made it out so
bad a case for you at the court-martial; because that
rascal Duck that accused you, was a traitor himself.
Yes, said I, he was; he piloted the British
up and down the Bay, to all the towns.
Exactly so, said Dicky; the prisoners we
took informed against him; and in less than an hour
after you were gone, we had the dog arrested, to
stand his trial; and I believe they hanged him, or
intended to do so.
I hope so, said I, devoutly. And as for
my
being a traitor, I think I can prove to your
satisfaction
I was a very innocent one.
If you can, by Julius Csar, said Dicky Dare,
with generous impetuosity, I shall shake hands
with you, and be very good friends with you;
though, sir, I'll be hanged if I think as much of your
spunk as I used to do.
Oh, said I, I can explain that too.
Very well, said Dicky; you can explain
along the road, and no time lost, as we go to
breakfast
;
for I understand, there's a tavern only two or
three miles ahead, where we can eat; and, by Julius
Csar I'm hungry.
I told him I was too tired, having been on foot
all the night, and must have a little rest.
And with that, I invited him to dismount and tie
his horse, and take a seat by me on a log; and, to
show him he need not concern himself about his
breakfast, I instantly produced a store of cold
chicken-legs and other dainties from my pocket,
which I invited him to share with me.
A soldier, quoth Dicky Dare, can ask no
better
breakfast, or place to eat it. I remember, dad
told me that General Marion used to dine off a log
in a swamp, and feed on parched corn and sweet
potatoes.
And so saying, the young soldier dismounted,
unbitted his nag, who straightway fell to work upon
the young twigs and bushes around: while his
master
,
with equal appetite, addressed himself to the
nobler provender drawn from the larder of Mr.
Feverage.
During the meal, I acquainted him with all my
adventures from the time of our separation on the
highway, up to the moment of our second parting
on the field of battle; upon all which, as well as
upon my conduct in them, he commented in a very
free and characteristic way. He expressed great
contempt of my pusillanimity in allowing myself to
be seized by the wagoners, and contrasted with it
his own courageous and successful resistance of those
zealous thief-takers, of which I was now informed
for the first time. He highly commended the
address
and spirit of Captain Brown in shuffling the
change of robbery upon my shoulders, and then
riding
off with my horse; an act, he averred, I should,
and easily might have prevented by blowing his
brains out. My further adventures with Captain
Brown, he considered very extraordinary, as, indeed,
I did myself, both from the audacity of Captain
Brown and my own stupidity in allowing myself
to be so easily imposed upon. But when I came to
inform him how I had mistaken the British sailors
for American militia-men, without perceiving the
error until charging with them against my own
countrymen, and how I had pretended to volunteer
in their service, only to secure an opportunity of
escape, his surprise was only exceeded by his
indignation
.
He swore by Julius Csar, seven times
over, I was the biggest ninny in warlike matters,
and, he believed, in all others, the world had ever
produceda compliment which I took without
offence
;
for I was, in truth, so happy to fall in with
him, and so deeply persuaded of the superiority of
his genius, that I could have borne even much more
disparagement without repining. Besides, I was
more than half persuaded he charged nothing more
than was true.
Then followed my final adventure with Captain
Brown, the story of the disguise and the Magian
medicines; at which, for the first time (for Dicky
had put on the gravity of the soldier,) he indulged
in a violent fit of laughter, and swore, by Julius
Csar, that Brown was a comical dog, and that I,
in the part of a quack doctor, had hit upon a
character
the best suited to my genius; because, said
he, by Julius Csar, I'll be hanged if you'll ever
make a soldier.
Last of all came that climax of wonder and
atrocity, my being sold to slavery; at which Dicky,
giving the reins to his mirth, laughed with such
furious energy, that the sorrel nag, who had strayed
away some little distance, browsing, came trotting
and whinnying back, as if to know what was the
matter. Nor was he less diverted at my escape, and
the incidents attending it, especially that of the
chocolate pot; though he immediately threw me into
a panic by asking, if it had not occurred to me,
that, in thus drugging it, I might possibly have
murdered
some of my master's family? or, at the very
least, might bring myself under a charge of an
intention
to murder them?
It was now Dicky's turn to relate his adventures,
in which there was nothing near so remarkable as
in mine. He had reached Philadelphia in safety,
where, having the good fortune to receive a letter
from his father, with a further supply of money, and
being no longer able to resist the inclination to put
on a soldier's coat along with the soldier's spirit, he
ordered a military suit; and when it was completed,
left the city, and (as Mr. John Dabs had truly
informed
me,) left it only a day before myself. He
had spurred for the theatre of war, but in vain
sought an opportunity of measuring his sword with
the enemy, until his good fortune carried him to
Norfolk, in time to assist its brave defenders in
repelling
the invaders from their shores. His
company
consisted only of some score idlers and
tatterdemalions
,
supernumeraries and volunteers in that
particular
battle, who, collecting in a hurry, and having
no commander of their own, had willingly accepted
the martial-looking Dicky for their leader. He had
received a wound, a scratch in the leg, of which he
was uncertain whether it was owing to a British
bullet, or to a tumble he had had over a stump, in
the fury of the charge; nevertheless, he prided
himself
on it, as being the first hurt received in the wars.
This battle began and ended Dicky's campaigns in
Virginia; for, saving the horrible affair at Hampton,
three days after, at which he was not present,
nothing more was done by the enemy to afford him
an opportunity to display his valour; and, soon after,
Vol. II.8
the British fleet deserted the waters of the
Chesapeake
entirely.
Dicky, I found, was now on his way to the
southwest
.
Troubles were brewing, he said, on the
Indian border; and wise men looked soon to see the
chief theatre of war transferred to the delta of the
Mississippi. In either case, he observed there
would be plenty of fighting; and where there's
plenty of fighting, said my heroic friend, gnawing
the last morsel from a chicken-bone, there, sir, by
Julius Csar, there is the place for me.
I told him at once, I would go along with him,
and fight the battles of my country at his side; upon
which there arose a controversy between us, he
assuring
me he thought I was too big a coward for a
soldier, and I insisting, with heat, that I had as much
courage as he; for, he knew, I had as good as
trounced him a dozen times at school.
I don't know any such thing, said Dicky Dare;
though I allow, you always fought me spunky.
But this fighting a school-fight, and this fighting the
battles of your countryby Julius Csar, they are
quite different matters. There are some fellows that
have great pluck for a war of fisticuffs, and will stand
hammering like old iron; but when you put them
before the muzzle of a musket, with a man's finger
at the triggeror a park of artillery, with the
matches
all smokingor a squadron of horse drawn up
ready for chargingwhy then, by Julius Csar,
these fisticuff bulldogs are exactly the fellows to fall
all of a tremble, and run off like so many rats before
a bull-terrier. It's the seeing one's blood flow, and
feeling the pain of a wound, that tries what stuff one's
liver is made of. As for me, sir, by Julius Csar,
I have had an enemy's bullet through the leg,
without
minding it!
Or you scratched it over a stump, as you
admitted
of your own accord was probable, said I. And
if you come to that, I have had a severer wound
than you; for I was knocked on the head with the
butt of an Irishman's musket, which broke my head
open, and I was laid up six weeks by it in the
doctor's
hands.
I allow, said Dicky Dare, you have had the
hardest knock: but how did you take it? there's the
question.
I took it I don't know how, said I, for it
knocked me out of my senses; but all the sailors said
I was as brave as a lion. And besides, if you come
to that, you have been in action but once; whereas
I have been three times in battle.
But how did you go into battle? demanded
Dicky: did you feel proud, and happy, and furious,
and all that?
No, said I; I felt uneasy.
To be sure you did! said Dicky, with disdain;
and that's not the way a brave man feels.
I have no doubt, said I, I should have felt
proud, and happy, and furious, and all that, had I
been on the right side; but, I fancy, if you had been,
like me, fighting against your country,
you
would
have felt uneasy too.
And so I should, said the soldier, with generous
frankness; I forgot you were fighting against your
country; which must make even a brave man a
coward
.
But, I say, Robin, he added, by Julius
Csar! you were so terribly frightened at all these
other mattersso frightened about roasting that old
tyrant, M'Gogginfrightened at Brown and the
wagonersfrightened at Mr. Bloodmoney
frightened
at John Dabs, the constablefrightened when
we took you prisonerfrightened when you were
sold a slaveand, by Julius Csar, you are so
frightened
now
that you have run away! I say, by Julius
Csar, I don't think a fellow that gets frightened so
often, can have the true grit in him, after all.
Oh, said I, Dicky, fear in such cases is not
cowardice. Every man is afraid of getting into the
hands of the lawof being put into prison, tried for
felony, and perhaps brought to the gallows. In all
these cases, you must see, I had the dangers of the
law behind me. With the wagoners and John Dabs,
I was in fear of being carried back to our town to be
hanged for murder; with Mr. Bloodmoney, of being
imprisoned for house breaking; and, to skip all
other matters, here I am now in fear of being pursued
as a runaway slave, or laid up by the heels for a
swindler.
By Julius Csar, that
does
alter the case, said
my friend; for I recollect, when I left our town,
I was afraid, myself, of having the constables after
me: though, I tell you what, he added, with a grim
look of fortitude, before they should have taken me,
there would have been a fight, and some body's
brains blown out, by Julius Csar.
My ingenious defence, by which I was half
convinced
myself, satisfied the valorous Dicky that I
was yet worthy of his friendship; whereupon he
gave me his hand, and said I should follow him to
the wars. He bade me discharge from my mind all
fear of Mr. Feverage and his emissaries; for, said he,
if the worst comes, we can fight them off, by Julius
Csar. He then asked how I was off for money;
and being assured I had, in all my troubles, held fast
to my pocket book, he expressed great satisfaction;
for, said he, you can now buy a horse and arms,
and so travel onwards like a soldier. And
thereupon
he bade me for the future cease calling him
Dicky, like a great schoolboy, and desired I would
address him as
Captain
Dare; because why, by
Julius
Csar, he had on a captain's uniform; and every
body was a captain in Virginia.
Inspired by the presence of my martial friend,
and refreshed by the meal, I now professed myself
able to resume the march; Dicky very generously
offering me his horse, till more thoroughly rested,
which, however, I refused. He, therefore, mounted
the saddle himself; and I walking at his side, we left
the wood and returned to the highway.
8*
CHAPTER XI.
Robin Day and his commander, Captain Dare, set out again for the
wars, and win a great victory along the way; in which, as is
usual, all the honour and profit fall to the commander's share.
We
arrived in a short time at the tavern where
Dickyor, to give him his desired title, Captain
Darehad expected to take his breakfast; and where
he now for a moderate sum succeeded in purchasing
me a poney that would serve my turn; though he
he was but a sorry nag after all. And having again
set out on our journey, Captain Dare proposed I
should give him, as was proper for a soldier's
charger
,
some handsome name; informing me, at the
same time, that he called his sorrel steed
Bucephalus
,
after the war-horse of Alexander the Great. I
proposed dubbing mine Hard-Back, which I
considered
expressive of one of his most striking qualities;
but Dicky demurred, insisting that that was a vulgar
and unmilitary title; and I agreeing, at last, he might
bestow upon him what title he pleased, he named him
Pegasus; which, he said, was the name of the
horse ridden by the great general Perseus, when he
slew the Centaurs. Without venturing a hint to
Pegasus's godfather, that his classic reminiscences
were none of the most accurate, and that the steed of
the Muses was dishonoured by carrying such an
insignificant
and unpoetic personage as I, I accepted
the name; and Bucephalus and Pegasus pricked
forward
with their riders in peace.
We reached, and dined, that day, at a village,
where Captain Dicky, who took the charge, though
not the cost, of equipping me into his own hands,
bought me a rifle, (which, he said, was the
properest
weapon for a soldier going to fight the Indians,)
with a powder horn, scalping knife, and other
articles
appropriate to a backwoodsman; and I adding,
at my own instance, a hunting frock of light summer
stuff, a brace of cotton checked shirts, and some other
articles of apparel of which I was in want, I was
presently trigged out to my own satisfaction, as well
as Captain Dare's.
And now our journey was commenced in earnest,
and continued during a space of more than two
weeks, with all the zeal to be expected of two such
gallant adventurers, and with as much speed as the
nature of the country, which was full of savage
mountains, and the strength of Bucephalus and
Pegasus, who rivalled one another in laziness, would
permit. And during all that time, such was the
lenity of our fortunes, we met not a single
adventure
worth recording; though I must confess to a
fright I received by stumbling, at a village inn, upon
a newspaper, in which, under the caption of Stop
the Villain, was an advertisement, subscribed by
my late master, Mr. Fabius Maximus Feverage,
offering a reward for the capture of the slave,
Chowder Chow, who had absconded, after an
atrocious
attempt to poison his master's family with
opium. But the terror was only momentary: I was
growing valiant under the countenance of my valiant
friend; and, once parted from, and out of sight of
the inn that contained the detestable paper, I
declared
that Mr. Fabius Maximus Feverage, with his
advertisement, might go toa certain personage
who shall be nameless, and snapped my fingers in
token of my disdain.
The end of the second week of our travels, saw
us upon the frontiers of Tennessee; and we had
scarce crossed them when we discovered that we
were already upon the eve of great adventures.
News had just reached this secluded district of the
commencement of that Indian war, which my
comrade
and captain had so confidently anticipatedof
the horrible catastrophe, the Massacre at Fort
Mimms on the Alabama River, by which it was
opened, and in which, as is well known, more than
four hundred human beings, half of them women
and children, the families of poor settlers, fell under
the Creek tomahawk at a blow.
This dreadful intelligence, spreading fast among
the inhabitants of this wild mountain country, had
created the greatest excitement among them. Some,
the young and manly, burned with fury, and swore
they were only waiting the movements of the
proper
authorities, the proclamation of their governor
and the commands of their military leaders, of
which they were in daily expectation, to snatch
their arms, march upon the bloodthirsty barbarians,
and sweep them from the face of the earth. Others,
again, were in a horrible panic on their own account;
for though the Creeks were afar off, the Cherokees
were their near neighbours, and might be upon
them, murdering and destroying, at any moment.
It is true, the Cherokees were then, as they had been
for many years, and, in fact, continued during the
whole of the ensuing war, the friends of the whites;
but they were Indians; and, in the logic of fear,
nothing was more natural than to suppose they
would join their red brethren in the contest.
The further we advanced, the greater seemed the
ferment, which was attended, and augmented, by
rumours of the most portentous character. It was
now reported, that the savages, uniting in
innumerable
hordes, had destroyed the great city of New
Orleans, and roasted all the sugar-planters in their
own boilers; and that they were, besides, marching
upon the capital of Tennessee, with the fairest
prospect
of carrying off the scalps of the whole body of
Legislators, then in conclave; and now there was a
cry that the Cherokees had taken up the hatchet, and
were already killing and burning in their own
neighbourhood
.
In short, the excitement was prodigious,
and it extended to Captain Dare and his follower;
exhibiting, in the one, that warlike fury which
distinguished
the bolder portion of society, and in the
other, I am ashamed to say, a little of the panic that
marked the less heroic division.
But what may not a great military genius effect
even upon the worst of materials? The fervour of
Captain Dare dissipated the doubts and uneasiness
of my mind; I caught a spark of his ambition; and
was infected with the audacity of spirit which
contemned
danger, derided wounds, and thought of
battle only as the stepping stone to victory and
renown
.
Hot for the conflict, we spurredor rather,
Dicky spurred, and I pommelled with my heels, for
I had no spurs,the snorting Bucephalus and the
grunting Pegasus, (for Pegasus was broken-winded,)
to hasten our approach to the theatre of war; and
along the way, we devised a hundred stratagems by
which the enemy was to be defeated, and ourselves
raised to the pinnacle of fame. Dicky talked strongly
of raising a companynay, his thoughts sometimes
rose to a regimentof mounted riflemen, along the
way; which, received (as, considering the urgency
of the occasion, he had no doubt it would be,) into
the service of the United States, would secure him
at once a commission, and that power and
consideration
among men of the steel, of which he was so
ambitious. He even made attempts to persuade
several valiant persons we met at the inns and
farmhouses
,
where we stopped to bait or sleep, to follow
his banner to the wars; but the hurry of our progress,
which left no time for persuasion, interfered with
his success; not to speak of the disinclination of even
the bravest and most patriotic to go a soldiering
under
a commander whom they had never seen before,
who bore no commission either from state or
national
government, and whose military chest did
not allow of any bounty beyond a glass of grog.
But fate, which had created Dicky for a leader,
willed that he should have a command,
notwithstanding
,
and that he should achieve it by his own
valour.
It happened, one day about noon, as we were
pricking
along the road, that, at a solitary place at the
bottom of a hill, we stumbled suddenly upon a
company
of volunteers, who had that morning, in such
a fit of warlike enthusiasm as inflamed Dicky Dare
and myself, set out from their native village, some
fifteen or twenty miles off, intending to offer their
services to the commanding general of the district,
and who, their dinner hour having arrived, had
halted, like veterans, to discuss their bacon and
homminy upon the road, disdaining to seek the
ordinary
luxuries of shelter. They had halted like
veterans, but they had not troubled themselves to
form a camp, or establish sentinels, or do any thing
else in a veteran-like manner. On the contrary,
they were scattered about in a very disorderly
harum-scarum
way, divided into groups, which were
so distributed that, when we came in view, there
were only four persons of the whole company to be
seen, and these sitting around a fire, where they
were broiling their dinner, and enjoying
themselves
.
I know not whether it was on account of their
hunting-shirts, which they had newly bedizened
for the wars with coloured tapes and fringes, or for
whatever other reason; but no sooner had the
valiant Dicky caught sight of them, than he swore
by Julius Csar they were Indians, and therefore
enemies; and proposed, as they were only four in
number, that we should make war upon them;
for, said he, with a tremendous look of slaughter,
we can take them by surprise, and shoot down
three at the first crackyou, one with your rifle, I
two with my pistols; and then charge upon them;
and I answer for the other fellow with my sabre;
for so he called the cut-and-thrust.
I cannot say I had the greatest appetite for such
an encounter, and, indeed, my natural impulse was
to turn Pegasus the other way, and beat an instant
retreat. But the fire of Dicky prevailed over my
hesitation; and following him into the wood, that
we might approach the enemy unobserved, we
succeeded
in reaching within a hundred paces of them;
at which distance we let fly our fire-arms, and then
charged upon them at full speed.
Who can calculate the effects of resolution? The
surprise, the terrible volley, (by which, however,
no one was harmed,) and our furious charge, secured
us an immediate victory. The four enemies started
to their feet, and, marvellous to be said, a score more to
the back of them; who, leaping into view from among
the bushes which had concealed them from our sight,
fled away, with yells of astonishment and terror;
some jumping upon their horses, which were
haltered
round a tree, others flying on foot, but all doing
their best to escape the danger that had so suddenly
fallen upon them. The route was irretrievable, the
victory complete; but just as we had effected it, we
made the discovery that our supposed Indians were
all white men; and they making the same discovery
in regard to us, whom they had taken for a band of
five hundred Cherokees just bursting into war, they
returned to their campat least, the majority of
them did, the others having continued their flight
all the way back to their native villageburning
with shame and rage; and for a few moments, I
thought they would have murdered Dicky and me,
so much did they take to heart our bloody-minded
assault, and their own disgraceful retreat.
But a revulsion soon took place in their feelings;
they admired the surprising courage of their
conqueror
,
who could rush into battle so regardless of
odds, and his handsome uniform won their hearts;
and when, after a little explanation, they found that
Dicky was a volunteer for the Indian Wars, like
themselves, and that he was fresh from the battle
fields of Virginiathat he had seen the red-coats
and fought themay, and beat them toothey fell
into a rapture, and immediately offered to elect him
their captain, which they were the more able to do,
as their own commander, the first to fly, had now
entirely disappeared, and was never more heard of.
To this proposal, there was but one dissenting voice,
that of the first lieutenant of the company, who
insisted upon his right to succeed to the command.
But his obstinacy was immediately overcome by
one of the company, who, indignant that an officer
of volunteers should presume to oppose the will of
his followers, fell foul of him and gave him a
tremendous
drubbing; whereupon he threw up his
commission in disgust, and mounting his horse,
followed
after his runaway superior.
I had, on my part, some hopes of being preferred
to this second vacant office, as I also had seen the
redcoats, and fought among them, as well as Captain
Dare, though, to be sure, not on the same side; but
as I had no handsome uniform, as I had not perhaps
preserved quite so bold a front as Dicky, at the
moment when the enraged warriors were upon the
point of blowing our brains out, and, above all, as I
had not the same good luck as my companion, I was
destined to be disappointed. The lieutenant's seat
was filled by the intrepid fellow who had just
flogged
him out of it; and I, finding I could do nothing
better, was content to be admitted a private member
of the band, of which Dicky Dare was unanimously
elected captain.
Vol. II.9
CHAPTER XII.
The Bloody Volunteers arrive at the field of battle, and acquire
distinction under the command of Captain Dare.
This
important business finished, and order
restored
,
we proceeded to despatch the dinner we had
interrupted, and soon after resumed the march,
Captain
Dicky Dare riding in great state at the head of
his company; which, originally got up in the hurry
and enthusiasm of the moment, had never numbered
more than twenty-seven men, and was now reduced
to nineteen, including Captain Dare and myself.
But Captain Dare, before he reached the battle-field,
had, by dint of energy and eloquence, managed to
increase its numbers by the addition of some ten or
a dozen ambitious lads, whom he, at different times,
seduced to join his standard.
In truth, the Bloody Volunteersfor such was
the sounding name the company had assumed, even
at the startinghad sealed their own good fortune
in electing Dicky Dare their commander. His
courage and great experience in warfor the victory
at Craney Island was, in their apprehension,
equivalent
to a whole life of battleinspired them with a
fortitude akin to his own; while his heroic bearing
at their head, and especially his address in providing
supplies, and ministering to their wants on the road,
prodigiously increased his popularity.
The dinner on the road-side had pretty well
exhausted
the rations laid in by the Bloody Volunteers;
who, forming a sort of
guerilla
or independent troop,
attached to no particular regiment of their district,
and acting without any authority, began to be
doubtful
,
as the supper hour drew nigh, in what manner,
and at whose expense, the needful provender was to
be obtained; and these doubts became the more
distressing
,
when an unpatriotic tavern-keeper on the
road-side, at whose house we sought refreshment,
swore, he would be hanged if there was a man of us
should have supper, without paying for it.
Captain Dare solved the difficulty in a moment,
by ordering a file of men into the pig-pen, where
they slew a pig and a dozen chickens, and then by
taking military possession of the kitchen, where the
spoils were prepared for supper. Another file was
despatched to the barn, to find quarters and
provender
for our chargers.
In short, Captain Dare acted as if he knew what
he was about; to prove which, next morning, having
first given me to understand that he appointed me
his military secretary, he bade me draw out a bill
against the Treasury of the United States in favour
of Mr. Tobias Small, the innkeeper, for the pig,
chickens, horse-meat, and night's lodging of the
company, which I did; and he immediately
appended
the important order,Treasury of the United
States, pay the above,signed Richard Dare,
Capt. of the Bloody Volunteers of Tennessee, now
in service of the United States, and handed it over
to Mr. Tobias Small, with a magnificentThere,
you dog! there's an order upon the government:
send it to the Treasury and get your money!
Our breakfast was paid for with a similar order;
and so was our dinner, but with this difference, that
the order was now addressed to the Treasurer of
the Commonwealth of Tennessee; because we had
learned from a mail-courier on the road, that the
governor of the State had at length issued his
proclamation
,
calling out the militia, and empowering
the commanding officers of the state army to receive
and enroll all the mounted riflemen who might offer
their patriotic services;news vastly relished by
the Bloody Volunteers and their warlike captain.
With a sovereign state to back us, there were no
longer difficulties to hinder us on the march; and in
a few days more, we arrived at the town of
Knoxville
,
the head quarters of the general in chief of the
Eastern District of Tennessee; where the Bloody
Volunteers were immediately received into the
service
of the state, and incorporated with a regiment
of mounted men; all as ardent and bloody-minded
as ourselves. And here we remained a short time,
until all the forces of the division required for the
war were mustered; after which, we took up the
line of march for the Indian country.
This period of restbut rest not to uswas, I
may say, the beginning of the campaign to the
Bloody Volunteers; the history of whose adventures
on the march to head quarters, and especially the
attack by Captain Dare and their consequent rout,
with his immediate election to the command,
having
leaked out in the regiment, became the theme
of many witty remarks, that were not, however, at
all agreeable either to the commander or his men.
But the former knew how to support his dignity as
an officer, as well as the dignity of the company he
had the honour to command; and, accordingly, the
day after our introduction to the regiment, he pulled
the nose of a brother captain, who spoke
disparagingly
of the company, and challenged him, in
addition
,
to fight a duel; and the challenge being
immediately
accepted, and the duel fought, he had the
good fortune to shoot his adversary through the leg,
which was the very place he aimed at, because the
gentleman had too freely commended the legs of
his company.
This spirited vindication of their honour endeared
Captain Dicky still more to his company; and the
Bloody Volunteers, taking example from their
leader, turned in like manner upon a brother
company
,
who were pleased to crack similar jokes at
their expense; and immediately there was a battle
royal between the two, the fight being waged
furiously
with fists and feet for two mortal hours; at
which period victory declared in our favour, though
it was a victory dearly won. Indeed, the colonel of
the regiment declared, next day at parade, he had
never before seen so many black eyes together in all
his life.
This double triumph somewhat abated the humour
of our adversaries; but we did not entirely escape
their gibes, even when we marched, as we at last did,
into the enemy's country, and were immersed in the
business of war.
The history of the Creek Campaign, to which
the victories of General Jackson, commanding the
forces of the Western District of Tennessee, gave
such brilliant eclat, is well known to every citizen
of the United States; and it is not therefore
necessary
that I, who played in it so subordinate a part,
should attempt to relate it to the reader. My
business
is with the history of the Bloody Volunteers,
whose valiant achievements, owing to some
unaccountable
neglect, have been entirely overlooked by
the historians of the campaign. And this is the
more extraordinary, as the actions of the Bloody
9*
Volunteers were, with but a single exception, the
only ones performed by the Eastern Division worthy
of commemoration. Our general, marching through
the country of the Cherokees, who, notwithstanding
the fears at first entertained of their martial inclinings,
remained firm and faithful friends during the war,
established his camp on the Coosa River, on the
borders
of the Creek territory, and there remained I
know not how long, (for it was my fate soon to part
from him,) doing I know not what, unless holding
conncils of war and digesting plans of conquest;
while his rival of the Western division, without
troubling himself to do either, was already carrying
sword and flame to the enemy's wigwams. The
victory of Jackson at Talladega, one of the
Indian
towns, fired the emulous spirits of our own
troops, and perhaps the envy of our commander;
who, wakening at length to life and ambition,
detached
a brigade with orders to march against another
Creek village or cluster of villages, called the
Hillabee
towns, and win him a similar victory. It was
the good fortune of the Bloody Volunteers to form a
part of this detachment.
The march from head quarters to the scene of
action
,
distant about a hundred miles, occupied us a
week; during which the Bloody Volunteers had
the honour of being constantly employed on the
most important and critical duties. Sometimes we
were sent off to burn little hamlets of deserted
wigwams
villages
proper to be destroyed, though too
insignificant to demand the presence of the brigade;
but, more frequently, we were employed as a
scouting
party, to beat the woods in advance, look for
trails and stray squaws, from whom to glean
intelligence
of the foe, and perform other similar services.
This honourfor so our superiors told us we must
esteem itwe owed, in a great measure, to Captain
Dicky, whose decided military genius, his zeal and
activity,hisintrepidity,and, perhaps, his experience in
battle, had recommended him to the notice of the
brigadier
;
but, I believe, we owed it in a still greater degree
to the troublesome valour of his men, who had grown
so proud of their victory in the mele of which I
have spoken, that they were now always ready to go
to battle with any of their comrades who reminded
them, as some were always willing enough to do,
of their adventures on the march to head-quarters: and
such affrays were now become dangerous, because
Dicky Dare had succeeded in obtaining permission
to arm his men with swords, to be able to act when
occasion required as cavalry, which they took a great
pride in wearing, and showed much inclination to
use in their private bickerings. To keep the brigade,
or, at least our regiment, from being continually at
logger-heads, it was necessary to keep the Bloody
Volunteers at a distance from their brothers in arms.
This was a happy circumstance for Captain Dare,
who thus obtained a kind of independent command,
the most agreeable to his lofty spirit. Free from
restraint, left half the time to his own resources and
judgment, and feeling within himself that
consciousness
of greatness which inspires the destined hero,
he longed for independence still greater, for a yet
wider field of action, for a still brave opportunity
of winning his way to distinction. He wishedfor
to me, his friend and secretary, he revealed his
thoughtshe wished the President of the United
States would make him a major general, and confide
to
him
the two divisions of the Tennessee army,
with the task of conquering the Creeks; which he
thought he could do in a much more rapid and
glorious
way than any body else; and then he sighed
to think he was only a militia captain.
But Dicky was too old a soldier to omit making
the best of his present circumstances; and while
executing
every duty assigned him with a zeal that
ensured approval, he took means gradually to
increase
the numbers of his company, by soliciting
occasional reinforcements from among our Indian
allies,for we had many friendly Indians among
us, fighting their own countrymenwhom, he
assured
his superiors, he could employ to advantage.
Some of these painted barbarians, in fact, always
accompanied us in our expeditions, as guides and
spies; but Captain Dare would have had an army of
them; though he never succeeded in permanently
attaching more than eighteen or twenty of them to
his company.
But with even this slight addition, by which the
force of the Bloody Volunteers was increased to
about forty men, Dicky began to have great thoughts;
and entertained the hope of finding, or making,
some opportunity of fighting a battle, and winning
a victory, on his own account; for, as he justly
remarked
to me in private, the brigade might win
twenty victories and he, by Julius Csar, as a
militia
captain, be none the better for any of them. It
was a lucky thing for our brigadier, that, in the battle
which we soon after had at the Hillabee towns,
Dicky Dare, though but a militia captain, had only
forty men under his particular command; for,
otherwise
,
he undoubtedly would have snatched the
victory
entirely into his own hands.
We arrived, the evening preceding the attack,
within a few miles of the village, undiscovered; and
early the following morning, marched against it,
our forces being so distributed as nearly, if not
entirely
,
to surround it. The Bloody Volunteers were,
as usual, assigned to the post of honour and danger;
taking a position beyond the village, for the purpose
of cutting off the retreat of fugitives, who, flying
from the brigade, would most naturally run into
our clutches.
In such a position, it may be supposed, we could
have had our hands sufficiently full of business,
destroying
fugitives and picking up prisoners. But
the ambition of Captain Dare disdained the
inglorious
task of finishing the work of others; and so
he had no sooner arrived at his post, whence, from
among the trees and bushes, we could see the
scattered
wigwams of the Indians, looking all in peace
and quiet, as if unconscious of the presence of a foe,
than he came to a resolution to open the attack
himself
,
and, if possible, carry the place before the
arrival
of his general. And he was just on the point of
ordering us to dismount for the purpose, when,
fortunately
for the fame of the latter, the assault was
suddenly begun by his superiors on the other side of
the village, and, in an instant, the village became the
theatre of tumult and conflict. A thousand muskets
and rifles were heard roaring through the woods;
and with them was mingled the din of the Indian
halloo, the wild scream that freezes the blood of those
unaccustomed to it, and gives at once so peculiar,
and I may say so demoniacal, a character to an
Indian
battle. Certainly, those horrible yells, that
seemed to express the fury of devils let loose upon
a newly arrived company of condemned spirits,
turned
pale the cheeks even of the Bloody Volunteers;
but when Dicky Dare, to reassure us, cried,
Courage
,
my brave fellowsremember, an Indian screech
is neither a tomahawk nor a rifle-bullet! the colour
returned, and they all dd their souls, like veterans
of ten years service, and swore they valued an
Injun
war-whoop no more than the squeak of a stuck
pig at Christmas.
At this moment, a band of some fifty or sixty
warriors, at whose wild appearance I felt some very
extraordinary sensations, and especially a tingling at
the top of my head, as if the scalping-knife were
already at work at it, were seen running towards us:
upon which, at Dicky's orders, leaping from our
horses, before they had yet discovered us, and
imitating
our Indian adherents, by covering our bodies
behind trees and the thickest bushes, we gave them
a volley, by which a number were killed, and the
rest thrown into the greatest disorder. Load
again, my lads, and let 'em have another touch, by
Julius Csar! cried Captain Dare; which we did,
and with such good effect, that the savages, who had
rallied, and were now rushing against us with great
apparent courage, were again brought to a stop;
whereupon Captain Dicky immediately exclaimed,
with irrepressible ardour, Now, by Julius Csar!
now's the time; mount, my boys, and we'll finish
them with our sabres!
The blood of the Bloody Volunteers was fully
up, and they were now equal to any enterprise. So
we mounted our horses, and rushed upon the
disordered
and now retreating Indians with our swords,
charging them into the village, of which we should
undoubtedly have taken immediate possession, had
it not been for a tremendous discharge of bullets
shot by a regiment or two of our own friends, who
were also marching into it, and were too busy to
inquire
who they were shooting at. Leave the
houses, quoth Captain Dare, and pursue the
fugitives
.
We obeyed the order, and again dashed
after the band of savages, whom we had driven so
far, and who were now making off in the forest,
which was, for the most part, sufficiently open to
allow of the operations of cavalry on a small scale.
The fugitives were soon brought to bay; and,
scattering
,
they took refuge behind the trees, and gave
us so warm a fire, that we were compelled to
dismount
,
and fight them in the same manner; when,
our Indian allies, whom we had distanced, coming
at last to our aid, so that we became superior in
numbers, our intrepid captain ordered us to close
upon them, which we did, and they again took to
flight. We followed them thus for several miles,
killing several of them, and doubtless wounding
many more; but, by and by, they had all made their
escape, and we returned to the village; which, with
a great number of squaws, and children, and some
old men, was now in the hands of our forces.
CHAPTER XIII.
Captain Dare, at the head of his Bloody Volunteers, wins new
laurels by the storm and capture of an Indian village.
The
valour of the Bloody Volunteers was
favourably noticed by the general, who
complimented
Captain Dare for his good conduct; and,
what delighted the latter infinitely more, gave him
orders, after refreshing his men, to proceed with
them, and an additional body of fifty friendly
Indians
,
whom he put under his command, along the
creek, (a branch of the Tallapoosa River,) on which
the Hillabee towns stood, to destroy all the scattered
wigwams he might come across.
Captain Dicky immediately set out, and the
wigwams
were given to the flames through a distance
of ten or twelve miles from the field of battle; and the
young captain might now have returned in triumph
to the army. But with such a powerful force, which
our red allies swelled to nearly a hundred men, at
his command, Captain Dare felt it impossible to
return to the camp, without having performed some
exploit worthier of fame than the burning of a dozen
cabins of bark and logs; and hearing from the
Indians that there was a small village of the enemy
some seven or eight miles further down the creek,
where it was probable the Hillabee fugitives would
seek refuge, he immediately resolved to stretch his
discretionary powers so far as to march against it,
and immortalize his name by its immediate
destruction
.
This the Indians, who, to give them their
due, were as fond of a little independent burning
and killing as Dicky himself, represented as a feat
neither difficult nor dangerous; and the Captain,
haranguing the Bloody Volunteers, and representing
the immortal honour they had it in their power to
achieve, they unanimously agreed, with great
swearing
,
they would follow him to that Indian town, or
any other he pleased, and kill all the warriors and
take all the squaws prisoners.
We set out accordingly, and by nightfall had come
to a hill within a mile of the devoted village, and
overlooking it; and here the Indians proposed we
should encamp for the night, and surprise the town
next morning at dawn, according to the usual Indian
mode of attack. But Captain Dare, too impetuous,
or too sagacious, to waste time in delay, was
resolved
to commence the assault immediately; he
represented that the fugitives were now weary with
flight, and overcome with panic, and might,
therefore
,
be more advantageously assailed than in the
morning, after having refreshed their bodies and
recovered
their spirits: they will think, quoth Dicky,
that they have been followed by our general, and
that he is pouncing upon them with his whole army.
And besides, he added, patheticallyif we stay
here all night, we shall get no supper; whereas, in
that village, we shall doubtless surprise the squaws
in the midst of thier flesh pots, and so feast like
fine fellows.
His arguments were effectual even with the allies,
who grunted their approbation, more especially at
the idea of the fleshpots.
Never were military calculations better borne out
Vol. II.10
than by the issue of our attack on the village. A
single volley from our guns, with one peal of
warwhoops
,
from the allies, settled the whole affair. I
have no doubt, the Indians thought, precisely as
Captain Dicky said they would, that the whole army
from the Hillabee towns was on them; and the gloom
of the twilight, which was gathering fast, prevented
their discovering their error. Such were the
confusion
and terror among them that not so much as a
gun was fired at us by the warriors; who fled from
the cabins, like the squaws and children, yelling
terribly
,
until the woods and darkness assured them of
escape. Many of them even left their arms and
ammunition
behind them, as we discovered by searching
the huts; in one of which we lighted upon a plentiful
store of corn and dried meata valuable capture, as
there was great scarcity of provisions in the camp at
that time. What injury, besides the loss of the
village and stores, we had inflicted upon the enemy,
we could not well determine; but we found the
bodies of two warriors in the street, besides another
discovered in a wigwam, which, from appearances
we judged was that of a fugitive, who had been
wounded in the battle of the morning, and had been
carried by his comrades thus far, and then died.
The victory achieved, it was now to be decided
whether we should destroy the village and stores of
provisions, and endeavour to retrace our steps to the
camp, without regarding the darkness; or fortify our
position in the village, and keep possession of it,
until the stores could be transferred to the army.
The latter course was resolved upon by Captain
Dare; who, removing all arms and other valuables
into the wigwam in which we had found the stores,
clapped the torch to the other cabins, and burned
them to the ground. Then fortifying the store
wigwam
,
which was converted into a camp, and
stationing
sentinels, like a man who knew what he was
about, Captain Dare called his secretary Robin Day,
who wrote after his dictation the following
important
despatch (which was immediately sent off by
one of the Indian allies,) to his commander, the
Brigadier:
General:Hearing of an Indian town, where it
was supposed the enemy might harbour, I have the
honour to report its capture by the forces under my
command, after an action of two minutes; together
with a store of corn equal to six days rations for the
army, and enough meat to make a feast all round;
and also some guns and ammunition. I have burned
the town, except one wigwam which I have fortified
for the protection of the stores, until further orders.
This despatch will mark the genius of Captain
Dare. The judicious reader cannot but observe the
sublime brevity of its openingthat little clause, in
which the young conqueror condensed, without
words, ideas which would have caused another to
resort to his dictionary. Even the thrasonical Csar
found it necessary to clap down his
veni
and
vidi;
whereas Dicky Dare may be said to have
accomplished
his purpose with a
vici
only. Hearing of an
Indian town, I have the honour to report its capture.
What a laconic concatenation of extremes, of
dissevered
circumstances, of a past and a future condensed
into a single present. Hearing of an Indian town,
I report its capture;as if the hearing of it, or
having heard of it, (for it is not necessary a great
man should be particular about his grammar,) was
not merely necessarily followed by its capture, but
was to all intents and purposes the
same thing
as
its capture. It is thus genius leaps from its thoughts
to their results, disdainful, or unconscious, of the
steps that connect them.
CHAPTER XIV.
Captain Dare, with the Bloody Volunteers, attempts the conquest
of the Indian country. He fights a great battle, and fortune
declares
against himbut still more decidedly against Robin Day,
who falls into the hands of the enemy.
The
night passed away without disturbance; and
the Bloody Volunteers rose from their couches the
proudest of militia-men.
And now it was that Captain Dare, (who, I believe,
from the greatness of his aspirations, had not slept
a wink all night,) being convinced from the ease
with which he had won so great a victory, that it
would require but little more trouble to accomplish
still greater ones, resolved to pursue his good
fortune
still a little further. His despatch to the
Brigadier
,
he had no doubt, would bring that officer
with all his army, before many hours, to take
possession
of the village and valuable stores Dicky had
won for him. What need the Bloody Volunteers,
then, to remain longer in watch, idling the time that
might procure them a second victory? There were
plenty more Indian villages waiting to be sacked:
why might not Dicky Dare, while his general was
following at his heels, march bravely forward with
his command, and capture another of them? and,
after that, another, and another; until there remained
no moreuntil the Creek nation was entirely
subdued
?
In short, Dicky Dare was seized with the
ambition
to conquer the Muscogee nation, himself, with
his Bloody Volunteers and Indian allies; not, indeed,
that he thought his band, however swelled in
numbers
,
was of itself sufficient for such an enterprise;
but it was amply competent, he argued to me, to
whom he confided all his mighty plans, while backed
by the brigade, following nigh at hand, and sustained
at a distance by the army of General Jackson, and
the other forces, which, at different points were
operating in the Creek territories.
And here it is proper to observe, that besides our
own division, now descending the Tallapoosa River,
and General Jackson's at that time on the Coosa,
both assailing the Creeks from the North, there were
two other detatchments attacking them from other
quarters, one from Georgia in the East, another
ascending
the Alabama River, of which the Coosa and
Tallapoosa are tributaries, from the south.
With so many armies assailing them, the Creeks,
Captain Dicky argued, must be worried, and
bothered, and frightened out of their senses:
there's not a man of them, quoth he, turns
his face towards one army of enemies without
being
apprehensive the other three may at any
moment
,
be upon his back; if he hears a rifle bang, he
takes it for granted a whole division is at him. In
fine, Captain Dare decided, that in the midst of these
distractions of the enemy, nothing further was
required
for his destruction than a moderate force of men
under some intrepid leader, with judgment enough
to know how much might be done by audacity and
energy. I attack this village here, quoth Dicky:
well, the enemy fancies it's a whole division at
10*
him, yells and flies, and the town is mine! I attack
another, and the same thing follows; and so it may
be to the end.And who,
then
, is the conqueror?
I take it for granted, the President and Congress of
the United States could do nothing less than send
me a general's commission immediately; and, by
Julius Csar, I should know better how to employ
it than some of these old grannies, that do nothing
for a whole year, and then let the enemy trounce
them.
I objected to Dicky's plan, the possibility of his
being attacked by superior numbers. In that
case, said the hero, we must fight for it, by Julius
Csar: and, at the worst, we can fall back upon the
brigade.
But they may cut us off from the brigade, said
I: Indians have a great knack at getting on an
enemy's rear.
Well then, quoth Dicky, we can fall back
upon one of the other armies; which is the comfort
of the thing: retreat must always be open in some
quarter or other.
Such were Dicky's plans, which, confided to me
alone, (for he had some misgivings they were too
grand to be properly appreciated and approved by
others of the band,) he resolved to make trial of;
and accordingly, as soon as the Bloody Volunteers
had finished their breakfast, he directed each man to
help himself from the stores to a week's provisions,
and as much more as he thought fit to carry,
remarking
,
that while we had such scurvy contractors to
take care of us, it was best for every man to take
care of himself; which was meant to prevent their
suspecting he had a particular purpose in thus
providing
them. He requested them also to fill up
their powder-horns and bullet-pouches; because,
quoth he, with a grim facetiousness, if we have
many more villages to take by storm, we shall run
through the ammunition-chest in no time; a jest
which was not very witty, but highly agreeable,
because of its complimentary character, to the
Bloody Volunteers.
This being all done, he told them the general
and army were now close at hand, and they must
mount for a little more duty among the wigwams;
which being nothing more than usual, no one made
objections; and, accordingly, out we all marched to
subdue the Creek nation.
Our first movement, as Dicky had informed me,
was to be against another village twelve miles off,
of which the Indians had told him; though he had
not yet thought fit to acquaint these faithful
auxiliaries
of his having any further designs than to
reconnoitre
in its neighbourhood, to collect such
information
as might be advantageous to the army. But, I
believe, these painted sons of the forest began, by
and by, to suspect there was more in the wind than
they knew, or could approve of, as some half dozen
or more of them took their opportunity, one by
one, to slip away from us; while others became very
importunate to turn back, without, however, giving
any better reason for the step than that they thought
we were getting too far from the Big Captainthat
is, the Brigadier. By and by, some of them saw,
or said they saw, numerous signs, or trails of the
enemy, and swore, with sundry oaths which they
had learned from their white friends, that we should
all be killed, if we went any further; an assurance
which, I am sorry to say, had an unfavourable effect
upon the spirits of the Bloody Volunteers, who
burst into a sudden mutiny, came to a halt, and
swore they loved their captain, but they would be
not killed, as the Indians saidbut they would be
hanged if they went any further. Alas! Captain
Dicky, in laying his plans, had quite forgot that his
valiant volunteers were free and independent
militia-men
.
But Captain Dicky did not yet despair of the
Bloody Volunteers. He raised himself in his
stirrups, and began to address them in a speech, full
or intended to be full, of ingenious arguments to
prove that the first duty of a soldier, and even a
militia-man, and even an American militia-man,
was to obey his officer; when speech and logic were
both brought to a close by a sudden volley of small
arms let fly from a clump of bushes not far off; by
which one of the allies was brought to the ground,
and a volunteer slightly wounded.
By Julius Csar, cried Dicky Dare,
triumphantly
,
I reckon you'll obey orders
now
, my fine
fellows; because if you don't you'll be whipped,
that's all!
And with that, he directed them immediately to
charge the enemy out of their cover; a command
which the Bloody Volunteers, recovering from the
first feelings of consternation, readily obeyedand
perhaps the more readily, as it did not seem from
the weight of the volley that the ambushed party
could be a numerous one. Of this opinion also were
the allies, who, uttering a spirited whoop, darted
away to right and left with the intention of
surrounding
the enemy; who were immediately seen,
to the number of twelve or fifteen warriors, flying
through the woods.
We pursued them, with sufficient ardour, a
little way to a thicket, in which they had taken
refuge, and from which they gave us a second fire;
while almost at the same moment, a third volley
was discharged from the wood at our left; by which
we perceived we had more than one party to
contend
with.
Upon this, there was a cry among the men to fall
back, lest we should be surrounded by superior
numbers, and our retreat cut off.
Very well, quoth Captain Dicky Dare; but
we must first trounce these vagabonds; for, by
Julius
Csar, I am not going to fly before them.
The auxiliaries were directed to dislodge the first
party from the thicket; while Captain Dare, with
the Bloody Volunteers, rode against the other in
the wood. Both parties were soon driven from
their coverts, with some loss on their side; and as
both the bands were greatly inferior in strength to
the forces acting against them, we were tempted to
continue the pursuit a little further, the friendly
Indians chasing their party in one direction, and
we ours in another.
In this manner we became a little separated from
the allies; when, on a sudden, a great firing was
heard in the direction they had taken, by which the
Bloody Volunteers were thrown into a second
panic
,
and were with great difficulty persuaded by the
magnanimous Dicky to ride with him to the
assistance
of our red friends; who, it was now plain, had
fallen upon, and were engaged with a considerable
body of enemies. We found them in full retreat
before a force of savages as strong as our own, but
disputing every inch and fighting, in their way from
tree to tree, as they retired.
Observing the condition of the battle with the
eye and judgment of a Bonaparte, Dicky ordered
us to dismount, and leave our horses in charge of
the wounded man, who retired a little distance to
the rear; while we took a concealed position such
as would bring us upon the enemy's flank, as he
drew nigh in the pursuit. This in a few moments
procured us an opportunity of delivering a most
successful and destructive fire, by which the savages
were for a moment greatly disordered; so that
nothing
more was necessary to secure us the victory
than firmness on the part of our allies, whom Dicky,
not doubting their faithful cooperation, now called
on to unite with us in a general charge. But, alas!
the Bloody Volunteers charged alone; the allies taking
advantage of the diversion effected in their favour,
only to continue their retreat.
Our gallantry only served the purpose of bringing
upon us the whole body of enemies, who came
rushing
up with terrible whoops and yells, brandishing
their knives and hatchets, gnashing their teethin
short, acting like so many tigers hungry for their
prey.
The Bloody Volunteers forgot their fame, and fled.
It was in vain Captain Dicky entreated them to
stand firm, and let the villains have it; the cry
was every man for himself; and away they ran
pellmell
after the horses, to secure their escape. Even
Captain Dicky himself, thus abandoned by his heroes,
was compelled to follow their example; and so, it
may be supposed, was I. I ran as hard as I could;
and being both lighter and fleeter of foot than any
of the bloody Volunteers, I was soon up with the
headmost, and, indeed, a little in advance of them,
looking eagerly for the horses, none of which,
however
,
were to be seen; when the flight of the whole
company was terribly brought to an end, at least in
that direction, by a volley from another and more
powerful band of Creeks, who had laid an ambush
upon our rear, and now, having fired their guns fairly
in our faces, leaped upon us to finish the work
with their tomahawks. As for myself, being in
advance
of the rest, I actually rushed into the very
midst of the ambuscade, and almost into the arms of
a warrior; who started up, shot off his piece within
two yards of my head, and then, dropping it, ran at
me with a long scalping-knife, roaring with triumph,
and in good English, Shiver my timbers, shipmate,
I'll have
your
scalp any how!
The words, unspeakably dreadful to my ears, were
not less wonderful than dreadful; they came from
the lips of my extraordinary friend, Captain Jack
Brown; whom, notwithstanding that his face was
all streaked over with paint like an Indian's, I
immediately
recognised, becausenot to speak of his voice,
which I could not so soon forgethe wore the very
same sailor's clothes in which I had last seen him in
Virginia.
It was no time,
then
, to remember the wrongs he
had done me: at such a moment, I could have
forgiven
him, if he had robbed, cozened, and sold me
to slavery a dozen times over. I called immediately
for quarter:Quarter, Captain Brown! I cried;
don't kill an old friend.
What! Chowder Chow, sink me! he cried;
and his fury evaporated in a tremendouslaugh. And
so you're out of
that
scrape, are you? But I'll be
hang'd if you an't in a much worse one
now!
CHAPTER XV.
Bobin Day, a prisoner among the Indians, is carried to their
village
,
where he is made to run the gauntlet; the happy device
which he puts into execution against his tormentors.
With
that, he laughed again, but seized me by
the arm, and pulled me down into the bushes, to
conceal
me from the Creeks, who, he saidand, truly, I
believed himwould murder me, if they saw me;
and there he held me, until they had got a little away,
in pursuit of the Bloody Volunteers, who were now
flying in another direction.
Split my topsails! cried Captain Brown,
laughing
again, but I believe you'll be my lieutenant
yet! How, in the name of Davy Jones and all the
prophets, did you get here among these blasted
Injuns
?
and how do you like 'em? For my part, sink
me, I think it's a fine thing, this fighting in the way
of naturebanging away from a bush, and cutting
off scalps, as you'd slice the top off an orange.
Captain Brown, there's no time for talking;
said I; and would have said more, but he interrupted
me.
True enough, quoth he: and while the red
raggamuffins are making mince-meat of them
milishymen
,
the lubbers, why we'll just save your numskull
from their dirty fingers.
And with that he bade me follow him, which I
did some distance through the woods, until the
savages
were no longer to be seen, though we could
hear a brisk firing, as if the Bloody Volunteers, or
perhaps their Indian allies, had turned bravely to
fighting again; when I told him I thought I could
now make good my escape, and find my way back
to the brigade.
He told me, nothe woods were now full of
Creeks, who had cut off the retreat of our party, and
not a man of it could escapethe savages would
have every scalp in less than an hour, and mine too,
unless he took good care of it for mewhich he
intended to do, because, split him, he loved me.
And thereupon, he said he would take me to the
Indian
town, (that very one Captain Dicky had set out
in the morning, with such a valiant design of
taking
by storm,) has is prisoner. I assured him, in
great tribulation, I would rather take my chance
in the woods; because it was notorious, the Creeks,
in this war, had never admitted a prisoner to mercy;
which he agreed was very true, but I was
his
prisoner
,
and not theirs; and with that, he delivered a
volley of oaths, and gave me his word of honour the
Indians should not kill me.
But, said I, grasping my rifle, which I had not
yet deserted, I have no notion of remaining even
their prisoner. And so, Captain Brown, with many
thanks to you for your good will, and especially for
having saved my life, (for which reason, I forgive
your having made a slave of me,) I bid you
goodby
.
And so saying, I turned to escape; when, to my
horror and astonishment, Captain Brown let fly his
piece (which he had recharged as we walked along,)
within an inch of my ear; and then seizing me by
the collar, as I stood petrified, brandishing at the
Vol. II.11
same time a knife in in my face, as if he meant to
cut my throat, he cried, Hold still, you blasted
skilligallee, or you'll be murdered to a certainty!
I understood in an instant that his purpose was to
save, not to destroy me; for even as he spoke, I
heard a shrill whoop, and up ran three wild savages,
who must have been within view as I started to run,
and would undoubtedly, had I got any distance from
Brown, have served me the turn they were now
most anxious to do,that is, to kill me. They
came yelling and ravening up, and it was all Brown
could do to save me from their knives and hatchets.
He cursed and swore, threatened, looked big and
ferocious, and told them repeatedly, now in English,
now in a mongrel Indian jabber he had picked up,
that I was
his
prisoner, and if they wanted one, they
might go hunt for one themselves. In short, he
prevented their murderous designs, though he could
not entirely drive them off, as he wished; and when
he presently signified that I must accompany him
to the village, which I prepared to do, without
resistance
,
being no longer able to help myself, they
followed at a little distance behind us, looking sullen,
and ferocious, and expectant, like so many wolves
awaiting the moment to snap up the poor traveller
whom they are dogging on his journey.
This circumstance, in addition to other causes of
grief,the fate of my brother volunteers, who, I
feared, were by this time all massacred, and the
prospect of captivity, supposing nothing worse
should ensue,it may be supposed, had no very
favourable effect upon my spirits.
But the natural buoyancy of my mind, added to
the assurances of Captain Brown, who repeatedly
declared I had nothing to fear, and laughed at my
uneasiness, gradually brought me into a more
cheerful
frame, so that I could give ear to the
conversation
with which he beguiled the way to the village.
He desired again to know how I had escaped
from the hands of Mr. Feverage; upon which I
related
the whole story, and asked him how he could
reconcile it to his sense of honour to treat me in
that way? Oh! said he, with a grin, the devil
got into my head, and I couldn't help it. Besides,
it was what the sodgers call a mine countermined, a
trick for a trick, split me; because how, d'ye see,
my hearty, you were just meditating how you should
give me the slip; and hang me, no craft yet ever
took the weather of Jack Brown, on land or water.
I then, having informed him of the remainder of
my adventures, with which he was vastly diverted,
but with none so much as the discovery that the
gallant Dicky Dare, his vanquisher on the highway,
was the commander of the Bloody Volunteers, the
heroes and sufferers of the dayI then requested,
in my turn, to know what had thus brought him
among the Indians, and arrayed him so traitorously
in arms against his own country.
My own country be dd! quoth Jack Brown,
with lofty contempt; I sails under my own flag,
and nobody's else. But as for how I came here
among these red Injuns, why, blast me, it was
partly
because of an accident; for, d'ye see, hang me, I
took to the road again for diversion, just to kill time
on the way; but some how, split me, I killed a
niggur-trader
Killed a negro-trader! cried I, with a faltering
voice.
Yes, said Captain Brown, with ineffable
coolness
I
knock'd him off his horse with his own
riding-whip, which I borrowed for the purpose; and
then marched his niggurs to the next town to sell
them; for, shiver my timbers, d'ye see, the niggurs,
being niggurs, could not witness against me. But
some how or other, they got up a row about it;
and so there was nothing but to up anchor and
crowd on all sail for the Injun country. And so,
hearing the paint-faced lubbers loved an
Englishman
;
why, sink me, says I, `I'm an Englishman,
and I'm come to have a brush with you against
your foes, my red-faced hearties, for I loves it.'
And so they made much of me, and I have very
good times with 'em, taking topknots. And,
concluded
Captain Brown, there's fun in it.
What a perverse fate was mine, to connect me,
and, as it seemed, so inextricably, with the fortunes
of such a man as Captain Brown, a fellow to whom
swindling and fraud of every kind were but jests
who spoke of killing a man as if nothing were more
natural and proper, and saw nothing but very good
fun in helping savage Indians to take the scalps of
his own countrymen.
Nevertheless, Captain Brown had, just that
moment
,
saved my life, and was the only person
who could afford the protection, of which, it was
obvious, I still stood in need. And, therefore, I
had no idea of letting the horror and disgust with
which he inspired me, deprive me of the advantages
of his friendship.
After an hour or two, walking, we reached the
village; where my unexpected presence produced a
furious hubbub among the squaws and papooses, the
only inhabitants, all the warriors and others
capable
of bearing arms, having gone out against the
unfortunate Volunteers. They screeched and
raved
like so many furies and little imps of darkness;
some pelted me with mud and chunks of wood, the
little boys shot at me with arrows, and set the dogs
on to devour me; while one or two old beldams,
as ugly as baboons and as fierce as tiger-cats, ran at
me with knives, making every effort to despatch
me. Captain Brown interposed, as before, to save
me. He cursed the boys, he kicked the dogs, and
tossed the old women away; but I did not esteem
myself perfectly safe, until he had dragged me into
a cabin, of which I soon found by the airs he put on
he was the master.
Here, though I was protected from the mob of
the street, I found myself confronted by three
young, but by no means handsome squaws; who also
burst into a rage at sight of me, and seemed inclined
to give me as savage a reception as the others had
done; but upon Captain Brown swearing at them,
which he did with great energy, they slunk away
to their domestic occupations, one to pounding corn
in a mortar, another to puffing a fire under a pot,
the third to some other work, but all grumbling and
scolding in their own language, like viragoes of the
most acid temperament, giving me every now and
then looks of implacable hatred. I asked Captain
Brown who they were; to which he replied, to my
astonishment, they were his wives, sink them, and
as cursed a pack of jades as were to be found in the
whole Creek nation. And thereupon the intolerable
Turk told me, If I wanted one, I might have one
or, for the matter of that, all three of them; and
for his part, split him, he would never marry
another Injun wife again as long as he lived, because
why, he believed one was just as big a jade as
another.
This was a new illustration of the extraordinary
want of principles which Brown had long since
coolly avowed, and which every act and word of
his, only more surprisingly confirmed.
11*
A half hour or more was spent in conversation,
in which Brown gave a more detailed history of his
adventures since abandoning me to Mr. Feverage;
and then we sat down to an Indian dinner of meat,
corn, pumpkins and sweet potatoes, all boiled
together in a pot. The dish was not the most
savoury in the world, but, being hungry, I should
perhaps have very well enjoyed it, had it not been
for the entrance into the hut of a savage-looking
warrior, apparently fresh from the battle, who was
presently followed by another, and then another and
another, until there were more than a dozen of them
present. I was not much dismayed at the
appearance
of the first visiter, who, at Captain Brown's
invitation, squatted down at his side, and partook of
our dinner; and, being asked upon the subject by
Brown, proceeded, in broken English, to inform him
of the results of the battle. He stated that the
affair was not yet over, that the Bloody Volunteers
had been unluckily driven in such a direction as to
stumble upon and effect a junction with their allies,
the friendly Indians, who had been also intercepted
that the party thus reunited, had rallied under the
encouragement of the intrepid Dicky, and taken
possession
of an old deserted wigwam, from which it was
not thought prudent to attempt to dislodge them until
night; and that, accordingly, the Creeks had retired
to a distance, still, however, surrounding the ruin,
which, there was no doubt, they would carry, at the
approach of darkness. This had given an
opportunity
to our informant, and, as it afterwards appeared,
to many other Indians to return for a while to the
village.
It was some satisfaction to me to hear that poor
Dicky and his followers were yet alive; but the
appearance
of so many savages in the cabin drove from
my mind all thoughts of my friends, and of every
thing else but self; especially when one of these
desperadoes
,
after having eaten a very hearty meal, got
up, and in the course of a long speech, addressed in
broken English to Captain Brown, proposed that I,
his prisoner, should be taken out and made to run
the gauntlet, for the satisfaction of the women and
children; who, he represented with great pathos,
were mourning the loss of many a husband and
father, slain by the white man, and stood therefore in
need of some such consolation.
To this amiable proposal Captain Brown, to do him
justice, at first returned a flat refusal; but the other
Indians now joining in the request, and some
proceeding
to the length of actually laying hands upon
me, as if determined to have their will, whether
Brown consented or not, he made a merit of
necessity
and surrendered me up, notwithstanding the
many piteous entreaties I made him to protect me.
I reminded him of the promise he had made, on his
honour, that the Indians should not kill me; to which,
he replied, very coolly; they were not going to kill,
but to carbonado me; and comforted me with the
assurance, that one was not to expect to get through
the world, without a few little rubs, split him.
In short, Captain Brown, with all his professions
of friendship seemed not in the least distressed at
my affliction; and I was immediately haled out into
the air, where my former tormentors, the squaws
and little boys, already collected in expectation,
received
me with cries of mingled fury and delight.
They immediately arrayed themselves, with the
assistance
of the warriors, into two lines about six
feet apart, and perhaps a hundred paces long; thus
forming a narrow alley, through which I was to run
to Brown's cabin, at the door of which the lines
ended. All the persons forming the lines, squaws,
children, and warriors, were armed with sticks and
bludgeons, and some of them, I am certain, with
knives and hatchets; notwithstanding that Brown,
who assisted with great apparent spirit and gusto in
arranging the lines, assured me the warriors had
agreed there should be no dangerous weapons used.
I need not tell the reader with what emotions of
indignation and grief I found myself degraded to
such a fate, to make sport and pastime for vagabond
Indians, whom I despised, even while I feared and
hated them. But indignation and grief could not
save me from the fate. I must run the gauntlet
through those lines; and Brown, cautioning me to
run fair, as he called it, declared, I would be
infallibly
murdered, if I broke through the lines; and
all I could hope was, by employing my utmost speed
and agility in avoiding the blows to be aimed at me,
to get through the infernal ceremony as quickly, and
with as little hurt as might be.
Such was the advice of Captain Brown; who,
having
proved his friendship by giving it, and placed
me at a point a few yards in advance of the lines,
ready to start at the signal, took post at his own
cabin-door door to give it, and to receive me when
the race was over.
As I stood a moment, looking down the living
alley, bristling with clubs upheld in readiness, and
sparkling with eyes all turned towards me with
diabolical
expectation, my fears got the mastery of me,
and I felt a sudden inclination to run the race the
otherwaythat is, fly to the woods, instead of to
Captain
Brown's wigwam. My next feeling was wrath
and malice, and a desire, since escape was impossible,
to make the sport result in as much suffering to my
tormentors as to their victim. This vengeful feeling,
or some good angel, I know not which, suddenly
brought to my mind the recollection of my
adventures
with the negroes in the streets of Philadelphia,
and the device by which I had so effectually revenged
upon the black dandy the indignities I had suffered
from his brethren. I had no Scotch snuff to be sure,
to enable me to play the same game over again on the
present occasion; but my eye was attracted by a
mass of loose light sand strewing the path on which
I stood; and I felt that a better substitute for Scotch
snuff could not have been offered me. Stooping
down to the ground and busying myself a moment
about my shoe, as if securing it for the race, I took
the opportunity to snatch up in each hand as much
sand as I could well cram into them; and then, the
word being given by Brown crying out, Now, my
skilligallee, run, you lubber!words that brought
a peal of yells from the savages, I started at full
speed down the alley, scattering, as the husbandman
does his seed, a litte sand from both sides, and
aiming
it with admirable accuracy full at the eyes of
my persecutors, administering always a double dose
where I had reason, from the bigness of the club or
the fury of the visage, to apprehend the most
dangerous
enemy.
The device succeeded wonderfully; it protected
me from many a blow, aimed or intended to be
aimed, at my unprotected body; and it changed the
cries of ferocity of my enemies to yells of pain and
anguish. Nothing can express the horrible
confusion
I left, at every step, as I ran, behind me; two
hundred and fifty savages, man, woman, and child,
were suddenly consigned to blindness, with each at
least ten grains of sand in either eye; and how they
ever got rid of them, as I am certain I left not a
sound eye to help the afflicted in all the village, I
know not.
Next to the satisfaction of thus repaying, or
anticipating
,
their cruelties, was that of my almost
perfect
exemption from injury. Some slight blows I
received, indeed, and one cut, which I supposed was
from a knife, on my left shoulder; but I should have
reached Brown's cabin without a hurt of any
consequence
,
had it not been that this worthy himself, my
faithful friend, after giving the signal, had jumped
in at the end of the line with a shillelah; with which,
roaring in animated tones, run, you lubber! he
hit me a tremendous thwack, by which I was
tumbled, or rather darted, headlong into the
cabin
.
Unfortunately for my own interests, as I
had entertained no apprehensions of such a salute
from Captain Brown, I had made no preparations to
prevent it; unfortunately for Captain Brown,
however
,
I was aware of his intent in time to revenge it;
and at the very moment his stick came in contact
with my back, I succeeded by a violent effort in
flinging all my remaining ammunition into his face;
and his furious exclamation, shiver my timbers, I
am blinded for ever! was mingled with the less
comprehensible, but equally agonized ejaculations of
the Indians.
CHAPTER XVI.
How the Indians condemn Robin Day to the stake, along with
Captain Brown, their adopted brother; and in what manner the
two are saved from being burned alive.
You have blinded me, you cub of a seadog!
cried Captain Brown, groping his way into the
cabin, where were now none but ourselves; for his
amiable wives, it seemed, had been too happy to
take part in the savage entertainment, in which
they had suffered as well as others. The smarting
of my back gave a bolder emphasis to my reply,
No craft yet ever took the weather of Jack
Brown on land or water!
Bravo! cried Jack Brown, bursting into a
laugh, which, however, ended in a growl: I've
heard of a rat taking a cat by the nose, and a
jackass
kicking a lion. But, split me, no more gabbling:
pick the sand out of my eyes.
This piece of friendship I performed for the
gentleman
;
who, being at last freed from pain, fell into
a good humour, and highly commended the novelty
and ingenuity of my device, and swore, the next
time he went cruising, he would take in a cargo of
sand, because why, it would be a great saving of
gunpowder. I had my doubts and fears as to the
effects of my stratagem upon the tempers of the
savages; but Brown assured me it was a good joke,
which they would themselves enjoy, as soon as they
got their eyes washed out.
By and by, having tired of jesting upon the
subject
,
he proposed I should turn savage like him
though he recommended me not to trouble myself
with any wives, because why, they were infernal
jades, all of them,and accompany him forthwith
to the scene of battle, for the honest purpose of
assisting in the destruction of my late friends and
comrades, the Bloody Volunteers; which, he said,
would make the Creeks fond of me. I rejected the
proposal with indignation; upon which he himself
started off, leaving me, to my great grief, to the
tender mercies of his spouses; who, perhaps,
thinking
themselves responsible for my safe keeping,
immediately
laid hands upon me, and with a deal of
scolding and glowering, proceeded to tie me hand
and foot; which being done to their liking, they
rolled me into a corner of the hut, and left me to my
meditations.
And thus to my meditations I was left for more
than twenty-four hours, that is, until late in the
afternoon of the following day; during all which
time I suffered inexpressible pangs from the
tightness
of the rope, and from hunger and thirst; for the
Mistresses Brown, having established me in the
corner, paid no further regard to me than if I lay at
the bottom of the Red Sea, bringing me no food,
taking no notice of my moans and lamentations and
petitions to have my bonds slackened a little, and,
indeed, appearing to be almost unconscious of my
existence.
At the end of that period, the savages returned to
the village, as I was apprized by a great number of
wild yells that suddenly arose in the forest; and
presently
,
Captain Brown came into the hut, looking
very much fatigued, and with a handkerchief bound
round his arm, as if he had been wounded. He
looked surprised, and then laughed, to see me
bound; but swore very majestically at his wives,
and immediately released me from my painful
bonds, with the observation, made by way of
apology for the treatment I had endured from the
furies, that I might thank my stars they had not
taken a twist of the rope round my neck, instead of
my wrists and ankles!
He then informed me, to my great surprise and
joy, that Captain Dicky with his Bloody Volunteers,
instead of being devoured by the savages, had
outgeneralled
,
if not even defeated themthat he had
taken advantage of the night and the confidence of
the besiegers, to creep from his fortress, and, after
an attack as furious as it was unexpected, in which
he had inflicted considerable loss upon them, to steal
away, marching so vigorously during the whole
night, that the savages had not been able to overtake
him, though following hotly upon the track from
morning till noon; and that, in consequence, many
of the latter, and especially the Indians of the
village
,
had given over the pursuit in despair, and
returned
home in a very bad humour. But, he added,
there were plenty of other Creeks in pursuit, (for
the enemies of the Bloody Volunteers were not
confined
to a single village,) and they would
undoubtedly
,
sooner or later, come up with and destroy
them; because Dicky, supposing himself cut off
from the brigade, had turned in another direction,
and was marching into the heart of the Creek
territories
.
While Brown was speaking, I was sensible of a
great hubbub in the streets, which increased and
approached; and, directly, a multitude of warriors,
Vol. II.12
fierce with paint and rage, come rushing into the
hut.
Shiver my timbers, said Brown, the
rapscallions
are after mischief!
And so, indeed, they were; for rushing upon me,
the object of the visitation, in a body, and with such
eagerness that some of them tumbled one over the
other to the floor, they seized me with violence, and
began to drag me from the cabin. I cried out to
Brown for protection; upon which he repeated one
of his profanest interjections, adding, with what
seemed to me more of surprise than concern, that
he believed they were going to roast me.
Nevertheless
,
he made some effort for my relief,
demanding
,
with some appearance of indignation, what
they wanted with
his
prisoner, and insisting they
should do me no hurt, because why, sink him, he
had adopted me into the nation.
The savages took not the least notice of his
remonstrances
,
but haled me from the cabin into the
streets, where I again saw all the squaws and
children
collected; and they burst into yells, at sight of
me, as they had done before, crowding eagerly and
tumultuously around the warriors, who pulled me
to the river-bank, (for the village stood on the banks
of the Tallapoosa,) and there tied me by the back to
a pine tree that grew near the edge of the bluff;
and immediately many of the squaws ran up,
bearing
armloads of wood, which they began to pile in
a ring around me.
It was no longer to be doubted that they were
going to burn me alive, and that they were in the
greater hurry to begin their diabolical pastime,
because
the night was now coming on fast, leaving
them scarce sufficient time to enjoy the spectacle of
my dying agonies by daylight.
I looked around for Captain Brown, who had
followed
to the scene of execution, and was, I believe,
doing all he could among the warriors, by argument
and dissuasion, to save me from the horrid fate to
which they had consigned me; but I was in such
dismal confusion and anguish of spirit, that I could
note nothing but that he was among them, and think
of nothing but the share he had had in bringing me
to the present pass. I called to him, and reproached
him bitterly with the promise he had made, that my
life should not be touched, and reminded him he had
pledged his honour for my safety. At another
moment
,
I might have smiled at the idea of appealing
to the honour of such a man as Captain Brown; but,
after all, he had something of the kind yet left in
his breast, or some dare-devil sense of right and
wrong, for I doubt if there was virtue in it, which
took the place of honour in his composition.
I sticks to my honour, my hearty, he cried,
with a resolute voice, and I don't intend the
lubberly
rascals shall do you any hurt.
And with that, he forced his way up to the tree,
and in open defiance of the whole herd, began
deliberately
with a knife to cut the thongs that bound
me. The savages seemed for a moment staggered
at the act, as well as at the intrepid bearing of their
ally; but, presently relapsing into rage, they fell
upon him tooth and nail, some snatching the knife
from his hands, and others seizing him by the
shoulders
to drag him away.
Are you
there
, shiver me! cried he, shaking
himself free from their grasp; which he immediately
requited by some half dozen or more terrible blows
of his fist, planted with admirable precision full in
the faces of those who had made most free with him.
This exasperated their passion into frenzy, in the
midst of which, overpowering him with numbers,
he was at last tumbled to the ground, and in two
minutes after, bound like myself to a tree, on the
point of sharing the death he was no longer able to
prevent.
But Fate had not willed we were to perish the
victims of Indian tortures. The day was closing
fast; but it was the darkness of a tempest that
shortened
it prematurely. A wild moaning sound, the
uproar of a hurricane booming through the forest,
was heard even above the yells of the Indians, during
their conflict with Brown; and when that was over,
and the whoopings came to an end, it had increased
to such a degree as to engage the attention and excite
the fears of all. Indeed, the ropes had not well been
secured upon Brown's body, when, on a sudden, the
trees on the opposite bank of the river, were seen
snapping and flying in the air; while the river, late
so dark and still, was converted into a chaos of
boiling
foam, intermixed with the limbs and trunks of
trees, as the tornado, with the speed of the wild-horse,
swept across it to the Indian village.
The savages, screaming with fear, fled to the refuge
of their cleared fields; and so, doubtless, would their
victims have done, if able; for I can declare, at least
for myself, that the horror of that dreadful tumult of
the elements, the sight of great trees whirling in the
air like straws, and of the river spouting up from its
bedfor no other word will express its commotion
as if the whole body of waters were about deserting
it, filled me with such consternation, that I quite
forgot I was on the point of being burned alive,
forgot
,
too, that death by a thunderdolt or falling tree
would be mercy compared with immolation by the
hands of torturing Indians.
The tornado was on us in a moment, andBut I
have no kind of knowledge what happened, or how
it happened; but I remember having looked, one
moment, with horror upon Brown, who was venting
terrible execrations, in no apparent fear, but great
amazement at the appearance of things, and, the
next, finding him lugging me down the bank of the
river, swearing as furiously as before, and assuring
me, if I was not done for, now was the time to give
them blasted Injuns the go-by. And with that,
tumbling me into a canoe that lay on the verge of the
river, and pushing her off into the water, which was
still in great commotion, he jumped in, snatched up
a paddle, and, giving me another, bade me flap
away like a mud-terrapin.
The storm was still blowing, though with
moderated
rage; but a great rain had succeeded, and was
now pouring in such deluges, that as I looked back
to the scene of the intended torture, I could barely
discern that the village was in ruins, and the trees
that divided it from the river, all prostrated. I could
see no Indians; they had not yet returned in quest
of their victims. The next moment, the site of the
village was concealed from my eyes by a bend of the
river, down which our canoe was urged at the
greatest
speed we could give it.
5*
CHAPTER XVII.
Robin is separated from his fellow fugitive, and after wandering
through the wilderness, stumbles on his old friends the Bloody
Volunteers; and, with that corps of heroes, is taken prisoner by
the Spaniards of Florida.
I asked
Captain Brown the particulars of our
escape
;
but he said he knew nothing about it,
except
that the blasted pine (meaning the tree he was
bound to,) came down like the mast of an
Injieman
in an ox-eye off Good Hope, and so snapped
him loose; and then he had cut me free, sink him;
and that was all he knew of it; except that if he
ever turn'd Injun again, the devil might fry him in
butter for breakfast, split him.
And with that, he bade me paddle away, which I
did with all my strength, asking him, the while,
very anxiously, what we were to do, and what was
the prospect we had of making good our escape
from among the Indians. He replied that we could
do nothing better than paddle down the stream as
fast as we could, during the nightthat it was lined
with Creek towns, which, however, we could easily
pass unobservedthat two nights' paddling would
carry us out of the heart of the Creek settlements;
after
which, we could proceed on by day as well as
by night; and so, he supposed, that in four or five
days we should reach some American fort or other
on the Alabama River.
But what, asked I, anxiously, during these
four or five days, are we to do for food, having none
with us, and no means of procuring any?
What are we to do? Why,
starve
, quoth
Captain Brown, coollya thing I have had great
practice in; for once, hang me, I lived nine days on
a pair of shoes and a gallon of rum; and, another
time, fourteen days on nothing, except the hind leg
of a niggur, which was none of the best, because
how, it wasn't cooked, and no rum, salt, or pepper
to make it savoury. And as for starving five or six
days, here on a fresh river, where one may fall to
on the dry grass like a hippopotamus, (and shiver
my timbers, I don't believe grass is such bad eating
neither, because why, how do the cows get so fat on
it?) I don't think that any great matter. And
mayhap, if we have luck, we may catch a young
alligator or two for dinner; though, split me, it
wouldn't be wonderful if we were snapped up
ourselves
by the old ones.
I liked not at all the prospect of fasting four or five
days, or feeding on dry grass and alligators; but the
thought that I was escaping from the savage stake
determined me to meet my fate with fortitude. It
was not my fate, however, to starve long in the
company of Captain Brown.
The storm that followed the hurricane lasted but
a short time, but it rained violently during nearly
the whole nighta circumstance we esteemed no
great misfortune, as it gave us the better hope of
passing the Creek villages unnoticed. We paddled
on, therefore, with zeal and confidence; and by and
by, when the rain ceased as it did a little before
daylight, we had left the torture-ground many a
long league behind us.
But while congratulating ourselves upon our
success
,
we had the misfortune, while rounding a point
on the right bank of the river, suddenly to come in
contact with a great sawyer, as I believe they call
it, by which our bark was turned topsy-turvy and
wrecked, and ourselves tumbled into the tide.
Every body has heard of the drowning sailor,
who caught hold of the anchor for preservation, and
went with it to the bottom. In the confusion of
the moment, I was guilty of a somewhat similar
piece of folly; for I grasped the tree which had
wrecked us, and upon which I was no sooner
mounted than it plumped under water, then up,
then down again, giving me such a tremendous
seesawing, and all between wind and water, that I
lost the little wits left me by the immersion, and so
was on the point of drowning, before I could think
of making an effort for safety. I was partly recalled
to my senses by a sudden snorting from Captain
Brown, who immediately roared out, a little down
the stream, whither he had been carried by the
current
,
I say, split me, hilloa there, my hearty! have
you gone to the bottom? Here's the bank near;
swim, you horse-mackerel!
But, alas, the voice of Captain Brown, pealing
over the river, awoke upon that solitary bank
he recommended me to swim to, and which he was,
doubtless, himself striving to reach, certain echoes,
the most disagreeable and fearful that could fall
upon my ears. They were nothing less than the
yells of Indiansfirst, a single startling shriek, that
was responded to by a multitude of voices, as of a
party that had just been roused from sleep; and in
the midst of the uproar, a dozen or more rifles were
fired off in the dark, as I supposed, at Brown; and
then I heard, or fancied I heard, the noise of
mocasined feet jumping into canoes, and the rattling
of paddles against their wooden sides.
Roused by the new danger, I immediately let go
my hold of the tree, and swam to the other side of
the river; where, not pausing to look for Brown,
or even to think of him, because I fancied the
Indians
in their canoes were close behind me, I ran up
the bank, and was presently in the depths of a
trackless
forest. I then, indeed, thought of Brown, but
it was too late to look for him, supposing he had
escaped to the bank as I had done; and, besides, I
dare not stop for such a purpose. It was now
almost dawn; in half an hour the Indians would be
able to follow me by my trail; and well I knew
how necessary it was to make the most of the
advance
I had of them. I ran on, therefore, through
the woods; and, by sunrise, I reckoned I had left
the river five or six miles behind me. I then
slackened my pace somewhat, but not much, being
still in fear the Indians might overtake me.
Towards midday, I felt a little more at ease, and
was able to collect my thoughts, and consider
though I did not come to a stand to do sowhat I
was to do, thus left by my cruel fate alone in a wide
wilderness. I had treasured in my memory all
that Captain Dicky and Brown had said of
American
armies entering the Creek nation from the East
and South, and of forts recently built on the
Alabama
river. But how I was to find either an army
or fort, unless I should stumble upon them by mere
accident, was not very clear, as the East was a wide
quarter of the compass, and the Alabama a pretty
long river. It appeared to me but a hopeless task
to go in search of either; yet, as it was necessary
to go in some direction, I thought my best course
would be to proceed to the Southwest, which, from
a general notion I had of the country, I fancied
would bring me to the Alabama river, near to its
confluence with the Tombecbee, where I hoped to
find myself in the neighbourhood of forts or
settlements
.
But, alas, I soon discovered it was much easier to
resolve upon a course than to pursue it. The sun,
upon which I chiefly depended to guide me on my
way, presently refused to shine, and for not that
day only, but several others, for it was now
November
,
the month of fog and storm; and, when night
came, and was even clear, I found there was no
seeing the stars through the overarching boughs of
the forest, that spread around me, apparently without
end. I could, indeed,
sometimes
manage to
determine
the points of the compass; but the end was,
that I soon became bewildered, lost in the wild
desert, in whichnot to dwell upon an adventure
that was varied only by my fears and distressesI
wandered for seven weary, dreary days, subsisting
upon nuts, when I had the good fortune to find
them, which did not happen every day, and more
especially towards the last, when I entered upon a
barren, sandy country, upon which nothing grew
but pine trees; and where, therefore, I had the best
prospect of dying of famine. But there was relief
in store for me, and it came at a moment when,
being quite worn out with hunger and fatigue, and
reduced to despair, I stood most in need of it.
It was the seventh day of my flight, in the
afternoon
,
and I had thrown myself upon the ground, as
I almost hoped, to die; when I heard at a distance a
sudden firing of guns, at first a volley, and then an
irregular succession of discharges, which convinced
me there was a battle waging nigh at hand. This
dispelled my despair, and my first thought was to
fly, not doubting that, where there was fighting, there
there must be Indians also; but remembering that
although Indians might be engaged on one side, there
must be white men on the other, and being
emboldened
by my desperate condition, I resolved to steal
towards the field of contention, and, if possible,
effect a junction with the supposed white men.
This proved to be no very difficult matter; for
although the firing suddenly ceased, so that I was
deprived of the means of directing my course, I
presently
saw a body of men, twelve in number,
marching
pretty rapidly through the woods towards me,
all of them armed, and all, as I knew by their clothes,
good American backwoodsmen. I ran towards them,
crying out that I was a friend, not desiring they
should shoot at me as an enemy; and, accordingly,
I arrived among them unharmed, and immediately
discovered myself in the midst of my old friends,
the Bloody Volunteersor what remained of that
once formidable company, their gallant leader,
Captain
Dicky Dare, still marching at their head.
Yes! there they were, twelve heroes and men of
might, who finding their return to the brigade cut
off, had carved their way through the heart of the
Indian nation, and fighting and flying together, had
arrived in the piny desert, bringing, not merely
famine and fatigue such as I endured, but a host of
enemies, by whom their march was continually
harassed, and their numbers thinned, and from
whom they owed their daily escapes only to the
military genius of their commander. Where they
were, or whither they were going, they knew no
more than I; nor had they known for many days.
Some attempts the valiant Dicky had made to
penetrate
both to the east and west, to execute his
preconcerted
plan, in case of necessity, of effecting a
junction with one of the American armies; but those
quarters were precisely the ones in which he found
it impossible to proceed; and during the last four or
five days, he had been content to march to any point
of the compass which his fate, or his foes, permitted.
Great as were the wonder and joy on both sides
for the Bloody Volunteers were all rejoiced to
see me alive again, having supposed me long since
dead, and Captain Dicky, who looked half starved
himself, pulled a handful of corn from his pocket,
being all the food he had remaining, and generously
divided it with methere was no time to indulge
in congratulations. There were Indians close
behind
;
the Bloody Volunteers had just repelled their
attack, but it might be at any moment repeated.
Push on, was the word; and away we went
whither, as I said before, no one knew, but with the
encouraging assurance of our Captain, that,
whichever
way we went, we must, sooner or later, come
to
some
place or other.
Fortunately, our commander's words were soon
verified; for we had not continued the march more
than an hour, when our ears were unexpectedly
saluted by the tones of a bugle pealing through the
woods. Whence could such a sound proceed save
from some American fort or camp? We pressed
onward with renewed speed, and, by and by, caught
sight, not of a fort or camp, but of a train of forty
or fifty mounted men, all in handsome uniform,
who came trooping along through the forest, but at
sight of us, suddenly halted; and we perceived them
unslinging carbines, which they had hanging at
their backs, as if preparing to meet an enemy. Then
galloping towards us, they came to a second halt
within a hundred paces of us; while their leader,
parting from them, rode up nearer, and saluted us,
to our surprise, in the Spanish language, demanding
who we were, and whence we came; questions
which I, being the only one of the company who
understood the language, interpreted to the Bloody
Volunteers, as well as the reply of Captain Dicky
to the officer, that we were a detachment of such a
brigade of such a division of the Tennessee army.
Upon this, the officer very politely informed us we
were his prisoners, and begged we would do him
the favour to surrender our arms to those of his
Majesty
the King of Spain, upon whose territories we
were now unlawfully bearing them; hinting, at the
same time, that our refusal to do so would place him
under the disagreeable necessity of cutting us to
pieces.
This was a greater surprise than the other, though,
it proved by no means painful to the Bloody
Volunteers
;
who, repelling a suggestion of the
indomitable
Dicky that he thought they might whip the
haughty Dons, if they would, for all of their
numbers
,
insisted upon laying down their arms
immediately
,
whereby they would escape all future
danger
from the Indians, as well as the pangs of
starvation that now afflicted them.
Well, said Captain Dicky, with a sigh, it can't
be helped, then; and perhaps the American
government
would not sustain us, even if we trounced them;
because we are at peace with Spain. But the
consolation
is, the greatest generals and bravest soldiers
have been sometimes prisoners of war.Tell the
officer, said he, we surrender to the arms of his
Majesty the King of Spain.
Vol. II.13
So the twelve of fame gave up their arms, and
were forthwith marched off to the town of Pensacola,
from which we were only twenty or thirty miles
distant
,
and which we reached early in the afternoon
of the following day, being treated very well on the
road, and sumptuously feasted.
CHAPTER XVIII.
The Bloody Volunteers are carried to Pensacola, where Robin Day
receives an agreeable surprise.
As
soon as we arrived, Captain Dicky's eleven
followers were carried to a fortress near the town,
where they were confined; while the young hero
and myselfI being invited to officiate as
interpreter
were
conducted to the house of the
Intendente
,
or military governor of the town, the Seor Coronel
Aubrey, or de Aubrey;for such Captain Valdez, our
captor, told us was his name; and upon my remarking
that the name appeared to me rather English than
Spanish
,
he admitted with a shrug that seemed to be full of
meaning, though I could not divine what the meaning
was, that his Excelencia the Coronel was but a half
Castilian after all, nay, that he was a North American
by birth, who had left the Carolinas at the period of the
American Revolution, and entered the Spanish
colonial
service, in which he had remained ever since.
And Valdez added, with another shrug, as profoundly
significative and as incomprehensible as the first,
that Colonel Aubrey had acquired wealth as well as
power, while many pure-blooded Castilians might
be found in the service of his sovereign, who,
caramba
!
were no richer than
he
was.
A few moments saw us ushered into the
presence
of this dignitary, a fine, and, indeed, noble
looking man of fifty or fifty-five years; in whom,
notwithstanding the difference of years, I was struck
with a resemblance to the portrait of the Spanish
gentleman which I had so much admired in the
drawing room of Mr. Bloodmoney. And to prove
that he could be no other than the original of that
picture, I saw hanging upon the wall of the
apartment
in which he received us, a copy, the very
counter-part of that portrait. Allowing for the
difference
of years, there was but one characteristic in
which the Intendant differed from his effigy. The
countenance of the latter expressed a deep and
settled
melancholy; whereas Colonel Aubrey's was in
the main a cheerful one, or at most sedately
cheerful
.
But, thought I to myself, a man is not in
sorrow all his life.
He received usor rather, I should say, he
received
Captain Dicky, whose regimentals, though
greatly the worse for his forest campaign,
distinguished
him as my superiorwith courtesy, but seemed
very much surprised at his juvenile appearance;
indeed
he turned to our captor, and asked him with
some sharpnessfortunately for the pride of Captain
Dicky, the question was in Spanishwhether he
had not made a mistake, and brought him the
drummer
,
instead of the leader, of the American party?
Upon my soul, replied the officer, the little
fellow is commander in chief of the whole party.
And, he added, casting his eye upon me, if we
are to believe what the young gentleman, his friend
and follower, says of him and his feats, it is time
the American government had made him a general
of division.
The Intendant here gave me a scrutinizing look,
which ended in a smile, and he addressed himself
to the business in hand by asking a great many
questions in regard to the Bloody Volunteers, their
objects in thus invading the territories of his
Catholic
Majestywhether they were acting under the
orders of General Jackson, or any other American
commanderand a multitude of other inquiries,
such as were, doubtless, proper to the occasion; and
to all which Captain Dicky, as soon as I had
rendered
them into English, returned the most
appropriate
and dignified answers.
He assured the governor upon his honour as a
soldier, that neither his government nor commanding
general had the least idea of violating the territory of
their Spanish friends; that the invasion was an affair
of accident, attributable solely to him, and to him
only on account of his ignorance of the Spanish
boundaries. In short, he answered every thing, and
said every thing necessary to allay the suspicions
that might be entertained by the Governor as to any
sinister movements of the American army, in
progress
or designed, against his little Intendancy.
So far all went very well; but a difficulty
unexpectedly
arose when his Excellency, politely assuring
Captain Dicky that his explanations were quite
satisfactory
,
begged to be permitted to look over his
papersthat is to say, his commission, and the orders
of his brigadier, in the attempted execution of which
he had been driven so very far from head-quarters.
The difficulty was that Captain Dicky had
no
papers:
the irregularity of his election, and the hurry of
affairs, had prevented his receiving, before marching
to the theatre of war, a formal commission from the
executive of Tennessee; and as for orders, he had
never yet been distinguished by any but verbal ones
from his general.
To remove the difficulty, Captain Dare entered
into a laboured explanation of the circumstances,
13*
from the period of his election up to his surrender to
the arms of his majesty of Spain, including the whole
of his adventures during the flight through the Indian
countryan exploit that can be compared only to the
memorable Anabasis of the Ten Thousand; in which
Colonel Aubrey seemed much interested, and I am
sorry to say, diverted; for he laughed once or twice
very heartily. He then asked me if
I
could as a
gentleman (for, upon his demanding what my rank
was in the company, I took the opportunity, which
the ragged appearance of my outer man rendered
desirable
,
to tell him I was a gentleman volunteer, a
soldier of fortune serving in the ranks,) endorse all
the statements of my friend Captain Dicky; and
upon my hinting in reply, that my captivity among
the Indians, and long separation from the company,
rendered me an incompetent authority as to a portion
of the statements, though I had no doubt of their
truth, he became very anxious for the recital of my
adventures also; which I gave him, that is to say, my
adventures in the Indian nation with Captain Brown;
whom, however, for my own sake I took care to
represent
as a mere fellow in misfortune, without
saying
any thing of his rascalities and piratical character;
and it seemed to me, that while equally diverted, he
was still more interested by them than he had even
been with the exploits of Captain Dare.
These representations satisfied him that Captain
Dare's statements were to be relied on; or, at least,
he said as much: upon which, Captain Dicky assumed,
in his turn, the character of questioner, and demanded
to know of his Excellency his intentions in regard
to himself and his Bloody Volunteers; whether they
were to be detained as prisoners of war, (in which
case, he begged the Intendant to observe, he
protested
against the detention, as an act unfriendly and
injurious to the United States, the ally of Spain,) or
whether they were to be treated as friendly visitants,
and allowed to depart immediately to their own
country; in which latter event, Dicky declared that,
having now found out how the land lay, he had no
doubt he could conduct his command to the
American
lines at Mobile.
To these interrogatories the Governor replied, with
a smile, that the affair being a very extraordinary
one, he did not feel himself at liberty to decide upon
the course necessary to be pursued, until he had
deliberated
further on the subject; but, for the present,
he said, he would consider Captain Dare only in the
light of a guest; and immediately requested the
honour
of his company to dinner; an invitation which,
on the faith of my being a
gentleman
volunteer, as
he said, with some emphasis on the phrase, he
extended
also to me.
But here another difficulty arose, founded on the
condition of our habiliments; in which we were the
more loath to appear at a gentleman's table, as Captain
Valdez had hinted the Governor had a very charming
daughter, who would, doubtless, preside on the
occasion
;
and I was obliged to confess on Dicky's
account, that, Captain as he was, he had not a shirt
to his back, having torn it into bandages for his
wounded volunteers; while I lamented, on my own
behalf, the ferocity of the Indians and the fury of the
briers, which had quite destroyed the beauty of a
handsome hunting frock I had bought at the
beginning
of the campaign. Colonel Aubrey laughed, and
said he was happy to have it in his power to relieve
us from so serious a dilemma; and with that, he
conducted
us into a chamber, where we were left in
charge of a negro servant, who supplied us with
linen from his master's wardrobe, and the means of
making a very gentlemanly and luxurious toilet.
And by and by another slave made his appearance,
bearing for my use a handsome military frock; which,
as it very nearly fitted me, I fancied the Governor
had obtained from some juvenile officer, to serve my
purpose, until I could fit myself out in a manner
becoming
a gentleman volunteer.
Having completed our toilet very much to the
satisfaction
of both, and rejoined the courteous
Intendant
,
we were immediately conducted by him into a
sumptuous saloon, where we found a table already
spread, with many black servants around it; besides
whom, there where three other persons in the room,
one an old man in a clergyman's dress, his
excellency's
chaplain; the second a stiff and starched
matron
,
whom I took for a duenna, but who proved to
be merely the
casra
, or housekeeper; and the third
a young lady, the fair daughter, as I could well
believe, of the Intendant. But, heaven and earth!
what was my amazement and confusion, when,
looking
bashfully up into the face of the
seorita
, who
received the two strangers with graceful courtesies,
I beheld the beautiful somnambulist, the Spanish
girl, to whose gratitude or humanity I had owed
my escape from Mr. Bloodmoney's house, on the
memorable night of the burglary! She recognised
me at the same moment, and her confusion was
almost as great as my own; though, with me, to
surprise
was added the fear and anticipated shame of
exposure: in a moment, thought I to myself, with
such thrills of dismay and anguish as I had never
before felt, `I become, instead of a gentleman
volunteer
,
a rascally housebreaker, angrily and
ignominiously
expelled from the Intendant's house,
perhaps
consigned to a Spanish prison.
At that very moment of discovery, Colonel
Aubrey, who had already presented Captain Dicky
to his daughter, was in the act of commending me,
el Seor Voluntario
, as he called me, to her notice.
He smiled at my agitation, as supposing it, perhaps,
the mere bashfulness of a gawky boy; but when he
saw that his daughter shared my confusion, he was
struck with astonishment, which immediately
darkened
into suspicion and displeasure.
How, Isabel! he cried with a frown: you
have then seen the young man before?
Si, padre mio querido!
yes, my dear father,
cried the lady, with a voice whose faltering tones
cut me to the soul, and I thought I should have sunk
through the floor; for the next word, and all must
be revealed, and the poor housebreakerFy! I
thought of Captain Brown and the Indian stakes on
the banks of the Tallapoosa, and I wished the
Creeks had finished their work, and burned us alive
him
for his villany in making me a burglar, and
me
, if for no other purpose than to save me the
humiliation of the present moment.
But the humiliation endured
only
for a moment:
the voice of Isabel ceased to falter, her eye to dwell
upon the floor; and the angelic creaturefor such
she now appearedadded, with equal firmness and
address, I have seen him, my dear father; and I
owe it; perhaps, to the young gentleman that I am
now here alive before you! It was in Mr.
Bloodmoney's
house: I wandered in my sleep
Santa
Maria!
I shall never wander in sleep again!a
robber was in the house: he seized me; andand
Yes,
mi padre!
she cried with animation, this
young man saved me from his murderous clutches!
At this dreadful story, for dreadful it seemed to all.
Colonel Aubrey turned as pale as a ghost, the
ecclesiastic
crossed himself, the
casra
fetched a half
shriek, the negroes rolled their eyes, and Dicky
Dare, giving me a nudge on the ribs, whispered
eagerlyI say, by Julius Csar, what's all this
the girl's talking about?
Seized by a robber! at last ejaculated the
Intendant
;
your life endangered!in Mr.
Bloodmoney's
house too? and I not told a word of it!
Alas! cried Isabel; the Seor Bloodmoney
was so much affected that such a thing should
happen
to me in his house, and the Seora his wife so
deeply afflicted, so much afraid of your anger, that,
at her entreaty, I promised, before we sailed, you
should not know of it; and, though loath to conceal
any thing from my dear father, I should not have
told you what may be of disadvantage to the Seor
Bloodmoney to be known, (though, indeed, it was
not his fault, but the audacious villany of the
robber
,)had
it not been for my surprise at so
suddenly
seeing the young gentleman who rescued
me.
What an amazing transition in my position, as
well as feelings! From a burglar, I was, as by a
touch of magic, converted into a hero; and from
emotions of terror and disgrace I passed into
sensations
of the most rapturous delight and exultation.
My original feelings towards the lovely Isabel were,
as I have long since confessed, of a highly romantic
and tender character; and such was the nature of
those which now seized me, that I felt an almost
irresistible impulse to catch her in my arms, as the
scoundrel Brown had done, and profess I know not
how much of love and gratitude. And perhaps I
might, in the fervour of the moment, have committed
myself by some such demonstrations of affection,
had not Colonel Aubrey been prompted by a similar
impulse in favour of myself; whom he immediately
caught in his arms, calling me the preserver of his
child, his friend, his benefactor, and I know not
what beside.
But I
do
know that I had at that moment some
idea of what might be the feelings of a modest young
woman in a man's arms, by experiencing those of a
modest young man in a similar predicament. I was,
in a word, very anxious to get out of them,
notwithstanding
all the Intendant's obliging expressions;
and perhaps I blushed the harder, after the embrace
was over, for Dicky Dare, whose curiosity was
waxing
hot to penetrate the mysteries of my good
fortune
,
giving me a second nudge and whisper,I
say, by Julius Csar, what was the old gentleman
hugging you for? And why the dense don't we sit
down to dinner, before it spoils by standing?
CHAPTER XIX.
In which Robin Day makes a rapid progress in the regards of the
fair Isabel.
It
seemed as if Colonel Aubrey divined the
meaning
of Captain Dicky's questions, or, at least, the
latter one; for banishing his fervour with a smile, he
bade us sit down; adding, that from all I had
told him of my forest feats, he did not doubt I would
prefer a good dinner to all the fine words he could
utter, or the warm embraces he could give me.
But as soon as the reverend
padre
had delivered a
benediction on the meal, and we had taken our seats,
he renewed the subject, and requested that his
daughter
would now inform him of the particulars of the
adventure in which I had played a part so
interesting
and questionable,
But Isabel looked again embarrassed, and gave
me a quick uneasy glance, while she replied:
Indeed, my father, she said, I have told you
nearly all I know. As to the robber, he was a vile
fellow, a sailor Mr. Bloodmoney informed me,
who had applied to him to have the command of
the vessel, which it was supposed Mr. Bloodmoney
was equipping as a privateer; and the wretch, to
convince Mr. Bloodmoney he was the best man for
his purpose, assured him he had passed his life in an
employment, which is doubtless the best school for
privateersmen,piracy;nay, that he was a famous
villain too, called Tiger-cat, or Hell-cat, or some
such name of renown
Hah! said Colonel Aubrey, there was some
such fellow in the gulf here, that I have heard
of;
El Gato
I think they call him, and sometimes
El Infernal
. But they said he was marooned or
murdered by his own men, because too
bloody-mided
a villain even for a pirate. And this fellow
would have commanded the brig then? What said
Bloodmoney to that?
Oh, replied the damsel, he would have none
of him, and threatened, besides, to hand him over
to the police. But Mr. Bloodmoney did not, in
reality, believe he was the rogue he so freely
professed
to be, thinking that that was a mere
braggadocio
,
crack-brained piece of bantering; and he
threatened him with the police only to get rid of
him. But, however this might be, the man broke
into the house that very night, collecting with
unexampled
audacity all the plate and other valuables;
with which he would undoubtedly have got off
undisturbed
,
had it not been for my misfortune in
walking in my sleep, and so stumbling upon him in
the midst of his operations. He was seized and
overpowered, yet made his escape, after dangerously
stabbing a watchman, who had been called in from
the street to take charge of him. And this, my dear
father, added the maiden, giving me another uneasy
glance, is all I know of the man; for the brig sailed
away from Philadelphia with me a few days after.
All this is very well, quoth the Intendant;
but you say nothing of my young friend here;
who, I presume, is a friend or connection of Mr.
Bloodmoney's?
Yes, sirI believe so, said the young lady,
Vol. II.14
giving me a third, and very piteous look. But as I
had never seen him before, and sailed away
immediately
after
Never seen him before! said Colonel Aubrey
with surprise; upon which, I, feeling that it was
necessary to prevent his astonishment going any
further, and perceiving that the fair Isabel was no
longer able to help me, hastened to explain that I
was, in reality, neither friend nor kinsman of Mr.
Bloodmoney, and that I had never been in his house
before the eventful night; but that I was on my way
to him with letters of recommendation and credit
from a gentleman, Dr. Howard, who was his
connection
,
and my friend.
Yes, cried Isabel, here eagerly interrupting
me: Dr. Howard came himself, soon afterwards;
and Mr. Bloodmoney told me he was his kinsman,
and a man of great wealth and respectability.
Encouraged by this interruption of the young
lady, who, I could not but see, was as anxious as
myself to make the most of every favourable
circumstance
,
and to avoid all unfavourable ones, I
proceeded
to assure the Intendant, that a strange
accident
,
(and so it
was
a strange accident,) together
with my ignorance of the city, and other
circumstances
,
had prevented my reaching Mr.
Bloodmoney's
house until a late hourin fact, when all
were asleep; but that I should never regret the
irregularity of a visit which had enabled me to be
of service to the young lady, his daughter.
Nor I neither, by my faith, said Colonel
Aubrey, warmly. But I wonder Bloodmoney did
not inform me of the affair, were it only to afford
me an opportunity to show what kind of gratitude
was due to the preserver of my Isabel.
He then asked me what was my relationship to
Dr. Howard; to which Ibeing seized with a devil
of mendacity and deception, for I was ashamed to
confess my humble origin in the presence of the fair
Isabelreplied that it was a very distant one; but
added (what I was not ashamed to confess,) that I
owed every thing, my education and even my
subsistence
,
to his benevolence. And I would have
added more in his praise, had not Colonel Aubrey,
with great delicacy, immediately shifted the
subject
,
by asking jocularly, whether I had gone to
Mr. Bloodmoney for the purpose of turning
privateersman
,
like honest Captain Hellcat?
Upon my replying that, in fact, I had, he looked
surprised, and laughed very heartily, and informed
me that the vessel was no privateer after all; that he
had bought her, through Mr. Bloodmoney, and
fitted her out for his own purposes; that she lay
then in the port, though under another name; for he
had called her
La Querida
, because she brought
back to him his
querida
, or beloved Isabel, after
two years of absence; which the young lady had
passed in Philadelphia, completing her education.
He then alarmed me by a question, which was,
doubtless, very natural and appropriate to the
occasion
what,
since I had set out to go to sea, had
turned me from my purpose, and converted me
into a soldier? But I got over the difficulty by
hinting that my friend and schoolmate Dicky Dare
had persuaded me to follow him to the warsand,
truly, had he not?an explanation that perfectly
satisfied
the Intendant. And from that moment,
giving
over his questions, he addressed himself to the
business of the table, bestowing a due share of his
attentions upon Captain Dicky, who had been
previously
rescued from neglect by the fair Isabel
addressing
him in English, and thus giving him an
opportunity to enter into conversation without the
intervention of an interpreter.
At the dessert, in which we were feasted with the
delicious fruits of the tropics, fresh brought from
the neighbouring island of Cuba, the reverend
padre
left the table to attend, I presumed, to some
clerical
duty: and, presently after, the servants were
discharged; and we were left a little party of four
persons, who were enjoying ourselves very
agreeably
in conversation; when a messenger came
running
post haste from the fort, with an account that
the Bloody Volunteers, for some reasons best known
to themselves, suspicious perhaps, from the long
absence of their captain, that some foul play was
intended them had burst into a mutiny, which it was
feared would terminate in bloodshed. Upon this,
the Intendant got up in haste, with Captain Dicky,
whom he invited to go with him and appease the
tumult; committing me, who, he said, might
remain
to entertain his daughter, to her sole charge
and keeping.
The moment the two had left the room, Isabel,
starting up and advancing a step or two towards me,
exclaimed, in low and hurried, but earnest tones, and
in EnglishSeor! lay no misconstruction upon
what I have said and done. If I have deceived my
fatherif I have descended to evasion, and almost
to falsehood, know that I was paying a debt of
gratitude
,
which makes
me
forget things my father
could not have judged but with harshness. I lament
that one so young, so warmly befriended, so
seemingly
full of promise, should have fallen into evil
hands and practices; but fear not exposure from me,
who neither can nor will betray you.
I was confounded by the words and manner of
the beautiful girl, who, it was apparent, thought me
a rogue in earnest. A moment before, I fancied I
required nothing but an opportunity to speak to her
in private, to retrieve my character in her eyes, and
convince her I was no robber. But on a sudden I
felt it might be no such easy matter.
Alas, I cried, in extremity, have you seen
Dr. Howardwas he at Mr. Bloodmoney's house
and can you still think me a burglar? Did
he
think me one?
What otherwise could he think? replied Isabel,
firmly; what ought he to have thought, after what
had preceded? After a beginning in murder
Ah! you perceive, he told us all! And, though he
softened the circumstances, and the poor man did
not actually die
M'Goggin did not die? Thank Heaven for
that! cried I; for that was the only thing which
to myself seemed like crime. And yet that was no
murder, had the wretch died twenty times over:
and, if you know the circumstances of that
unfortunate
affair, you must be aware it was a mere silly
schoolboy scheme of vengeance, in which a serious
injury to the pedagogue was neither desired nor
intended
.
But, said Isabel, there was still more they
spoke of: thatbut it seemed to me, even then, too
extraordinary for belief:there were people who
charged you and your companion with a highway
robbery upon a poor sailor, on the road to
Philadelphia
!
Oh, the confounded wagoners! it all arose from
them, I have no doubt. And with that, I told the
whole story to the young lady; who, listening at
first with eager interest, at last, when I came to
describe the audacious trick of Brown, by which,
the inconveniences of the crime were transferred
14*
from the robber to the robbed, suddenly burst into
a most unromantic fit of laughter.
And this impudent sailor, then, she cried,
was the same man, the fellow with the horrid
name, from whom youBut gratitude makes me
too readily take sides with you! How, seor, she
demanded, more seriouslyhow comes it that
you are the next moment found in company with
this man, whom you already knew to be a
robber
,
in Mr. Bloodmoney's houseor, indeed any
where?
Upon this, I told her how, having changed his
clothes and removed his hideous beard, he had made
me believe he was Mr. Bloodmoney himself, robbed
me of my letter of introduction and money, carried
me into Mr. Bloodmoney's house; in short, I told
her the whole of that unlucky adventure, which
moved her to as much risibility as before; though
she soon reproved her mirth by the expression,
Alas, seor! it is not well to laugh at an adventure,
which, however ridiculous, was the cause, and
perhaps
is yet, of pain to your friends, and of injury to
your good name. And it is still less proper for
me
to laugh, she added, since it brought me relief
at a moment of need and terror.
I told her, with much fervour, I cared not how
much she laughed at my folly, provided she was
satisfied of my innocence. Upon which, she said my
story was too ridiculous not to be true; that it
explained
all the circumstances of my case very
perfectly
;
and that she believed it. And, indeed, said
she, with charming frankness, I always thought
there must be some delusion in the matter, and that
you could not be a robber in reality; because you
did not look like one, and because, you know, you
told me so.
CHAPTER XX.
Robin Day is surprised by the appearance of Skipper Duck and
other old friends.
I thought
at that moment, I had never seen so
celestial a creature, and felt prompted to say I know
not what silly things, and perhaps should have said
them, had not the maiden requested me, with an
enchanting smile, to inform her what other
extraordinary
adventures, (for truly, said she, you seem
to have been born for extraordinary adventures,)
had followed my flight from Mr. Bloodmoney's.
I took up the tale accordingly, and had proceeded
as far as my unlucky mistake with the British
sailors
,
and the discovery of it, while marching into
battle with them against my own countrymen, an
incident which recalled the mirth of the beautiful
hearer; when Colonel Aubrey suddenly returned,
and being surprised at his daughter's merriment,
requested to know the cause of it. Oh, quoth
she, the Seor Day has been entertaining me with
the history of his surprising adventures, which I
hope, some time, (and here I thought she gave me
a significant look, besides emphasizing the word some
time) he will also relate to my dear father.
I shall be happy to hear all that the Seor Day
may think proper to relate, said the Intendant;
but, in the meanwhile, I must beg of him the
favour to attend me to the audience chamber,
where Here Isabel looked pale, and I, thinking
the summons must have some reference to the
Bloody Volunteers, interrupted him by hoping that
nothing unpleasant had resulted from their
quarrelsome
outbreak.
Nothing at all, said he: they had, some how,
got into their heads a ridiculous idea that they were
to be sent off to South America, to be condemned
to the mines. But all is now quiet; and Captain
Dare, who chooses to remain with them awhile,
will presently return to favour us with his
agreeable
society. He added, that the business at which
he begged my assistance, was the examination of
several men, the crew of a small vessel, which had
that day entered the port under suspicious
circumstances
,
but who claimed to be good and honest
American citizens; in which case it would, doubtless,
be advantageous, as well as agreeable, to them to
have a gentleman, their own countryman, present
as an interpreter. The suspicious circumstances
were chiefly the want of sufficient papers, and of
cargo; the disproportion between the crew and vessel,
the latter being a mere coasting shallop, while the
former comprised eighteen or twenty men, of whom
nearly two thirds were negroes; and, what was more
suspicious still, a great piratical looking long-tom,
stowed away with a quantity of small arms and
ammunition
,
in her hold. In short, Colonel Aubrey
suspected the vessel to be a pirate, a stray member
perhaps of the fraternity then known to exist under
Lafitte at Barrataria Bay; though the master, or chief
man among them, insisted he was an honest
negro-trader
from the Carolinas, come to try his luck, with
a small cargo of slaves, among the Spaniards of the
Gulf.
Having given me this explanation, the Intendant
led me, all loath to leave the charming Isabel, into
the audience chamber; where among a number of
soldiers, who kept guard over them, were six or
seven men in sailor's clothes, whose appearance
startled me a little out of my propriety; because some
of them I immediately recognised as my quondam
friends of the Jumping Jenny, the followers of honest
Tom Gunner; and another look showed me, standing
foremost among them, and looking excessively
dogged
,
yet discomposed, the detestable Skipper Duck;
whom, of all the men in the world, I least expected
to stumble upon in this remote quarter. When I
first caught sight of the fellow, he was stealing a
glance at the Intendant that expressed perhaps more
than a rogue's usual fear of the face of Justice; but
when, rolling his eyes askant from Colonel Aubrey,
they fell upon me, I was myself astonished at the
actual dismay into which his uneasiness was
immediately
converted.
What! cried Colonel Aubrey, you seem to
know the fellow?
Before I could reply, one of the sailors, having
caught sight of me, exclaimed, pointing me out to
his messmates, I'm blasted if that an't our little
fighting-cock, Day, that was with us in the
Chesapeake
,
and was snatched up by the blasted Yankees
at Norfolk!
These words covered me with confusion; for I
knew not, in the moment, what unlucky
construction
the Intendant might put upon this portion of
my history, unless told him in my own version; and
the embarrassment was increased by his suddenly
giving me a sharp look, and saying, he thought it
proper to inform me, that, although long years of
disuse had made it a very painful and disagreeable
task to him to
speak
English, it was nevertheless
his mother tongue, and he retained sufficient
knowledge
of it to understand every word that was
spoken. Yet I recovered my courage in a
moment
,
upon reflecting that neither Skipper Duck
nor any of his men could accuse me of murder, or
highway robbery, or burglary; and immediately
replied
Seor,
I have no objection you should
understand any thing, or all, that these men may
say to me, or I to them. In truth, I
do
know them;
this fellow,pointing to Skipper Duck, who still
looked frightened out of his witsin particular,
who is as foul a knave as the sun ever shone
on. The others are, or were, British sailors, with
whom, and with others, their comrades, it was my
misfortune to be compelled to bear armsor rather
to
appear
to bear arms, against my own
countrymen
on the Chesapeake; an adventure which I was
but this moment engaged relating to the Seorita
Aubrey.
Ah! cried the Intendant; you told her? And
it was that she was laughing at? Upon my
assenting
to which, he looked pleased, and smiled,
declared he was impatient to hear my whole story,
and then requested I would inform him more
particularly
in regard to Duck and his accomplices.
I told him, that if the vessel was, as I supposed,
the Jumping Jenny, Duck was her skipper, and, I
believed, her owner;that she had been captured
by the British in the Chesapeake, manned, armed,
(whence, doubtless, the long-tom and the
ammunition
,)
and employed, with other similar vessels, in
their plundering expeditions; and that Duck had
served on board as their pilot; that he had been,
after a time, taken prisoner by the Americans, or
made his escape to them; at all events, he must
have told them a good story, as I had seen him,
apparently
at liberty, fighting with them against his
late employers, the British; and there ended my
knowledge of him and the Jumping Jenny. How
he got possession of her again, I knew not; but I
suspected he must have returned to her voluntarily;
and then, with the sailors who were now with him,
and who, it could scarce be doubted, were deserters,
had run away with her, at a convenient period,
when the rest of her crew, with their officers, were
ashore upon some adventure. As for the negroes,
I supposed they were slaves whom he had stolen
from their masters; or that they had been picked
up along shore, with other plunder, by his British
associates, and merely carried off by him, to make
his flight more profitable.
In this very reasonable explanation, I, at a future
period, learned I had exactly hit the truth; and,
indeed
,
upon examining them a little, Colonel Aubrey
was satisfied the sailors were deserters from the
British navy, and Skipper Duck a trader in stolen
goods: for which reason, he directed they should
be confined in the fort, to be surrendered, with the
vessel and slaves, to the first British commander
who should visit Pensacola.
But before he sent them away, I told him the
story of little Tommy, the son, I assured him of my
benefactor, Dr. Howard, the kinsman of his friend
Mr. Bloodmoney; and I immediately taxed Duck
to his face with having stolen him. The villain was
greatly disconcerted, and denied that Tommy was
Dr. Howard's son: but he admitted he was still on
board the vessel, having been, like the negroes,
thought too insignificant to be brought before the
Intendant
;
and Colonel Aubrey, who was much struck
and even affected, by the story, immediately gave
orders to have him brought to the house, declaring
he would find means to have him restored to his
father.
CHAPTER XXI.
In which Robin Day meets another surprise, and a perilous one;
which is succeeded by a story of much interest to the Intendant.
I now
thought I might return again to the society
of the enchanting Isabel; but Colonel Aubrey
informed
me he must beg my assistance in the
examination
of yet another American; adding, with a
smile, that he fancied I would meet another surprise,
and a pleasant one: for, said he, some of my
troopers have just brought in from the woods, where
they found him lost and famished, a poor man who
reports that he has just escaped from captivity and
torture among the Creeks; and, as they say he has
the appearance of an old sailor, it would not surprise
me if he should prove the poor fellow, your
companion
in flight.
The poor fellow, my companion in flight! A
pleasant surprise, indeed! I was horrified by the
announcement; for, not to say that the appearance
of Captain Brown had always boded me some new
misfortune, his entrance upon the present scene
could not be otherwise than dangerous to me. I
would gladly have dispensed with the interview,
but perceived I could not do so without awakening
suspicion. My hope was that the stranger should,
after all, prove not to be Brown, but some other
person unknown. But, alas, the hope was almost
Vol. II.15
immediately dispelled by the entrance of the poor
fellow, who proved to be Captain Jack Brown
himself, though sorely altered by famine and distress.
His appearance was emaciated and squalid, and even
his spirit seemed broken down by suffering; the
look of fearless self-possession and audacity had
deserted
his countenance, which now wore a hangdog
expression of suspicion and fear, enough to convince
any one he was a rogue; and I perceived it had but
an unfavourable effect upon Colonel Aubrey. I
might myself have been astonished at such a change
in the man, who seemed scarce able to look the
Intendant
in the face, had I been less occupied with
my own anxieties.
Well, cried the Intendant, is this the man?
Brown startled at the words, and looking round
him, caught sight of me, seemed astonished, and
then brightened up in a wonderful manner, as if
for I thought I could read what was passing in his
mindsatisfied that my presence would be of
advantage
to him. Ah! shiver me, Chowder, my
hearty! he cried, rushing forward and seizing me
very affectionately by the hand; and so you've
clear'd them blasted Injun niggurs after all, have
you?Tell him, he added in a whisper, which he
sought to conceal from the Intendant, and uttered
with great haste and vehemencetell him my name's
John Smith; or dn me, I'll murder you!Glad
to see you alive again;here he raised his voice,
and shook my hand with terrible ardour; glad
to see you afloat; for, sink me, I thought the red
rascals had sunk you to Davy Jones long ago.
With that, letting go his hold of me, he now, as
if quite restored to his courage, raised his eyes to
the Intendant's face, gave him a scrape of his foot;
and hitching up his trowsers, and otherwise putting
on the airs of a bluff old sailor, quite ignorant of
the forms and ceremonies of the world, he
exclaimed
,
Split my topsails! (axing your honour and
excellency's pardon,) if, so be there's no offence,
I'm an American sailor, sink me; and so I axes to
know what your honour and excellency means, by
making a prisoner of me? because how, I sails under
the stars and stripes, and I knows my rights, and,
split me, I sticks to 'em. But perhaps your honour
and excellency don't understand my lingo? which is
a thing whereof I am sorry, because as how, I don't
know no Spanish.
His honour and excellency surveyed the speaker
very earnestly, smiled faintly at his eloquence,
passed his hand thoughtfully across his brow, and
then surveyed him again; when, finally, turning to
me, he demanded with abruptness, Have you
known this man long?
Not long, seor, I replied, not disposed to
speak too much to the point: but he is the
fellowprisoner
I spoke of.
To my mind, he has an evil look, said the
Intendant; and methinks I have seen him before.
Do you know enough of him to answer for his
honesty?
Alas! what a question! I knew, perfectly well,
that Brown was a villain deserving the halter; but
the services he had rendered me among the Creeks,
and especially his manful attempt to snatch me from
the stake, even at the risk of his own life, dwelt
upon my memory, and I was loath to say any
thing to his prejudice. But to assume the
responsibility
of giving him a good name was entirely too
much for my gratitude.
I should be sorry, seor, I replied, to be
answerable for the honesty of any person, upon so
short an acquaintance.The answer stuck in my
throat; for I felt that, however evasive, it involved a
substantial falsehood.
His name, demanded Colonel Aubrey.
Really, said I, I am not certain I know even
that. He told me once it was Smith: butHere
Brown gave me a direful look of warning and
menace, which I disregarded; for I found that one
falsehood in his favour was all my conscience would
permitat other times, I understood him it was
Brown.
Brown! ejaculated the Intendant, starting
wildly from the chair, on which he had taken his
seat, and advancing towards Brown; who
immediately
putting a good face on the matter,
exclaimed
Ay, your honour, there's no gainsaying it;
that's name I sometimes sails under, and, mayhap,
have the best right to, because why, it belongs to
the family.
Brown! again cried Colonel Aubrey,
surveying
him with the utmost agitation. Can it be!
Is it possible? I knew the face. And yetand
yetAnd here the disorder of his spirits rendered
his expressions for a moment inarticulate; and he
sat down again upon the chair; from which,
however
,
he immediately afterwards sprang up,
exclaiming
,
Fellow, if you be
he
indeed, you must know
me. Look! My name is Aubrey! Seventeen
years have not yet changed me so far that you can
say you do not remember me?
Never saw your honour's excellency before in
all my life, said Brown, with great apparent
sincerity.
If you have lost all memory of
me
, said the
Intendant, seizing Brown by the arm, and pointing
to the portrait, of which I have before spoken,
hanging upon the wallIf you have lost all
memory of me,
him
, at least, you cannot have
forgotten!
I had been greatly struck by this singular turn of
affairs, and was burning with curiosity to know
what fate could have ever connected the affairs of
the Intendant with such a rogue as Brown. And,
it may be supposed, I looked on with a double
interest
when the portrait was referred tothat very
picture, or its duplicate, which, when I had pointed
Brown's attention to it, in Mr. Bloodmoney's house,
had discomposed him not a little, and drawn from
him the explanation, that it was an old friend of
his who had gone to Davy Jones long before.
It produced a somewhat similar effect upon him on
the present occasion; and he muttered, Ay!
I knows
him!
It looks just like him, when
But he interrupted himself. I knows
him
, he
repeated; poor gentleman. His name was
Mowbray
Aubrey! Aubrey! cried the Intendant, with a
smothered voice.
Well, it may be, said Brown, but I always
thought it was Mowbray; and, sure, his own brother,
the sodger, told us sothe skipper and mewhen
he bought us over to the sarvice. It was Aubrey,
or Mowbray; and, poor gentleman, the hellcats
(whereof I mean, the dd Spanish constables,) were
after him; because how, he was a traitor, or
conspirator
,
or whatsoever you call it; and so we sent the
boat, and took him off by night, him and the rest of
them and a whole chestful of money; and off went
the Sally Ann a bragging through blue water. Off
she went, and, split me, the blue water soon had the
best of her: she foundered, please your honour's
excellency
;
15*
and the skipper and the passengers, with
poor Mr. Aubrey, if so be that's his name, went
down with her to the bottom.
My miserable brother! cried the Intendant,
covering his face with his hands, and sinking
into
a chair. But starting up again, he demanded,
But how is this?
You
were savedothers were
saved
None but me and Tim Duck, said Brown: at
which name Colonel Aubrey eagerly demanded,
turning to meWhat! was not that the name of
the fellow, the captain of the sloop, just before us?
This question, which I answered in the
affirmative
,
not without alarm lest Duck should be sent for,
and immediately impeach my honest acquaintance,
had the effect of disturbing the latter likewise; so
that, forgetting his former assurance, that he knew no
Spanish, he hastened to exclaim, There's more
Ducks than swim on salt water; but this here fellow
can't be Tim Duck, because how, Davy Jones has
got him.Fortunately for Brown, the Intendant
was too much excited to notice the inconsistency; and
Brown, to secure his attention to less dangerous
subjects
,
immediately resumed his story.
None but me and Tim Duck, said he, stood
it out; because how, d'ye see, we took to the boat
the three men and me, which was the mate, and
was to be skipper next voyage, and the niggur-boy,
which jumped after us; and that was all of us when
we pushed off
What then! cried Colonel Aubrey, my poor
brother was abandoned, without an effort to save
him!
Why, d'ye see, quoth Brown, he
would
run
below after the younker; and just then, the schooner
took a lurch, and so we pushed off, and down she
went with himand the skipper too; for, blast me,
he was lying sick in his bunk, unable to help
himself
.
And so we pushed off in the boat, without
bread, water, or compass, and pitch'd about fourteen
days on a stretch; and two of the men, they died;
and says I to Tim Duck, says I, `Tim Duck, we
must draw lots;' and says he to me, `Let's do for
the niggur;' and so he killed the blacky; and we
lived on him six days; and then came the ship, the
Good Hope of Boston, and pick'd us up; and there,
shiver my timbers, your honour and excellency,
there's the end of the story.
It is not
yet
the end of it, said Colonel Aubrey,
with a stern voice. It is now seventeen years
since that vessel sailed out of her port, never more
to enter another; and up to this moment, not a word of
her fate was ever breathed to human being; and no
one but believed she had foundered at sea, and that
every soul on board had perished with her. How
comes it that neither you nor the fellow Duck, the
survivors
of the wreck, ever gave information of the
calamity
to any oneto owners or underwriters?
how could this have happened, if your story be true?
And, by Heaven, your silence throws a suspicious
character over what was before only deemed a
natural
accident of the sea. Speak, fellow: though
you pretend to have forgotten me, I remember you
welland I remember, too, there were persons who
said the mate of the Sally Ann had not always been
in so honest a vessel, and was not the safest man to
entrust with either a rich cargo or the life of a
wealthy passenger!
They lied then, dn their blood, cried
Brown, with great emphasis; for the mate of the
Sally Ann was as honest a lad, at her sailing, as ever
rose from the forecastle to the quarter-deck: and if
you're the gentleman, poor Mr. Mowbray's brother,
whereof I disremember, who made the bargain with
the skipper and me, and brought him and the
younker, and the young niggur, and the money,
aboard, you must know the old skipper said I was
to have the schooner next voyage, blast her, because
how, he was the owner, and he was old, and he
knew I was a man to be depended on. And as for
this here thing that surprises you, he added, very
bluffly, because as how your honour never heard
tell of the sinking of the schooner till now, why
sink me, that's matter soon settled. For, d'ye
see, the ship that pick'd up me and Tim Duck was
the Good Hope of Boston; and she was an Injieman
on her outward voyage; and so says Captain Jones,
her commander, to us, says he, `I'll send you back
to the States by the first return ship we meets, or
I'll drop you at the Cape;' but hang me, there was
no return ship we sees; and when we comes to the
Cape, there was nothing there; and the Good Hope
was short of hands, because she lost four men overboard
in a squall; and says Captain Jones to us, says he,
If you'll enter for the voyage, my boys, you shall
he well treated, and have pay from the time of
picking
up into the bargain. And so we entered for
the voyage, me and Tim Duck; but it was a blasted
unlucky voyage for all of us, for the ship she was
caught in a Typhoon, and wreck'd on the east coast
of Sumatra; and the Malays fell on us, curse 'em;
and them that wasn't drown'd they kill'd, and them
they didn't kill they captivated, whereof I, John
Brown, was one; but Tim Duck they kill'd. And
I was a slave among 'em twelve years, and they
treated me like a niggur: and a Dutch captain that
was there after pepper, he bought me for a barrel of
rum and two old muskets; but he said it was six
hundred dollars: and so when we comes to Batavia,
a Dutch judge there says I must sarve the Dutch
captain four years for the money; and I sarved him.
And when my time was out, I ships in the Dutch
ship call'd the Polly Frow for Amsterdam: and
there I ships in an American brig call'd the George
Washington, which fetches me right straight to
Boston, where I landed on the seventh day of May,
in this here year of Our Lord, after an absence of
seventeen years, or thereabouts. And then I tells
my story, and they logg'd it right away in the
newspapers
,
with the whole account of the sinking of the
Sally Ann; whereof nobody cared, because how,
the captain he was the owner, and not insured, and
his wife was married to another man. And, quoth
Brown, to whose relation I listened with mingled
wonder and distrust, having strong reasons of my
own to believe it was a tissue of falsehoods from
beginning to endif you axes to know how a
sailor like me comes into the hands of them cursed
Injuns; why here's the case, blast me: for my friends
they makes me up a purse in Boston, because of my
misfortunes, and so I starts off to try my luck a
pedlering
;
because, d'ye see, I've had enough of the
sea, sink me, and don't want to see no more of it.
And so I turns my back to it, and that fetched me
among the Injuns, and they snapp'd me up, pack
and all; and they fatted me up to make a feast of
me; whereof this young gentleman (meaning me)
will bear witness, because he was tied up with me.
And we broke loose, and sailed off in a canoe; and
she was wreck'd on a log; and we swum for it, him
one way, and me another, and so we parted
company
;
and I navigated the woods alone; and I'll be
hang'd, but I found it a crooked and dangerous
navigation
.
CHAPTER XXII.
A denoucment and catastrophe, and Robin Day loses the favour of
the Intendant, and is packed off to a fort for safe-keeping.
And
so ended the story; whichtold with an
appearance of great simplicity and truthseemed,
notwithstanding my disbelief of it, to carry
conviction
to the mind of Colonel Aubrey, and to remove
all the suspicious he had begun to entertain in
relation
to the real fate of his unfortunate brother. He
returned immediately to the subject of the wreck,
and asked a multitude of questions, to all which
Brown replied with so much readiness that it was
impossible not to believe that, upon this point of
his history, he was uttering at least
some
truth.
To the Intendant all his answers seemed as natural
as they were affecting; and having concluded his
melancholy inquisition, he turned to a servant, who
was near him, and bade him go fetch the Seorita
Isabel, that she might see with her own eyes the
man whoBut what else he said I heard not;
being so horrified at the idea of the young lady
being
brought into the room while Brown was in it,
that all my senses deserted me, and I stood such a
picture of consternation, that Colonel Aubrey,
starting
from the gloom into which he had fallen, asked
what ailed me, and if I were sick? Before I
could stammer out a replyand, in truth, I know
not what I intended to replythe anticipated
catastrophe
had arrived; the young Isabel had entered
the room, and cast her eyes upon Captain Brown;
who, astonished out of his prudence, ripped out a
hasty oath, with an equally profane addition;
Dn my blood! he cried, we goes to hll
now
in a hurricane! As for Isabel, whose
recollections
were perhaps stimulated by Brown's voice,
she immediately uttered a shriek and threw herself
into the Intendant's arms, crying,
El Gato! El
Gato!
It is the villain himself!
Great was the confusion produced by this turn of
events, so unexpected by all but unhappy me. Even
Colonel Aubrey looked petrified for a moment;
though, the next, he ordered the soldiers, who had
brought Brown in, to secure him, which they did,
Brown submitting with a very good grace; but all
the while protesting he was no more El Gato, as
they call'd him, than he was Davy Jones himself.
We shall inquire into that, as well as other
things, quoth the Intendant, turning from Brown
to me, whom he regarded with a stern countenance.
So! young man! he cried: you concealed
from me your knowledge of this man, of his acts,
and character! pretended not to know in him the
ruffian from whom you had rescued my daughter!
Alas, sir, I cried, if you will allow me to
explain
.
We will allow you an opportunity to do so at
another moment. At present
But he was interrupted by Isabel, who starting
from her terrors, caught him by the hand,
exclaiming
eagerly, Oh, my dear father, the young
gentleman
is innocent. If I had only told you all, at
first!
Hah! cried the Intendant, bending a scowling
eye even upon herhave
you
, too, united with
him to deceive me?
The fair Isabel stammered out an excuseshe
could explain allshe always meant to explain all.
The Intendant arrested her further speech, by a look
full of the most penetrating inquiry, which he
immediately
after extended to me. Then waving
Isabel imperiously to silence, he directed the
soldiers
to carry Brown to the fort, and guard him
well. And
you
, seor, he added, addressing
himself to me, will do me the favour to
accompany
them, and lodge to-night with your
companions
.
Appearances, as well as your suspicions, are
against me, seor, I said, gathering hope from the
assurance that I left a friend behind me in the
beautiful
Isabel: but I trust yet to convince you I am
only the most unlucky person in the world, and
nothing worse.
And with these words, and a stolen glance at
Isabel
,
who looked the picture of grief and humiliation,
I stoleor sneaked, which is perhaps the proper
wordout of the room and house, in which, a few
moments before, I had felt so proud and romantic;
and followed, with Brown, (who, instead of
expressing
compunction for being the cause of my present,
as of nearly every other, misfortune, indulged
sundry
hearty execrations upon what he called my
disobedience
of orders in not passing him off for Mr.
John Smith only,) to the fortress, which I justly
regarded
as a prison. At its gates, I met my friend and
commander, Captain Dicky, returning to the mansion
whence I had been so ignominiously banished; and
informing him in a few words of my mishap, I
authorised
,
and indeed begged him, since no other
course now remained to me, to acquaint Colonel
Aubrey with the whole history of my connection
with Captain Brown, to convince him I was not in
reality the accomplice, but the victim of that worthy
personage. I had no idea, at the moment, that he
could have any other reason for his severity than the
suspicion of my being a knave and the confederate of
Brown. Had I been a little older and wiser, I might
have seen an additional cause in an equally natural
and more painful apprehension, awakened by the
good understanding that seemed to exist between the
fair Isabel and myself.
It was nearly night when I entered the fort; where
the appearance of Captain Brown excited a good
deal of curiosity among the Spaniards of the
garrison
,
who crowded around to view a rogue bearing a
name so formidable and renowned as
El Gato;
but
I thought they expressed greater admiration than
horror at the sight of him. Nor were there any
greater pains taken to secure him from flight or
mischief
than to clap a pair of light manacles upon his
wrists; after which, he was suffered to ramble up and
down the fort, conversing with the soldiers of the
garrison, (which was not a numerous or particularly
well disciplined one,) and with the prisoners
Skipper
Duck and his comrades, who were not fettered
at all, and a number of convictsdegraded soldiers
who idled about, each with a cannon ball chained to
his leg.
My first care, upon entering the fort, was to look
for little Tommy; but the Governor had sent for
him, and he was already gone. I then sought out
and found my companions in arms, the Bloody
Volunteers
,
who sat retired, like Milton's philosopher
devils, not yet entirely cured of their suspicions and
fears of Spanish faith and South American gold mines.
I did all I could to convince them their apprehensions
Vol. II.16
were groundless, and that they would, in all
probability
,
be, in a day or two, released and furnished
with guides to conduct them to Mobile: but, by and
by, growing weary of arguing with men who had
made their minds up to their own opinions, and
tiring the sooner, perhaps, that I was in a very
melancholy
and contemplative mood, I walked away
from them to a corner, where I could sit by myself,
and build castles in the moon, which was rising over
the bay, and changing a leaden twilight into a night
of silver.
My meditations were soon broken in upon by
Brown, who opened the conversation by assuring me
with sundry oaths, he had a regard for me, and meant
to help me out of my present difficulties. He then
showed me that his manacles were loose; and
swearing
he was not going to stay to be strung up by that
blasted old skurmudgeon, Aubrey, whom he had
help'd to a fortune, curse him, he informed me that
he designed making his escape from the fort, and,
out of his friendship for me, would restore me to
liberty also.
I was astonished at what seemed the audacity of
such a design, and asked how he could hope to break
from a garrisoned fort, with centries at the gates and
along the walls? He replied, that the garrison
was nothingthe officers were all dressing for a
ball, which the Intendant was to give them that
evening (Alas! thought I; but for this vile
Brown, I might have had the honour of dancing
with the charming Isabel!)half the soldiers
had already slipped away to seek their own
diversions
;
as for the centries, the lubbers would go to
sleep, as soon as the officers were off; and finally,
he assured me he had friends in the fort, who would
make escape an easy matter. I asked what was to
be done, after escaping? was he to fly back to the
Indians again? or abscond about the town to be
discovered
and again imprisoned? Upon which he
invoked a blessing on my brain of mud and
molasses
,
as he called it, and told me he had struck up a
league with his old friend Duck, who
was
Tim
Duck, for all his blasted lies to the governor, and
that they were to escape together in the Jumping
Jenny, which was lying hard by the fort.
Although I listened to this account not without
interest, I felt my curiosity moved by the reference
to Skipper Duck, as connected with the subject of
the Sally Ann; and I could not help asking him,
if there was then no truth in what he had told
Colonel Aubrey? All a blasted yarn, said he,
from beginning to end. But you were mate
of the schooner, and must know whether she really
foundered or notand whether the fate of Colonel
Aubrey's brother was as you represented it.
What's that
your
business? said he, sharply:
stick to things that concern you, sink me; and
stand ready for cutting loose from the fort,
whenever
I gives the order.
I told Captain Brown, I had no objections to
his making his escape, if he could, and that nothing
would give me more satisfaction than to be certain
I should never more see him again in the world;
that as to escaping with him, I had no intentions
that way at all:
I
was under no fears of being strung
up by Colonel Aubrey, as he professed to be; and
was content to remain where I was.In short, I
told him I would not fly with him. Upon which,
he called me sundry hard names, swore, with a
diabolical
grin, that when I knew him better, I would
find the first thing for a first lieutenant to do was to
obey orders, and then, to my great satisfaction, left
me to my meditations, and to my castle-building,
which, as it is always a seductive employment, and
was then the most agreeable one I could engage in,
I continued for an hour longer; at which period my
fancies began to flag, and my head to nod with all
the grace of a Chinese Mandarin's, in the face of her
ladyship the moon.
CHAPTER XXIII.
Robin Day escapes against his will from the fort, and finds himself
a third time on board the Jumping Jenny.
I was
, in a word, on the point of falling asleep,
the night, though a late November one, being,
in that benignant climate, quite warm and agreeable;
and I had just begun to dream I saw my friend
Captain
Dare dancing a waltz with the beautiful Isabel,
in the midst of a splendid assemblage of ladies and
gentlemen, who were all saying what a handsome
couple they were; when the rage and envy and
jealousy into which the visionary spectacle threw
me, were suddenly dispelled by a couple of men
jerking me up by the elbows, bidding me, in
Spanish
,
follow them, and then, without waiting for me
to obey, hurrying me away I knew not whither.
My first idea was that they were soldiers of the
fort, conducting me to some lock-up place for the
night; my next, finding they were hastening me to
the gate of the fort, was that they were messengers
despatched by Colonel Aubrey to invite me again
to his presence; a notion extremely agreeable, as it
convinced me the representations of Captain Dicky,
together with those of the Seorita Isabel, had fully
succeeded in restoring me to his favour.
Nor was this flattering assurance dispelled until I
suddenly found myself upon the shore of the bay,
16*
where were a number of men crowding into a small
boat, and another, nearly empty, rowing with
muffled oars from a shallop, that lay anchored a little
way from the beach. That shallop, my fears told
me, was the Jumping Jenny, and my two unknown
friends, it was plain, were conducting me to her.
I endeavoured to come to a stop, assuring my
conductors I was not one of the escaping party,
did not choose to run away, and would go back if
if they pleased, to the fort; upon which they
displayed
a brace of glittering knives, and one of them
said, in Spanish, I might go to the mire, for all he
cared, (which is a polite way they have in Spanish
of telling you you may go to a much worse place,)
while the other swore a terrible Castilian oathhe
would eat my soul, if I gave them any further
trouble. There was no resisting such an oath, two
Spanish knives, a pair of whiskered visages that
looked uncommonly ferocious in the moonlight;
and I therefore yielded, and, with a heavy heart,
stepped into the boat, which, three minutes
afterwards
,
I exchanged for the deck of the Jumping
Jenny.
Are you there, lieutenant, dn my blood?
cried Captain Brown, whom I had not before seen,
but who now gave me a grin and a squeeze of the
hand.
Captain Brown, said I, intending to
remonstrate
with him for thus carrying me off against my
will; but was cut short by his saying, in tones too
diabolically emphatic to be resisted, Hold your
jaw, you(But I omit the epithet,)or I'll fry
you for supper! and I saw him no more for
several
minutes; during which he was busily engaged
restoring order among a great number of men who
crowded the deck, and getting the Jumping Jenny
under way. The latter purpose was effected with
surprising rapidity; and in a moment, as it seemed
to me, the sloop was under full sail, driving with a
favourable wind down the bay.
The moon, which, until this period, was
extremely
bright, revealing the objects on shore with
great distinctness, was now suddenly overcast with
cloudsa fortunate circumstance, as it proved; for
presently a great hubbub was heard arising in the
fort, which we were fast leaving behind us; and by
and by several cannons were fired off, the balls of
which came dancing along the water at no great
distance from us, and perhaps would have come still
closer, had the gunners been favoured with a better
light to direct their aim. Rockets were also let off,
and these were presently answered by others that
appeared flying in the air above the fort at the
Barrancas
,
as it was called; a position a few miles below
Pensacola, and just at the entrance of the bay, which
it was supposed to command.
Upon this, there began to be some confusion and
indications of alarm among my fellow fugitives,
which Captain Brown, who seemed to have assumed
the command of the vessel, attempted to remove
by cursing and swearing; failing in which, he threw
open the hatches, and directed all who were afraid
of their carcasses, to descend into the hold; and if
the spirit of his crew was to be determined by the
readiness with which the invitation was accepted, it
was certain three fourths of the company were not
heroes; for just so many of them immediately
vanished from the deck.
My own inclinations, notwithstanding that it
might be supposed my experience in the wars had
robbed me of all faint-heartedness, were also in
favour of a descent into the hold; but a sense of
shame withheld me, not to say that I was conscious
there could be, in reality, little protection from
danger in such a place, on board so small a vessel.
Anxiety, moreover, to ascertain the destination of
the sloop, and the designs of Captain Brown, which
I feared might be none of the most virtuous or
lawful, kept me upon the deck; and I watched the
first opportunity to accost him again, demanding
whither we were bound. To hll! quoth
Captain
Brown; ordering me a second time, in the
most ferocious tones, to hold my tongue, which I
did; for I saw he was in no humour for trifling.
Indeed, he seemed to have been suddenly changed
into another man, and was, withal, so grum, and
crusty, and savage, that I thought it was my best
plan to keep out of his way as much as possible for
the remainder of the night.
I accordingly left the quarter-deck, where I had
previously taken my stand, and went to the bow of
the vessel, where was a group of men, some of them,
as I knew by their voices, the comrades of Skipper
Duck, and others Spaniards, who had their eyes
directed towards the Barrancas fort, which we were
fast approaching, though endeavouring, to pass it
at as great a distance as the width of the channel
would permit. As we drew nigh, they began to fire
upon us, but did us no harm, until, by some
mischance
,
the Jumping Jenny was run upon a shoal,
where she lay nearly an hour, until the rising of the
tide floated her off; and during that time, the
gunners
of the fort, having a stationary object to aim at,
and occasional moonlight to direct them, succeeded in
striking us with several balls, one of which knocked
a great hole into the cabin and killed a man who
had taken refuge there; while another, still more
unfortunately, as Captain Brown, judging by his
execrations, seemed to regard it, carried away the
bowsprit, by which the Jumping Jenny was very
seriously disabled. The mischief was repaired in
some way or other by the exertions of Brown and
the sailors; so that presently, the tide floating us
clear of the shoal, we were able to make way against
the current, to get out of reach of the fort, and finally
to proceed to sea.
As soon as we were beyond the range of the
Barrancas guns, all hands were called up to assist
in further repairs that were found to be needed;
and I had now an opportunity of making my
remarks
upon the crew, whose numbers, for there were
nearly forty of us altogether, had previously filled
me with surprise. I had already distinguished the
voices of Duck's crew of British deserters; I now
saw that Duck himself was among them, and
apparently
upon pretty good terms with Captain Brown;
and I had some reason to dread the fury of his
revengeful
temper; but he was too busy to notice me.
I was next struck with the appearance of twelve or
thirteen negroes, all very likely fellows, whose
awkwardness with their legs and hands proved they
were too little accustomed to salt water to be pirates,
as Colonel Aubrey had been inclined to suspect
them, while their coarse tow-linen garments,
resembling
those in which I had seen the negroes so
commonly
dressed in Virginia, convinced me that they
were, as I had suspected, slaves whom Duck had
stolen or seduced away from their masters. Besides
these, there were nine or ten Spaniards, most
ferocious-looking
fellows, in whom I fancied I recognised
the ball and-chain prisoners, or felons, of the fort;
and my suspicions were correct, for as it afterwards
proved, there was but one honest fellow among them,
if such I may call a soldier who had been an ancient
comrade of Brown, and was easily seduced by him
to desert his post as a sentry at the fort-gate, and
assist in the escape of all the prisoners who were
desirous of deliverance.
Last of all came creeping from the hold, and I
was confounded at the sight of them, my old friends
the Bloody Volunteers; who, as I soon learned from
them, had been imposed upon by Brown, or his
confederates, to believe that the Spanish governor
had ordered them all to be shot at sunrise; that
Captain
Dicky sanctioned, or ordered their flight in the
Jumping Jenny; and finally, that the Jumping Jenny
was to carry them round to Mobile; at which
American
town, they were assured they would certainly
arrive, at the furthest, in twenty-four hours. I
assured
them privately, that two thirds of the story
told them were undoubtedly false; that the governor
could not have ordered them to be shot; nor could
Captain Dicky have sanctioned, or even known of
their escape; and as for the remaining third, I
feared that was as false as the others, and that the
Jumping Jenny was more like to carry us to
Barrataria
Bay, among the freebooters, than to an honest
place like Mobile.
The Bloody Volunteers were indignant at the
idea, and Corporal Pigeon, a corageous young fellow,
the only non-commissioned officer (except the
Captain
,)
who had survived the Indian war, began to
hint that we were twelve of us, who, if we stood
together, might take the question as what port the
Jumping Jenny should sail to, into our own hands,
and to swear, he, for one, would never go to such a
place as Barrataria Bay; when the vessel, coming
into rough water, began to pitch and roll, the Bloody
Volunteers all fell deadly sick, and Corporal Pigeon
declared, with woful qualms, the Jumping Jenny
might carry him to the bottom of the seait was
all now indifferent to him.
CHAPTER XXIV.
The Jumping Jenny hoists the black flag, attacks and captures a
superior vessel; and Robin Day finds himself a pirate.
With
all the repairs that could be given her, the
Jumping Jenny made such slow progress that, by
daylight, we were not more than ten or fifteen
miles distant from the land, with the wind, which
had suddenly chopped about, blowing us right back
to Pensacola. And to add to our uneasiness, we
could perceive a sail standing out from the bay,
which the Spaniards said could be no other than the
Governor's vessel, the
Querida
, which there was
reason to believe, had been hastily armed and sent
out to retake us. At the same time, another sail
was discovered, which proved to be a schooner,
making in, with a fair wind, for the bay, and
approaching
us very fast. Upon this, Captain Brown,
after surveying the latter vessel from the mast-head,
made a speech, as soon as he had descended, or,
rather, two speeches, one in Spanish, the other in
English, in both which tongues he swore with equal
fluency, declaring that we must take that schooner,
or hang, every soul of us; because how, we must
have a better ship than we sailed in, if we expected
to escape that blasted Querida, whereof he supposed
she was full of men and guns from the fort, and
would blow us into kingdom-come, unless we could
give her the slip. And he hinted that a signal of
distress, with our evident crippled condition, would
bring the schooner near enough to make sure of
her.
His words were so manifestly true, and the idea
of capture so unpalatable to every soul on board,
except myself, who desired nothing so much as to
be out of a vessel commanded by such a desperado,
and, perhaps, the negroes, for whose wishes nobody
inquired or cared, that it was straightway resolved
the schooner should, if possible, be taken and
converted
to our uses; even the Bloody Volunteers
raising their disconsolate faces from the sloop's side,
over which they had been for a long time all
hanging
,
and bobbing, and gulping in a row, to retch
out a folorn assurance that they would fight rather
than surrender, if there was any danger of being
hanged by the captors. The Spaniards and sailors,
in particular, avowed themselves ready for action,
and proposed to raise from the hold, where it was
yet lying, the formidable long-tom, by way of
preparation
;
but Brown swore he was no such lubber
as to put an eighteen-pound shot through the ship
he was just going to sail in, or to display so
formidable
an engine to the eyes of men whom he was
inviting
to his assistance. And, that there might be
as little room for suspicion as possible, he directed
all the company, with the exception of six or seven
men, to conceal themselves below, keeping
themselves
in readiness, with such arms as they could
find, to rush up, when he should give the
command
.
This order, I found, was not to extend to myself,
whom he arrested, as I was going below, telling me,
with some appearance of his former devilish humour,
that the quarter-deck was the place for a lieutenant,
Vol. II.17
and that he expected me to do my duty and fight
like a hell-cat. I summoned courage, the crisis
being alarming, to assure him that we had very
different
ideas of our duties; that I saw no right
I
had
to attack that schooner or any other, and no right
he
had to command me to do so; that I was not his
lieutenant, and would not consent to be so regarded;
and if he was bent upon a desperate course himself,
he might be assured that I was not going to be
dragged
into it with him.
To this he vouchsafed to reply, first, that, as to
the matter of right, I talked like a sucking-pig, and
must hold my jaw for the future, on pain of having it
sliced off with a broadaxe; secondly, shiver his
timbers, he loved me, and was willing to make my
fortune; and as for the lieutenancy, sink him, he had
promised I should be his lieutenant, and I
should
be,
dn his blood, or else his cook, or his
powdermonkey
;
for he saw nothing else I was fit for; and,
finally, as to my assurance I was not going to be
dragged by him into any unlawful act, he told me
I should be dragg'd through hll-fire, if he will'd
it; and he ended the ferocious reply by warning
me that he was my captain, and he was Captain
Hellcat, split him, who never had a man say nay to
him; and that upon any grumbling or disobedience
of orders, he would not hesitate to tie me up and
give me a thousand lashes.
I found, in short, that Captain Brown on land,
and Captain Hellcat at sea, were two very different
persons; and that, however much I might have
detested
the one, there remained for me nothing but to
fear the other. My spirit was not heroic enough to
rise in arms against an oppressor, who talked of
broadaxes, and a thousand lashes, not to speak of the
metaphorical fires of doom, as if nothing could be
more natural to him than to employ them as
instruments
of authority and punishment; and I confess,
with as much shame as is proper to the occasion,
that his savage menaces terrified me into immediate
submission; in which state I remained as long as it
was my miserable fate to continue in his hands.
In the meanwhile, Brown had completed his
preparations
for the attack, by arming the men he kept
on deck, who were the Spanish felons, three or four
of the sailors, and Skipper Duck, with pistols and
cutlasses brought from below; which arms were laid
about in places whence the men could snatch them
up in a moment, and where there was no fear they
could be seen by the people in the schooner. He
then hoisted a flag of distress, which was no sooner
seen by the schooner, than she stood directly for us,
and came so near that, by some manuvre or trick,
which I did not exactly understand, Brown managed
to make her run afoul of his own vessel; which no
sooner happened than he gave a terrible yell, more
like the scream of an Indian than any thing else, and
leaped on board the schooner, followed by the
Spaniards
and sailors; while the rest of the company, the
remaining sailors, the negroes, and the Bloody
Volunteers
,
came tumbling up from the hold, to
complete
by their appearance the victory which would
have been just as easily won without them.
There were but five men on board the schooner,
which was but a small one: they had no arms to
resist us, and they were so terrified at this most
unexpected assault from men into whose power they
had been drawn by their humanity, that they yielded
at once and fell upon their knees, piteously begging
for their lives. Nor had I, who, in pursuance of
orders which I feared to disobey, crept, all of a
tremble
,
into the schooner with the others, the least
thought that any harm would be done them; because
it was so needless, and they had not provoked it by
resistance. But, alas, I had not yet attained a full
conception of the character of Brown; who, with a
most murderous spirit, called out to give the
rascals
no quarter, fired his pistols at them, as he
jumped upon the deck, and then rushed upon them
with his cutlass, followed by the Spaniards; who,
whether the whole thing had been arranged between
them and Brown before, or whether his devilish
example awoke a sudden and equally devilish spirit
of imitation, as is most probable, were as forward
and active as himself; and the poor men were
immediately
butchered before my eyes.
The horror with which this brutal and wanton
slaughter filled my whole mind, was shared by
others of the company, and especially by the Bloody
Volunteers and two or three of the English sailors,
as I could see by their countenances, turned upon
one another with looks of fear and inquiry. Like
me, they seemed to wonder what could have urged
Brown to such a massacre; a mystery which was
presently explained by his exclaiming, There,
dn my blood! the thing is done, and there is no
backing out of it. Now, my jolly dogs, the sea is
before you and the gallows behind youthe gallows
or the yard-arm, d'ye see, blast me; whereof, on
one or the other there's not a man of you but must
swing, the moment he turns his face backward.
So a free life is the word for all, because, shiver me,
my hearties, you can't help it; a free life and a jolly
one. And here you are with a good vessel under
you; and here am I, dn my blood, Hellcat by
name, to command youto show you where gold
grows on the sea, that may be hauled up by
bucketsfull
,
and where to spend it without fear of law or
lawyer. So, say the word, sink me, a gallows on
shore, or a cruise under the sign of the Hellcat!
It was plain from his own words, that Brown had
murdered the poor wretches for the purpose of
making pirates of us all, whether we would or not;
for after such a deed of blood, which, in the eyes
of the law must dye us all with nearly equal hues,
few felt that any thing remained but to adopt the
outlaw life on which he himself was evidently
bent. Or if any there were, they were like me,
too much overcome by fear of the ruthless
desperado
to utter a single word of remonstrance. The
Spaniards received the proposal of a cruise with
cries of approbation, the Englishmen shook hands
and said, if they were to be hang'd, they must be,
and there was no helping it; the negroes asked
Massa Hellcat, as they called him, if they were to
be free, provided they turned pirates also, and upon
Brown saying they should be as free as blackbirds,
they uttered a huzzah, and said they could cut throats
as well as any body. The Bloody Volunteers said
nothing: horror and sea-sickness together subdued
them to submission.
17*
CHAPTER XXV.
In which Robin Day is carried to Cuba, and made acquainted
with the tender mercies of pirate law and Captain Hellcat.
The
capture, the murder, the proposal of Brown
for a cruise and its acceptance, were altogether the
work of but a few minutes. A few more served, at
Brown's orders, to transfer from the Jumping
Jenny
to the schooner every thing of value which the
former contained, the sails, stores, and arms, and
especially the eighteen-pounder, which was swung
up from the hold and received on board the schooner
with acclamations, as the herald and author of many
a future victory. All being at last taken from her,
the Jumping Jenny was cut loose, after being first
set on fire; the bodies of the murdered mariners
were thrown overboard; and the schooner, which
we soon discovered had on her stern the name of
the Moro, or Moor, of Havana, bore away to the
South West, leaving the sloop to burn, and the
Querida
to follow us, if she could.
A search was now instituted throughout the Moro,
and it was soon found that she had on board a cargo of
military stores for the garrison at Pensacola; a happy
circumstance for the new-made pirates, for the
Jumping Jenny was but badly provisioned, and the
Intendant had taken the precaution to remove from
her nearly all the gunpowder, as well as some of
the small arms, so that the followers of Captain
Brown, but for this discovery, would have been as
badly armed as they were provisioned for the
intended
cruise. There was found, also, a good store
of liquors on board; a discovery that completed the
exultation of the commander, who immediately
ordered
a cask of brandy to be broached, and treated
his crew to a rouse, drinking, himself, several deep
potations with all the gusto of one who enjoyed, and
had long been denied the luxury.
This completed the conversion of his proselytes,
or of all who were convertible: the Spaniards uttered
many
vivas
in honour of
El Capitan Gato
, who,
they protested, was the greatest man that ever sailed
the sea; the Englishmen shook hands again, and
swore they cared not a fig for gallows and
yard-arms
;
the negroes fell to singing and quarreling;
and one of the Bloody Volunteers declared, he
would not object to a little pirating, if he could do
it on dry land, because, by Georgeand finished
the rest of his speech over the side of the vessel.
Even Captain Hellcat became a little glorious, and
expatiated upon the pleasures and advantages of a
freebooter's life, robbing and murdering at will;
he had tried the land, dn his blood, in every
way he could take it; he had swindled and cheated;
robbed houses and niggur-traders; taken scalps, and
three wives among the Indians; cut thief-takers'
throats and play'd the quack-doctor; but after all,
blast him, it was nothing; the sea was the only place
for a jolly dog, a freebooter's life the only life for a
gentleman and man of honour.
And, talking of honour, sink me, said he,
suddenly
turning his eye upon Skipper Duck, who was
serving out grog from the cask, I have just to
inform
you, my young hellcats, that a pirate must be
a man of honour as well as another. He that
betrays
his messmate to the harpies on shore, is a
rascal
,
and a knife in the gizzard is too good for him.
And with that, reminding the unfortunate Skipper
that he had played the traitor at Norfolk, and assuring
him that he spared his life only because of his acting
with good faith, and playing so important a part, in
the escape from Pensacola, he ordered him to be tied
up and punished with five hundred lashes.
The astounded skipper was immediately seized
upon by the sailors and Spaniards, who seemed
indignant
at his perfidy, and eager to prove their zeal
to the commander; and, nothwitstanding his
remonstrances
,
which soon changed to pleadings and
beseechings, the punishment was inflicted with a
scourge hastily constructed of knotted ropeyarns,
and placed in the hands of the negroes, ten of whom
were ordered to administer each fifty lashes on his
naked back, and to administer them well, which
they did.
It cannot be supposed that I, who had such cause
to hate him, should grieve for any misfortune that
could happen to Skipper Duck; but the atrocity, the
horrible severity of the punishment, which appeared
to me only a more brutal murder than any I had
witnessed, awoke emotions that were akin to pity;
and perceiving the poor wretch had fainted before
more than half the number of stripes had been
inflicted
,
I presumed to beg Captain Brown not to
carry the punishment further, assuring him the man
would die under it. All the answer I got was, that
he might die and be dd, and an injunction to
mind my own business; and when the bloody
business
was over, and Duck, at last untied, fell like a
dead man on the deck, he very coolly ordered the
negroes to throw the carcass overboard.
I interfered again; and having felt the poor
fellow's
pulse, said he was not yet dead; upon which
Hellcat swore I was a doctor, and I should be the
ship's doctor, now he thought of it, and so directed
me to take him in hand and cure him. I said I
should be happy to do all I could for him; but asked
what I was to do for remedies? Oh! said the
unfeeling villain, give him some
holly-golly-wow
!
and then left me, after a great horse-laugh,
to solve the difficulty as I could.
Fortunately, there was soon after discovered
among the stores of the Moro, a large chest of drugs,
that was doubtless intended for hospital service at
Pensacola; so that I had the means of trying my
skill, though I had but little confidence it would
recover the skipper from the effects of so dreadful
a flogging. I had him carried below, where I
established him as comfortably as I could, dressed
his wounds to the best of my ability, and had the
satisfaction, in about an hour, of seeing him open
his eyes, and restored, though it was but for a little
while, to consciousness. He seemed surprised to
find me administering to him, and was struck with a
sudden remorse for the wrongs he had done me; for
he begged me wildly to forgive him, and, still more
wildly, said he could reward me for my goodness,
and would do so, if he lived; and then he declared
he would have vengeance on Brown, whom he said
he could hang, and would too, if he had to hang
beside him. The ferment of his spirits, added to
the anguish of his wounds, presently threw him
into a delirium, in which condition, indeed, with
occasional, and very imperfect intervals of
consciousness
,
as I may here say, he remained for
more than two weeks, in which it was my grief to
be in attendance upon him.
In the meanwhile, Captain Brown, though
indulging
in a brief carouse, omitted nothing
necessary
to secure his escape from the Querida, which
was seen to sail towards the burning sloop, and
then alter her course to pursue us; though it
was by and by seen that she was gradually falling
behind us; which, as it was said she was a very fast
vessel, was considered a proof that the Moro was
no mean sailer. Something was, however, allowed
for the hurry with which the Querida had been
fitted out, and, perhaps imperfectly, to pursue us;
and Captain Hellcat himself said, he would be very
willing to make an exchange of vessels, and give,
as he added, all the negroes to boot. Long before
night, we had lost sight of her entirely; and then
our course was altered, and I understood from the
Spaniards that we were bound, not to Barrataria, as
I had supposed, but to some other haunt of pirates
on the coast of Cuba.
And there we arrived upon the fifth day of our
voyage; during which the appearance of the schooner
was altered by paint and other devices, and her
name changed from Moro, to
Vibora
, or Viper; a
much more appropriate title for a thing so full of
treachery and venomous hostility against all
mankind
.
During this period, Brown had converted
her into a pirate in earnest, and thoroughly organized
his crew, appointing for his lieutenant (for he was
now content to dub me his doctor,) the ferocious
fellow who had threatened to eat my soul at
Pensacola
,
and who was the most worthy of the honour,
although no sailor; because next to Brown himself,
the most devilish spirit on board. This worthy
assumed
to himself the name of
Gatito
, or the Kitten;
but upon Captain Brown bestowing the same title
upon his followers in general, the lieutenant
signified
his will to sail for the future under the name of
Diablillo
, or the Little Devil, the diminutive
addition
being expressive merely of his modesty; for he
was a man nearly six feet high, and robust in
proportion
.
We arrived upon the coast of Cuba without
difficulty
or accident, but, alas, not without further
bloodshed; for upon the fourth day of the voyage,
meeting a British schooner, supposed to be from
Jamaica, our captain, in a fit of drunken valour, (for,
indeed, he was seldom entirely sober,) determined
to attack her, although she was armed with two
guns, and seemed not at all afraid of us. She made,
in fact, a vigorous resistance, and fired a shot through
us, by which one man was killed and three wounded,
being struck by splinters; but a ball from long-tom,
striking her between wind and water, avenged the
injury; and five minutes afterwards she went down,
her crew, in the meanwhile making signals of
surrender
and distress, which no one regarded. As
long as she remained above water, we continued to
fire at her; and finally bore away, leaving three or
four miserable wretches, who were seen floating on
the sea, clinging to planks and spars, to the mercy
of the waves and sharks, of which there are always
great numbers basking about in the tropical regions
of the gulf.
The next day, we came in sight of the highlands
of Cuba, near its western cape, and entered an
out-of-the-way
harbour; where, however, a number of
Spaniards soon made their appearance on board the
schooner, seeming very glad to see El Capitan Gato,
whom they hailed as an old acquaintance. And
here El Capitan Gato, to the great astonishment and
affliction of this portion of his followers, immediately
put up for sale the thirteen negroes, and they fetched
a very good price; which Captain Brown assured
them, by way of consolation, was the only thing
according to his way of thinking, that a negro was
good for. Their place was supplied more
advantageously
for his purposes, by fifteen cut-throat
islanders
,
selected from a number who begged the honour
of making their fortunes under his diabolical auspices;
and, truly, they approved themselves, in the end,
worthy of their leader.
We remained here but two days; during which
Captain Hellcat had an opportunity of establishing
his authority by a second act of punishment inflicted
upon a faithless follower, and proved the justice of
the remark with which he adjudged it, that one
had better walk into hll with a bomb-shell hung
round his neck, than attempt foul play with him.
It seemed that the Bloody Volunteers, not yet
enamoured
of the free life of the sea, and very desirous
to make their escape from the Viper, had laid a plan
for effecting their purpose, as soon as we entered the
harbour. It was resolved, that if any one should
have the good fortune to get ashore, he should
proceed
in search of a magistrate, and inform him of
the true character of the Viper; for, poor fellows, they
had no thought but that we were in the harbour
under
false colours, fancying that all the visiters of the
schooner were made to believe she was an honest
trader. The public authorities, or any good citizens,
informed she was a pirate, they had no doubt she
would be immediately seized, the murderous Brown
and his voluntary followers conducted to the gallows,
and themselves liberated. The attempt was made
by one, who was allowed to accompany Brown to
the shore, and succeeded so well in his enterprise,
that, in less than an hour after he had been first
missed, he was brought back to the schooner by
the honest people of the harbour, to whom, or to
one of them, who could speak English, he had told
his story. Very well, quoth Brown, making use
of the language I have chronicled above; adding,
with horrible oaths, that since he was so eager to
make his way to the sharks, he would help him to
them; but they should be water-sharks, sink him, and
not land-sharks. And the poor wretch was
immediately
bound by the arms and let down into the sea
from the bow of the vessel, where he was presently
surrounded by these tigers of the deep, and at last
set upon by them, and devoured before our eyes.
With all my fear of Brown, my horror at such
barbarity gave me courage to interfere, to
intercede
for the poor fellow's life; but Brown, who
was more intoxicated, as well as more devilish than
usual, caught up a cutlass, and drove me below, to
do my own butchering, as he called itthat is,
to attend to the wounded men, who, as well as Duck,
had been consigned to my chirurgical care.
Vol. II.18
CHAPTER XXVI.
The second cruise of the Viper: she captures the Querida, and the
Intendant's daughter becomes the prize of Captain Hellcat.
This
dreadful act of vengeance completed the
subjection of the Bloody Volunteers, who, from that
time forth, gave over all plans and prospects of
escape, and yielded to their fate and the tyrant into
whose hands they had fallen, with a sullen
resignation
that showed it was an easy thing even for the
brave and free to stoop to bondage; and a few weeks
more might have seen the Bloody Volunteers,
passing
from despair to recklessness, converted into a
set of as thoroughpaced buccaneers and desperadoes as
their comrades. As for me, the case was somewhat
different. My medical office, and perhaps the mean
opinion Brown formed of my courage, prevented
my being ever called upon as a combatant; and
hence I was in little danger of being hardened into
a villain by sights of blood, and by the consciousness
of having shed it. But I was none the less a slave.
The effect of the murder was to increase my fears
of Brown, to rob me of all hope of escaping the
horrible life he had assigned me, and to break down
with a sense of misery and degradation the spirit
which had been once before so nearly broken by
my first oppressor. There was some resemblance,
indeed, between my fate in the Viper and what it
had once been in the Jumping Jenny. The difference
was, that, in the one case, I had been beaten and
tortured in body; while in the other, the scourge of
brutality was applied to my mind. The insults and
menaces of Brown (perhaps it was my prudence
only which saved me from grosser weapons,) were
as painful and killing as ever had been the blows of
Skipper Duck. A few weeks might have seen my
brother volunteers changed into pirates; but I in
that time must have pined away and died of a
broken
heart.
The next day, the Viper sailed out of the harbour,
without, however, proceeding far, and took a station
to intercept vessels doubling the west cape of Cuba;
and there she remained cruising four days, during
which two captures were made, one of them a very
valuable one, of vessels from Jamaica: and, in
both instances, their crews were massacred to a
man; for it was a maxim Brown constantly
inculcated
,
to leave no one to witness against him: he
had heard of many a free lad of the sea going out of
the world in a hempen horse-collar; he said, but, it
had always turned out, they had let some lubber off,
to blab against them.
Of the particulars of these murderous exploits I
have no heart to speak: they are sickening to my
memory. I have enough, and more than enough,
to relate of atrocities in which my own interests
and history were too deeply involved to be
forgotten
.
Returning for a day to the harbour to dispose of
the prizes and their cargoes, for which latter, at least,
there seemed to be no want of purchasers among the
honest people on shore, we sailed out again to the
station, to lie in wait for a certain English brig
which Brown in some way got intelligence of, and
which, it was said, would be such a capture as would
make the fortune of every man on board. Upon
the second day of the cruise, she made her
appearance
,
and efforts were made to approach her; which
was found however to be no easy task, as she
immediately
took the alarm, altered her course to the
North, and stood away from us in a style which
proved her to be a very fast sailer. But she was too
valuable a prize to be given up without an effort; and
accordingly the Viper crowded on all sail in pursuit,
which was continued until night, when we lost sight
of her.
But even then the chase was not abandoned; for,
supposing from the relative position of the vessels,
the character of the wind, and other circumstances,
that the brig would change her course again in the
darkness, Brown ordered a similar change in the
course of the Viper, expecting to get sight of the
chase again in the morning.
In this, however, he was disappointed, for when
morning came, the brig was no where to be seen;
but about midday, when we were beginning to
retrace
our course to Cuba, the man at the masthead
descried a sail; which, at first thought to be the lost
chase, was soon discovered to be another brig,
standing, like the Viper, to the south. Upon this,
Hellcat, who had been assuaging his wrath at the
loss of the English brig with deep potations, swore
he would take the stranger, if he died for it; a
resolution
in which he was confirmed by some of his
Pensacola recruits declaring, after a time, that the
stranger was no other than the Governor's brig, the
Querida, which had herself so recently been the
pursuer.
To Brown's desire to attack her there was, at
first, a great deal of opposition made by many of
the crew, who feared she was actually cruising in
search of us; in which case there was every reason
to believe she was sufficiently well manned and
armed to subdue us; but the lieutenant Diablillo
swore he had no apprehensions of thatthe Querida
was a private vessel entirely, armed, indeed, as all
trading vessels were, in that period of war, but
slightly; and if she had been despatched after the
Jumping Jenny, it was because no other vessel in
port could be so easily got ready, and because little
danger to her was to be apprehended from the
resistance
of the Jumping Jenny; and he added,
moreover, as a thing he knew, that the Querida, at
the period of our flight, was preparing to sail to the
Havanna, with invalid soldiers from the garrison;
and, he had no doubt, she was now on the voyage,
and might be easily taken; but, he added, with a
freebooter's discretion, as there was no reason to
suppose she could have any, and much less a
valuable
cargo on board, coming from such a place as
Pensacola, he saw nothing to be gained by engaging
her, except blows; for, truly, it might be expected
the old soldiers would make some kind of
resistance
.
Brown swore, in reply, the gain would be the
brig herself; and declared, with many oaths, he
would have her; he had fallen in love with her,
he said, in Philadelphia at first sight, and had
nearly run his head into a noose, trying to get her;
and if she was Governor Aubrey's ship, that only
made him more determined to take her;for why,
he had sworn eternal war against him and his
whole blood, (and, blast him, he began the world,
and the life of a man, by shedding it;) and he
would be curst if he ever let slip an opportunity to
do him a mischief.
18*
No one presumed to debate a question already
decided
by Captain Hellcat; and, accordingly, it was
resolved the Querida should be his: upon which he
magnificently promised, as soon as the prize was
secured, the victory should be celebrated by a
carouse, and they should all, in his own phrase,
get as drunk as emperors.
As the intended victim was steering the same
course with the Viper, nothing more was done with
the latter, after preparing the guns (of which we
had now two twelve-pounders, taken from a prize,
besides long-tom,) and other weapons, but to shorten
sail a little, so as to let the Querida gradually
overtake
us; which, by and by, she did, not seeming to
have any suspicion of our being any thing more
than honest British traders, (for we had an English
flag at the mast-head;) and about an hour before
nightfall she had come so nigh, that Brown was
able, after firing a broadside, that was meant not so
much to injure the vessel as to strike a panic into
her crew, to run her aboard and grapple with her;
after which her capture was soon effected by
boarding
.
It is true, her crew, who were many of them
Americans, that had shipped in her at Philadelphia,
though taken completely by surprise, made a
gallant
effort at resistance, firing off one of her guns,
as we closed with her, by which several of our men
were torn to pieces; and then, when the latter
were leaping on board, delivering a volley of
muskets and pistols, which they had hastily caught
up; but they were but fifteen or sixteen in number,
their captain, from whom they derived their courage,
was cut down at the first flash of a cutlass; and it
was madness to oppose such an overpowering force
as was arrayed against them. Some threw down
their arms and ran below, to gain a temporary and
unavailing concealment; while others begged for
quarter, which was refused them. In five minutes
the Querida was a prize, and Hellcat her master.
During these brief moments, as well as for hours
before, I had remained on the deck of the Viper,
expecting and then witnessing a spectacle which I
had always before been happy to shunthe sight of
the murderous conflict. Never before had I
anticipated
an engagement, save with grief and horror;
but on this occasion, I looked forward to the attack
with an eager impatience as great as that of the
veriest pirate on board. Alas! I hoped that the
pirates were, after all, deceivedthat the Querida
was well armed, and actually in search of us, and
that the onset of the Viper would be the signal only
for her own capture. I fancied, when she came so
nigh that I could almost count the men on her deck,
that she had craftily concealed, like the Viper, the
overpowering numbers of her crew, to lure the
pirates
more surely to their doom; and even when the
latter were boarding her, I looked to see them
suddenly
leaping out to overmaster the assailants.
The fall and flight of her vanquished defenders,
and the rush of the pirates, some into the cabin,
others into the forecastle and hold, after the
miserable
survivors, dispelled the illusion; and I covered
my eyes with my hands, that I might see no more
of the scene of butchery.
At that moment, there came from the Querida the
shrieks of womenthe cries of several female
voices, one of which smote like the peal of my own
death-bell upon my ear. I started up, and looked
wildly to the Querida, from whose cabin issued
several
of the pirates, one of them dragging with him
a mana Catholic priestwho, with looks of terror,
extended a crucifix above his head, as if with that
symbol of divine mercy, to entreat the mercy of
man, the pity of the slayers around him; another
haling along a woman, in whom I immediately
recognised the
Casera
, or housekeeper of Colonel
Aubrey; and a third, the lieutenant Diablillo,
dragging
Oh,
my God! it was Isabel herself!
I leapedI forgot
then
the abjectness and
pusillanimity
of spirit, to which despair had reduced me
I leaped from the schooner into the brig, and
dared to seize the bulky Diablillo by the arm, with
the frantic cry, Villain, unhand the lady! when
my puny heroism was rewarded by a buffet from
his Herculean fist, by which I was thrown
bleeding
to the deck; while, with the other, he grasped
the shrieking Isabel, exclaiming with exultation,
Fuego de Dios!
let others take what they want,
here is
my
share of the plunder!
Yours
, you blasted jackanapes? roared Captain
Hellcat, who made his appearance from some other
part of the vessel, and gave a snatch at the
lieutenant's
prize: take the granny and the niggur gals,
if you want; but, dn my blood, this prize falls to
your master.
You shall have my blood first, cried the
lieutenant
;
who, suddenly letting go his hold of the
wretched Isabel, and calling, with the rancour of
long concealed envy or hatred, Let every
Spainard
stand by me, and down with the American
tyrant
!
attacked Hellcat with his cutlass; while
Hellcat
,
nothing loath, crying, Let every man stand
by, and see the end of a mutineer! engaged his
rebellious lieutenant with equal strength and
superior
skill, and at the third blow brought him to the
deck, with his skull cloven to the eyes. The
Spanish
pirates, who composed nine tenths of the whole
crew, were perhaps willing enough to side with
Diablillo, and put down their foreign master: but
they paused to await the result of the conflict; and
the moment it terminated, they returned to their
allegiance, with loud cries of Captain Hellcat
forever
!
and down with all traitors!
CHAPTER XXVII.
Robin Day adopts a desperate resolution, and escapes from the
pirates, with the beautiful Isabel; and what fell out thereupon.
In
the meanwhile, Isabel, who caught sight of
me rising from the deck, and grasping for a weapon,
with which, in the madness of the moment, I was
determined to strike her ravisher to the heart, flung
herself, the instant he let her go, into my arms,
wildly calling upon me to kill her: Kill mestab
me to the heartOh God! you can do nothing else!
Kill me, and I will die blessing you! But
Brown, turning from the corpse of his lieutenant,
tore her from my grasp, telling her, with brutal
jocularity,
he
was the man to be hugg'd, dn his
blood; and  But I heard nothing but the
shrieks of Isabel; whom, despite her frenzied
struggles
,
grinning with triumph and complacency, he
folded in his blood-stained arms.
Where was the courage which but a moment
before
would have armed me for a contest withfor
my death fromDiablillo? I fell upon my knees,
and with the tone of a slave, begged the heartless
caitiff, for the sake of the mother that bore him,
to do the lady no harm. Her father is rich, I
cried; he will ransom her with his fortune!
Yes, yes, cried the poor priest, the chaplain
whom I had seen at the Intendant's table, and who,
displaying a terror but little becoming one of his
holy profession, caught at the prospect of relief;
As you are Christian men, he exclaimed piteously,
do us no harmdo
her
no harm. Her father is
rich and powerful; he will ransom ushe will
ransom
her. Santos Santisimos!Deus mei!
And
here he fell to praying; while the
casera
sobbed
from a distance, stretching her hands towards her
young mistress, whom perhaps she had nursed in
infancy,
Oh, mi nia, mi nia
my child, my
child!
A priest, dn my blood! cried Hellcat,
looking
admiringly upon the chaplain. Why then,
split me, give us a bit of your lingosay the sarvice,
and splice me to the seorita; for I wish I may be
sunk if I won't marry her.
Ransom! ransom! interrupted many of the
Spaniards, who were evidently better pleased with
the idea of a prize in money, which could be divided
in shares among themselves, than one that must fall
to the lot of their captain only: The Intendant
is rich, the girl is his only child:Ransom,
ransom
!
Ay, ay, quoth Brown: but, strike my
topsails
,
I'll marry her first, and ransom her afterwards.
For, d'ye see, sink me, she'll fetch no better price
to-day than to-morrow, and no worse to-morrow
than to day; and the longer I keeps her, the
madder
her father will be to have her; and where's the
difference whether she goes back Mrs. Hellcat, or
a plain seorita? I mean to marry her, d'ye see;
and you shall all get drunk at the wedding.
And with that, the miscreant, still holding his
victim in his powerful grasp, ordered the terrified
priest to splice away, blast him, and take care to
make short work of it; and upon the latter, first
timorously remonstrating, and then absolutely
refusing
to prostitute the sacred forms of religion to a
purpose at once so farcical and dreadful, he burst
into a furious rage, and would have murdered him
on the spot, but for the interference of the Spaniards;
to whom, though willing enough for any common
murder, the killing of a priest was an impiety not
to be thought of. The spirit even of Hellcat stooped
before the prospect of an universal mutiny; which he
put an end to by yielding his bloody purpose,
pretending
that he had threatened his reverence only in
jest.
But, said he, if his holiness won't marry me
in the way of the church, I'll marry myself, dn
my blood, in a way of my own.
And thereupon he released the wretched Isabel,
permitting, or, rather, ordering, her to go into the
cabin, to enjoy a reprieve of a few moments, which
he devoted to the yet unfinished business of victory.
As she staggered wildly down the companion-way,
I succeeded for an instant in catching her eye, and
making her a signit was but a lookmeant to
express
that I would save her, or perish with her; and,
indeed, I had suddenly conceived a project, which
though desperate and full of difficulties enough, I was
resolved to attempt in her behalf.
It had been mentioned by Diablillo, that the
Querido
was to carry to Cuba invalids from the garrison
of Pensacola; and twenty such invalids were found
below, where some of them had been lying during
the conflict, and whither others, that were not so
helpless, had fled, after yielding some little assistance
to the sailors in the fight. In the first rage of
conflict
,
three or four of these poor wretches were slain
by pirates, who followed them below; but the
murderers
relented, when they found they were killing
men, who, besides being their own countrymen,
were half dead with disease already. And such was
the newborn humanity of the victors, who had
already experienced the power of determination and
unanimity, that they defended the prisoners even
from the fury of Captain Hellcat; who would have
tossed them all into the sea, and with difficulty
agreed to a mode of disposing of them, devised by
the crew, which, while it saved their tender
consciences
the guilt of murder, left it very much to be
doubted whether the prisoners should ever survive
to witness against them, as Hellcat swore they would,
in a hall of justice. The brig's longboat was lowered
into the sea, and into this the sickmen were sent,
along with the priest, and the
casera
, whose
withered
looks were her safetyif being placed in the
long boat could be called safety: some friendly hands
threw them an oar or two, a cask of water, and a few
pounds of biscuit; after which, the boat was cut
loose, and they were left upon the wide sea, several
hundred miles, I believe, from any land, to perish of
starvation, or to go to the bottom at the first breath
of the tempest; while the Viper and her prize, the
pirates being pretty equally divided between them,
and Hellcat himself assuming command of the latter,
proceeded, under every sail, and in company, on their
course towards Cuba.
And now began the carouse which was to celebrate
the victory. The pirates called aloud for their grog,
and Hellcat, himself more than half intoxicated
already, called, as I had expected, upon me to mix
it. My commission as surgeon, though it procured
me exemption from the perils and guilt of combat,
did not exempt me from various other duties of a
degrading, and even menial, character, which Brown
took a wanton pleasure in imposing upon me; among
Vol. II.19
others, the office of cup-bearer and compounder of
strong drink; for he declared, with his usual oaths,
he saw no reason why I should not mix liquors
as well as medicines, one being as much, and as good,
physic as the other.
It was upon this degrading office, which I had
submitted to sullenly but without complaint, that
I founded a sudden and desperate project to
relieve the unhappy Isabel: I was resolved to
repeat
the experiment I had performed in the
household
of Mr. Feverage, to drug the liquor of the
piratesto drug it deeply tooI cared not if it
should kill some of them, or, indeed, alland then,
at night, when they were overcome with stupor,
trusting to the jolly boat, hanging upon the Querida's
stern, which I thought I could launch without
assistance
,
with the rescued Isabel beside me, commit
myself to the waves, in the hope of reaching the
long boat, or, at the worst, of remaining afloat until
picked up by some passing vessel, or thrown upon
some hospitable shore.
To the calm judgment of ease and security, such
a project appears nothing short of madness; but there
was nothing better to be done, and the desperateness
of the scheme was no objection, when no other could
be attempted, or even imagined; and, above all,
where from life having become already burdensome,
I was willing to lose it in the endeavour.
I had every facility for the execution of such an
enterprize, the command of the medicine chest and
the key of the spirit-room, which Brown had
committed
to my keeping two days before; and the only
real difficulty which I apprehended, was to disguise
the taste of the laudanum, of which I poured all
there was in the chest into the huge vesselin fact,
it was a common bucketin which I mixed the
infernal
potiona mixture of rum, brandy and spirits,
diluted with strong wine, with sugar and spices
added, according to instructions originally given
me by Hellcat for brewing what he called his
hell-broth
;
but I got over the difficulty by throwing in a
bottle of brandy-bitters, Hellcat's favourite morning
drink, and adding an unusual quantity of spices, by
means of which the peculiar savour of the opium
was entirely concealed.
Nor was any objection made to the novel
compound
,
when it came to be drunk; on the contrary,
Brown, to whom, as in duty bound, I offered the
first bowl, swearing, upon recognising the taste of
his bitters, it was the best physic I had ever yet
mixed, dn his blood, and the crew also agreeing
that it was excellent. They drank, and drank again
got drunk, danced, swore, fought, became stupid,
and dropped about the deck, where they fell asleep;
so that in less than two hours, there was not a man
of them all who was not overcome by the drug and
liquor together.
Brown himself was the first to succumb, being,
from his previous draughts, in the best state for
receiving
the influence of the narcotic; not to say that
he drank more deeply than any one else, according
to his universal custom. He soon became very
much intoxicated, and his countenance put on a look
of apoplexy; when, declaring, with a brutal jest,
he must look after his young wife, dn his blood,
and bidding his followers drink a rouse to her honour
and health, he staggered down the companion-way
into the cabin, leaning upon my arm for support,
which he was obliged to accept; and which I had
offered, with the full determination to stab him with
his own knife, if that should prove necessary to save
Isabel from his ferocious clutches.
But, happily, no such dreadful act was required
of me: he reeled from the last step, and fell at his
length upon the cabin-floor; where he instantly
dropped
fast asleep, snoring, or rather snorting
prodigiously
.
I looked for Isabel; she had shrunk to the farthest
corner of the little but handsome cabin, where I saw
her on her knees, striving to pray, her cheeks as
white as snow, her lips livid, her whole frame
trembling
,
her eyes wild with fright, and her hand
grasping
a knife, which she had picked up some where in
the cabin, and held as if prepared, at the moment of
extremity, to bury it in the breast of the ravisher,
or her own.
Fear nothing, I hastily whispered, and be in
readiness to follow me at a moment's warning.
I then immediately left the cabin, and returned
among the bacchanals on deck, to endure their
scurrilous jests upon Hellcat's marriage, as they
called it, and to ply them still further with the
drugged liquor.
It was now night, and my heart was beating
with hope. Every moment added another stupefied
sleeper to the list of my victims; and I might look
the sooner, and the more surely to the period of
escape. Before the orgies began, Hellcat had
appointed
a guard of five men to take care of the brig,
during the carouse, ordering them, of course, to
keep sober the while on pain of his high displeasure.
It was necessary to my purpose that they should
drink like the rest; and, fortunately, I found it
no difficult thing to seduce them also into the
debauch
;
and, by and by, to see four of them laid
insensible
on the deck.
The fifth man alone, who was at the wheel,
though he made no scruples of drinking, resisted
the influence of the narcotic, even after every other
miscreant was sound asleep, and I despaired of
bringing him under its power. He was a robust
villain, and one of the basest and cruelest spirits on
board; and the knowledge of his depravity nerved
me to an act, which, though now necessary to my
hopes, I should not otherwise, perhaps, have had
the courage to attempt. I struck him downit
was a treacherous and unworthy blow, but I could
not help itI struck him down with a handspike;
and while he lay stunned and powerless, I bound his
hands and feet with a rope I had prepared for the
purpose, and secured a gag in his mouth; so that,
although, when he revived, as he presently did, he
might watch my proceedings, he could neither
impede
me in my purpose, nor rouse the others by
his cries. I then lashed the helm, so that the
Querida
might continue her course without interruption
during the whole night.
All obstacles were now removed; and with a
beating
heart I completed my preparations by putting
into the boat a pair of oars, (there was, it rejoiced me
to find, a sail with its mast, wrapped up, already lying
in her, and also a rudder, a compass, some
provisions
,
and other things, which I had laid down in
my mind as necessary to provide against every
accident; and I was surprised at the apparent
coolnees
and deliberation with which I collected them
in different parts of the vessel, and carried them
through the sleepers to the boat. I satisfied myself,
by a trial at the pulleys, that I could without much
difficulty, let the boat down into the water, by
lowering
a little at the bow, and then the stern, and
then at the bow again, and so on; and that there
was no danger of her filling with water in the act,
because the wind was very light, and the brig was
19*
making headway but slowly; and, besides, the sea
was not rough.
I then stole back to the cabin, and found its
inmates
as I had left them half an hour before,
Hellcat
lying in a stupor on the floor, and Isabel on her
knees, grasping the knife, and looking as if changed
into a statue, her eyes alone retaining the mobility
and wild vivacity of life.
Fear nothing, I again mutteredcome with
me; you are saved.
But she only stared at me more wildly than
before
,
seeming to be uaconscious of my meaning, and
incapable of any exertion; until, at last, having given
her my hand, and assisted her to rise, she suffered
me to bear her from the cabin to the boat, in which
I placed her; and then cautioning her not to be
alarmed nor to lose her balance, I began to lower
her into the water; a proceeding which, from the
necessity of using a great deal of care, occupied me
a considerable time. As soon as the boat reached
the water, I slipped down by the ropes; and
separarating
the hooks by which she was suspended, we
were in a moment floating free in the waves, the
Querida sailing slowly away from us. I seized
upon the oars, which I had previously wrapped
around with bits of canvass, by way of muffles; and
rowing in the opposite direction, the night being
cloudy and very dark, had soon the satisfaction of
losing sight both of the Querida and her consort the
Viper.
And now, dropping the oars, I resolved to spread
the sail, and take advantage of the little breeze that
was blowing, to get as far from the pirates as
possible
:
but before I did so, I addressed myself to Isabel,
who had not yet spoken a word, and indeed seemed
to have had all her powers of mind frozen within
her, and told her to be of good heart, for the pirates
were now out of sight.
God be praised! she exclaimed, and fell upon
her knees in the bottom of the boat, sobbing out an
incoherent
prayer; which she interrupted to cry,
wildly
,
Are we safe then? and shall we not again fall
into their dreadful hands?
We are safe for the present, I replied; and I
hope, I trustnay, I can almost believefor
Providence
that has set us free, will not abandon usthat
we shall never see them more.
Upon this, the beautiful girl threw herself into my
arms, and clasping me round the neck, exclaimed in
tones of impassioned gratitude and devotion
Seor, I will love you, and be your slave! Yes,
yes! Save me but againGod has sent you twice to
rescue me from a villainsave me but again, and
I am yours forever!
Alas, poor Nanna! How was it possible, at that
moment, to remember that I had once fancied I
adored her? The beauty of the fair Spaniard, the
romantic interest in which I had won a privilege to
treasure her memory, the feelings she had so
evidently
cherished in my favor, at Pensacola under
her father's eyes, had more than half turned my
heart and brain already: and it needed scarcely so
devoted a proof of her regard to seal me to the
slavery of affection she so wildly offered. I will
save you or die, I cried, folding her in my arms.
I will die with youor live to love you for
ever! she murmured in return: and there, upon the
wild sea, in the midst of peril and distress, we
plighted our faith with equal fervour and artlessness,
and exchanged our vows of eternal affection. With
all the misery of fear and degradation that had lately
borne me to the earth; with all the anxieties and
doubts, the apprehensions of waves, and tempests,
and pirates, which, however I might conceal them
from Isabel, I could not but entertain; I felt, in that
moment, the thrill of happiness, the exquisite elation
that sublimes the lover beyond the low ambition and
the pride of kings.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
The voyage in the jollyboat; in which Robin Day makes an
interesting
and surprising discovery.
But
the maid of my love was to be savedshe
was to be borne, before day, long beyond the view,
and, if possible, the reach of the pirates. I shipped
the rudder, stepped the mast, and spread the little
sail, of the management of which I had but little, of
indeed, any knowledge; and the gentle breeze bore
us softly onwards in a direction which I judged or
hoped, would be most likely to bring us by
morning
in sight of the longboat; which gained, I
reckoned
upon the wisdom of the padre, or the counsels
of the soldiers, to determine the best steps to be
taken to secure the safety of us all. It was in
deciding
upon the direction I must steer to find the
invalids
,
I discovered that the compass which I had
taken, though it might prove an excellent guide by
day, was but an indifferent one by night, when it
was impossible to see it. But I was happy enough
to get an occasional glimpse at the north star, by
which I laid and maintained my course as well as I
could.
As soon as the sail was set, I took my seat at the
tiller; and there, with my dear Isabel at my side,
maintained it through the best part of the night,
having nothing to do but to steer, to encourage her
spirits, to repeat my vows of love, and to enter
into mutual explanations of the extraordinary
circumstances
by which we had been thus thrown
together upon the solitary sea. I told her the story
of my flight from the fortress; and she sobbed with
joy to find it had been compulsory, that I had not
voluntarily accompanied the detestable Brown.
I told them so, said the ardent girl; I told
my father you could never have united in any
enterprise with the wretch from whom you had
saved me, and whom therefore you must hate as
much as I did. But he was angry with me; and
because you had pretended not to know the man
when brought before himbecause you did not
immediately
expose and denounce him.Ah! why
did you not so? if you loved me, why did you not
say to my father, `This is the wretch who assailed
my Isabel.'
I replied, that my reasons were, first, the fear of
being made to appear as his accomplice in the
burglary
;
that was a foolish fear, but the surprise and
confusion I was in, all the time, prevented my
thinking so; and, in the second place, because,
notwithstanding
my many reasons for hating Brown,
he had actually saved my life, and endangered his
own in doing so, among the Indians; and I
therefore
could not, without base ingratitude, have
denounced
him, when the denunciation would most
certainly have been followed by the severest
punishment.
This matter explained, (and the beautiful girl
accepted my excuses,) I proceeded to relate the
remainder
of my adventures among the pirates up to
the moment in which a cruel destiny had brought
her into their hands. I then requested to know
what causes had brought her to sea in her
unfortunate
namesake, the Querida.
Alas, she replied, again throwing her arms
round my neck, and sobbing on my bosom,
you
are the causeor rather, I am myself the cause;
for it was not
your
fault, if I loved you. My
father is good and honourable, but proud, suspicious,
quick in his anger, and stern in his resolutions; and
he sawindeed, I did not know it myselfthat I
was more than grateful for the service you had
done me at Philadelphia; and then I had not told
him
all
, and he thought I had deceived him; and,
besides, appearances were against you, and he was
angry I should think of one whom he thought badly
of.But he will think better of you,
mi querido
,
she sobbed, when we go back to him again, and I
tell him how you have saved me a second time.
After these preliminary expressions, she gave me
an account of the events that had followed, and
some that preceded, my flight from Pensacola.
As soon (after the Intendant had sent me off to
the fortress,) as his angry reproaches had allowed
Isabel an opportunity to speak in my defence, she
acquainted him with those particulars of my story
which I had related to her, explaining the true
nature of my connection with Hellcat in the
burglary
;
and by and by Captain Dicky, who presently
made his appearance, and was called upon to speak
on the subject, confirmed the account, by telling my
whole story up to the point of my capture by the
Indians, with which I had made him well
acquainted
:
and, as he did me the honour to say, that,
although he considered me a very big goose, and
especially too big an one for a soldier, yet he would
stand sponsor for my honour and integrity against
the whole world, Colonel Aubrey was at last
brought to believe his opinion had done me
injustice
;
to repair which, he despatched a messenger
to bring me from the fort to his house again. The
messenger arrived just fifteen minutes too late; but
he discovered the flight of the prisoners, and gave
the alarm; the forts were ordered to fire upon us, to
bring us to; which failing, the Querida was hastily
despatched after us, and, as has been seen, to no
other purpose than to witness at a distance the
murderous
attack upon the Moro, which she was not
able to prevent.
My flight with Brown, (which none but the
warm-hearted Isabel could believe involuntary,) and,
worse than all, the act of piracy that so immediately
succeeded it, had the natural effect of destroying
every favourable impression in my behalf that had
been made in Colonel Aubrey's mind; and the
attempt
of Isabel to advocate my cause only excited
him to deeper indignation at the unworthy
perversity
of the maid, who could bestow her regard upon a
wretch so degraded and abandoned as I. And in
this feeling, a week after, he placed her in the
Querida
,
now ready for her voyage to the Havanna,
under the care of the reverend padre, to be consigned
to a convent, until sufficiently punished for, or cured
of, her romantic fancy.
I expressed my surprise that Colonel Aubrey,
with all his anger, should have been willing to
expose
her in a vessel so insufficiently armed, with the
full knowledge that a pirate like Hellcat was now
ranging the Gulf; but she replied, that was an
apprehension
that had never entered his mind. No one
doubted but that the desperado had hastened to join
the outlaws at Barrataria Bay, and was, therefore, for
the time at least, out of harm's way; and, besides,
the Querida was considered very well armed and
manned; and, being also a fast vessel, she might
have beaten the corsair off, or escaped by superior
sailing, had her crew been soon enough aware of the
character of the Viper.
These explanations, with many a vow repeated
over and over again with a fervour and tenderness
which our desolate situation both prompted and
excused
,
occupied us through half the night; during
which our little bark skimmed her way easily and
safely along the sea; when, on a sudden, a gust swept
over us, whipped the mast out of its step, and blew
it with the sail entirely away; by which calamity
we were doubtless saved from being instantly
capsized
,
though we were left without any other
assistance
than the oars to help us along.
To the oars therefore I betook me, as soon as the
gust had passed by; and I plied them diligently until
morning; at which period I looked eagerly around,
to see if the Viper was yet in sight; but she had
vanished, with her prize. I then looked as eagerly
for the longboat; but no longboat was to be seen:
the little jollyboat and ourselves were the only
objects
that broke the wide-spread monotony and
solitude
of the sea.
My heart sunk; but I concealed my fears from
Isabel, and plied the oars again, although well nigh
exhausted, until another gust swept the waves; by
which I suffered the further misfortune of losing one
of the oars, which was broken in my unskilful hands.
Even the greatness of this calamity I disguised from
Isabel, by assuring her I could use the remaining
oar as a scull, and get along nearly as fast with it as
with two. But my pride, or tender solicitude to
keep Isabel from alarm, could hold me no longer
against a discovery I now made; which was, that
Vol. II.20
with all my pains to gather into the boat every thing
I could think of that could be serviceable to us on
our voyage, I had forgotten the greatest necessary
of all: bread and meat there were in abundance; but,
ah me! not a single drop of water.
But we shall soon find the longboat, said
Isabel
,
with equal simplicity and confidence in my
nautical abilities; and then we shall have water
enough.
Alas! I had now given up all hope of finding the
longboat; my only trust was that Providence would
direct some vessel in our way, that should pick us
up. And with this forlorn expectation I was obliged
to acquaint Isabel, when, long after mid-day, she
began to express wonder at the non-appearance of
the longboat, asking me if I did not think we should
find it.
Upon being made aware of our truly unhappy
situation, she became greatly agitated and terrified,
now throwing herself into my arms and telling me
she would die with me, now dropping upon her
knees and offering such wild and piteous
supplications
to Heaven as drew the tears from my eyes;
and then springing to me again, and striving to
comfort me with assurances that she was not afraid,
that she was not thirsty, and would not be, and then
again returning to her prayers. I did, and said, all
I could to re-assure her; and, by and by, she
recovered
her composure somewhat; and to fortify her
spirits still further, she drew from her bosom a
rosary, which she began to tell, like a good Catholic;
and doubtless would have continued to do so, until
she had gone through the whole circle of beads, had
I not been suddenly impelled to interrupt her.
I have already observed that I was struck, in the
portrait of the Spanish gentleman, the brother of
Colonel Aubrey, with a rosary worn round his neck,
because of a resemblance which I saw, or fancied, in
the beads to those which my patron Dr. Howard
had obtained from Mother Moll, and preserved for
me with great care, thinking they might, at some
period, contribute to unravel the mystery of my
birth and parentage. The beads which I now saw
in the hands of Isabel, were identical with those in
the portraitand they were, as I could see, identical
with my own; save that the great central bead, or
cross, in Isabel's rosary was richly studded with gold
and gems, of which the cross in mine was destitute;
although there were cavities on its surface in which
such might have once existed.
The coincidence was remarkable, as the beads
were of a singular kind of wood, and of strange
fashion and carving; and it was to me so much the
greater and more interesting, as to my awakened
fancy it seemed to foreshadow a connection in reality
between my fate and that of the beautiful being to
whom I had just sworn eternal attachment. My
brain teemed with sudden recollections of the
foundered
schooner and the mysterious fate of her exiled
passengers; and moved by an irresistible impulse, I
caught the rosary from Isabel's hands, exclaiming,
as well as my great agitation would permit me
These beads, Isabel!they belonged to the original
of the pictureyour father's brother, who was lost
in that schooner of which Brown was the mate
and of which Colonel Aubrey spoke with Brown?
Yes, replied Isabel, surprised out of both
devotion
and fear by the interruption, the question, and,
above all, by my disturbed looks.
And there was a fellow to it? I criedanother
similar rosary, of the same strange wood, and
fashioning
?
Yes, said she, with a sigh; it was on the neck
of little Juan.How my heart leaped at the words!
They were holy beads from Jerusalem, consecrated
on the Sepulchre of our Lord; andBut if you are
not a Christianthat is, not a Catholicyou will
smile at such things: but we held them as a kind of
talismans, because of their being consecrated on the
Tomb of the Redeemer. But, alas! they have
proved no talismans to us yet!
And you will know that other, its fellow? I
cried, fumbling for the beads, which I had long since
tied round my neck for safety, because my patron
Dr. Howard had so earnestly charged me to preserve
them; though I held them myself in so little
estimation
that it was seldom I ever thought of them:
You will know it? I cried, loosening the string,
and putting the beads into her hand: the jewels are
gone; but are not the beads the same?
At the sight of them, Isabel's agitation became
nearly as great as my own; she gave me a look full
of wild inquiry, and then taking her own rosary into
her hand, she faltered out, There is a way to prove
whether they are fellows; and with that, twisting
the cross of the latter between her fingers, she showed
me, what I should never before have dreamed, that
it consisted of two pieces that screwed together in
the centre, so as to make a little box, and that each
piece contained, within the box, a little miniature,
the one a likeness of Colonel Aubrey's brother, as
he was represented in the portrait, the other the
semblance
of a young and beautiful woman, somewhat
resembling, as I thought, the dear Isabel herself.
If
this
, said Isabel, placing my own between
her trembling fingers, if this be, indeed, the fellow,
it must contain the same portraits.
As she spoke, the cross, which, from the ingenuity
of its construction, neither I nor any one else had
ever supposed to be any thing but solid wood, parted
in twain, and disclosed the same pair of visages
concealed
in the little box.
Dios mio!
cried Isabel, starting up wildly,
how came you by this rosary?
I could scarcely articulate a reply: Seventeen
years ago, a vessel from the West Indies was wrecked
upon the coast of New Jersey; and I, a helpless
infant, the only living thing on board, was taken
from it by wreckers.
And? cried Isabel, eagerly
And this rosary was upon my neck!Oh, my
dear Isabel, it must be so! Nature herself stirred
up the affection that warms our bosoms. It must be
so: that wreckI can see it all now, and can almost
prove itthat wreck could have been no other than
the fatal schooner; and I, dearest Isabel, I am the
little Juan you spoke of, and your cousin.
My cousin? O my God! cried Isabel, if it be
so, you are my own brother! We were twin-born
together!
How! I cried, confounded by her words; and
Colonel Aubrey, your father.
My father in name and affection only, said
Isabel
,
the father of my infancy and childhood, whom
I have never called by any other name, who is
however
,
in reality, but my uncle, my father's brother.
My fatherand
your
father, if you be Juan
perished
in that dreadful schooner, the Sally Ann
Yes! I cried, struck by a sudden recollection:
here is the very name scratched upon the cross;
though by whom scratched I know not. Dr. Howard
always thought it must be the name of my mother.
And now, too, I added, I can understand the
expressions
of Duck, which I thought the mere ravings
20*
of delirium, that he could reward my humanity, and
make my fortune by the same act that should obtain
him vengeance on Brown; for it is certainit was
proved by Brown's own admissions before Colonel
Aubrey, when ignorant that Duck was in Pensacola,
and confirmed by his direct confession to me
afterwards
,
in the fortthat Duck was actually on board
the Sally Ann, and had been his accomplice in a
deed of villany hitherto unsuspected; for, Isabel, I
know enough to convince me that our father, instead
of being drowned by the foundering of the schooner,
was murdered by her crew, and Brown at their head,
for his money.
Yes, said Isabel; and so thought my father
my uncle I can scarce call him; and he was resolved,
upon the arrival of a brig of war attached to the
station
,
and therefore under his command, but then
absent on a cruise, to despatch her to Barrataria in
pursuit of Brown, with orders to spare no means to
ensure his capture, that his brother's death might be
fully avenged.But how is this, my brothermy
heart tells me I must call you so! said Isabel,
anxiously
:
how is it the schooner could have come ashore,
and you in it, and yet my uncle, who had instituted
inquiries in America, should hear nothing of it?
That, I said, was easily accounted for; and
informed her that the knowledge of the wreck was
for a period of eleven or twelve years confined to
the wreckers themselves; and that, at the end of that
time, Dr. Howard had in vain labored among my
jealous preservers to learn even so much as her
name, or the period of the wreck; which latter he
could only guess at by forming his own conclusions
as to my age, and coupling with them the fact he had
learned, that I was an infant too young to speak,
when I came ashore.
In short, strange and wondrous as the
circumstances
all seemed, and imperfect as they were in the
chain of connection, they bore with them such
convincing evidence of my identity, that neither
Isabel nor I could longer doubt we were
brother
and sister, the twin-born offspring of parents
long since passed away to the world of death. We
wept and embraced, and exchanged; by a natural
transition, the fervour of lovers for the affection of
brother and sister, which a romantic casuistry has
pronounced to be the purest and heavenliest of all
the bonds that connect the hearts of man and woman.
CHAPTER XXIX.
Robin Day and Isabel are rescued from the jollyboat by an
American
schooner; which is taken by the pirates, and Robin is again
their prisoner.
I learned
from Isabel, what I had in part been
informed ofthat my father, with his younger
brother
,
the present Intendant, had emigrated from
South Carolina in the war of the Revolution, being
loyalists, whom the fall of the British power in the
colonies reduced to ruin. They had entered the
Spanish service in Cuba; where the elder brother
acquired rank in the army, and rose to wealth by
espousing a Spanish heiress, my mother and
Isabel's
;
but, in an unfortunate moment, was drawn
into some treasonable project or conspiracy to
subvert
the Spanish power in the island. The
conspiracy
was discovered, and my father escaped from
the officers appointed to arrest him, only through
the instrumentality of the younger brother; who,
faithful throughout to the government he served, yet
ardently attached to my father, procured him the
means of flight in the fatal schooner. One boat
carried
to her my father and little Juanmyselfwith
a single attendant, and such valuables as he had time
to collect; another following with my mother and
sister, was intercepted; and my father was
compelled
by extreme peril to set sail alone. Neither
my father, nor the schooner, nor any of her crew
were ever heard of afterwards, until Brown's
sudden
appearance in Pensacola. Grief for her
husband's
fate, which had been followed by the
confiscation
of his estates, drove my mother to the tomb.
Isabel, a portionless orphan, was adopted by her
uncle; whose own wife (for he also had married in
the island,) died in a few years, leaving him
childless
;
and who, partly by purchase, and partly
through the bounty of the government which could
thus reward his own long and faithful services, had
effected the recovery of a great part of his brother's
estates; which, with his own, were destined to swell
the dowry, or inheritance, of his adopted daughter.
This discovery, brought about by a means so
simple
,
and at a time so perilous, had the happiest effect
on the spirits of Isabel, who declared, with pious
fervour, that the Providence which had in so
extraordinary
a manner brought us together and revealed
the secret of our relationship, could not have done
so only to let us perish in each other's arms on the
broad deep; and her confidence restored me in part
to mine.
But, alas, the night came upon us, and passed
away, without relief; and then another day and night,
and yet another; in short, the third day passed away,
and the fourth night was approaching, and we were
yet upon the sea. My poor Isabel was dying in
my armsdying of the thirst, which, to lessen the
misery of my self-accusing despair, she protested to
the last she did not feel. At that time, Heaven sent
us relief. A vessel drew in sight, approached us,
caught sight of us, despatched a boat to our assistance;
and, just as the sun sank at last in the ocean, I had
the inexpressible happiness to find myself with Isabel
in safety on board an American schooner, homeward
bound from Jamaica, where she had been, under the
protection of a British pass, with a cargo of supplies,
which had been converted into money. I need not
inform the historic reader that such passes were, in
in those days, granted by the British Admirals on
the American coasts to such honest Americans as
were willing for a price to supply the wants of their
own national enemies; and that there were always
to be found spirits sordid enough to accept the
advantages
and profits of such a trade, until a special
act of Congress, passed during that very year, put a
sudden end to it.
It might be inferred from such a circumstance that
Captain Galley of the Fair American (for such was
the name of the commander and the vessel, of which
he was also a part owner,) was not exactly the
person
to whom I should have chosen to owe the
obligations
of life, or from whom the most hospitable or
generous treatment was to be expected. Yet sordid
as he might be, I found him not deficient in good
feeling; and his wife, a young woman whom he
had married at Jamaica, and was taking home to
America, displayed the warmest and kindest
sympathy
for the distresses of Isabel, which she
immediately
addressed herself to relieve.
I know not whether it was from an impulse of
humanity infused into his breast by his warm hearted
wife, of whom he was excessively fond, or from a
a coarser motive of gain, or from the two feelings
combined, that Captain Galley upon learning in what
relationship Isabel stood to the rich Governor of
Pensacola, began to express his regrets that that
port was so very far out of his way; hinting that, if
it were the Havanna, from which, he said, having a
fair wind, we were scarce distant twenty-four hours'
sail, he would not hesitate to carry her thither to
her friends, without asking of them any thing
further
in recompense than the payment of his expenses.
His schooner was partly his own; he was his own
insurer; his partners would not find fault with him;
it would be a pity to carry the young lady so far
from her friends, leaving them so long mourning
for her supposed death.
Upon my informing Isabel of this, she eagerly
entreated that he should carry her to the Havanna,
where there were many of her father's friends, and
her own, who would recompense him for his trouble
and humanityher father was rich, and would think
no sum of money too great to reward the preserver
and restorer of his Isabel.
Upon such assurances, Galley immediately put up
his helm for the Havanna; promising if the wind
held, we should see the harbour lights before
midnight
of the ensuing day.
But the wind did not hold, being in a few hours,
succeeded by calms and baffling breezes, that
occupied
us during two whole days; at the end of which
we were no nearer to the Havanna than before, and
with so little prospect of reaching it, that Captain
Galley declared he must give it up and resume his
voyage; a resolution that, however, yielded to the
supplications of Isabel, and especially to her
assurances
that he should be munificently rewarded for
every moment of delay; for, notwithstanding that
he still said he desired nothing but his expenses, I
could fancy he had some secret expectations of
turning a very pretty penny by his adventure.
But the Fair American was never destined to
conduct
us to the Havanna. That day, soon after noon,
while we were vainly struggling against a
south-east
wind, which was directly in our teeth, two
vessels, a brig and a schooner, came in sight; and
when they had approached us sufficiently nigh to be
made out with the glass, I was struck with horror
to find they were nothing less than the Viper and
her late prize the Querida.
Captain Galley, whom I immediately informed of
their character, was greatly alarmed; although he
had several times before declared he was not afraid
of pirates, because he relied upon the swiftness
of his vessel, and had in her, moreover, a large
eighteen-pound gun, with which he thought he
could beat a single antagonist off. But two pirates
together, one of them carrying a piece as heavy as
his own, were enemies to awake the most serious
fears; and these became agonized apprehensions,
when, the pirates immediately giving chase, it was
found, after a little trial, that they were actually
gaining upon us, with every probability of
over-hauling
us before night.
Upon this, Captain Galley asked me, with much
agitation, if I thought the pirates would let him off
with his life and vessel, provided he should give
them up all his money, the proceeds of his cargo:
and I saw by this, that he already had thoughts of
surrendering to them. I told him no;that I had
no doubt every soul of us would be murdered,
except
the poor women, whom I begged him to
remember
,
and for whose sake I besought him to defend the
schooner to the last drop of his blood; assuring him
that, for my part, rather than fall again into their
hands, I would immediately jump with my sister
into the sea, and there perish with her. If we could
but resist them until night, we might escape them
in the darkness; and, certainly, we
might
keep
them off until then. I begged him to observe, that
the Viper, which proved to be a faster sailer than
the Querida, and was, for that reason, and because
she carried an eighteen-pounder, (the Querida's
guns being light,) our most dangerous enemy, was
superior to us only in the numbers of her crew;
that that superiority was of no account, while she
was so far off as to be able to fight us only with the
great gun, because our crew of six men (which was
the number, excluding ourselves) was as competent
to the management of our piece of ordnance as
thrice the number could be; and that it was not
improper
to hope we might cripple her by a lucky
shot; in which case, we could avoid the Querida
until night, and thereby escape her altogether.
These representations had their effect upon Galley,
as well as upon the crew; who, being driven into
courage by sheer desperation, and further fortified
by a glass of grog, that was served round to each
man, swore they would stand by each other, their
captain, their ship, and above all the helpless women
on board, to the last moment. And they
immediately
began their preparations for battle, by
bringing
up shot and cartridges from below, and changing
the position of the cannon from the bow to the
stern, where it was soon in readiness for the
pursuers
.
Some muskets and cutlasses were also
collected
,
to arm us against boarders, in case it should
be our hard fate to be brought to close quarters.
While the men were engaged in these
preliminaries
,
the captain took me aside to assist him in
removing
Isabel and his wife to a place of safety
that is, out of reach of the cannon-shot. We
carried
them, both half dead with fright, into the
lowest
hold; where Galley knocked out the head of an
empty puncheon, in which he placed them, having
previously rolled it into a dark nook among the
ballast; with which, and pieces of rubbish, he
proceeded
to cover it up, so that it might readily escape
Vol. II.21
the eye of a careless searcher. But a moment's
reflection convinced me such a device offered but an
insufficient protection against pirates who were
accustomed
to ransack every cranny and hole of a
captured vessel, in search of concealed valuables.
Besides, if the schooner should be taken, the pirates
would either carry her to their haunts, or set fire to
her; in either of which cases, supposing the women
might escape immediate detection, one of two
dreadful
calamities must overtake them; in the one case,
they must, sooner or later, be discovered, in the
other, they must perish in the burning vessel.
These considerations armed me for a desperate
project
,
which I proposed to Captain Galley, who
accepted
it as the last refuge of despair. We placed
a barrel of powder, laying a train from it to the
cabin floor; and we agreed, should the pirates
succeed
in boarding the schooner, that either of us who
might be alive, should set fire to the train and blow
up the vessel; whereby, if we destroyed with our
own hands those we would have died to protect, we,
at the worst, only accelerated their death, while
defending
them from the possibility of a yet more
dreadful fate.
Nor was this horrible device without another
favourable effect: Captain Galley, the moment we
returned upon deck, informed the sailors of what he
had done, avowing a solemn determination, the
moment
he observed any signs of cowardice, or heard
any talk of surrendering among them, to blow up
the schooner with all on board; so that the sailors
perceived they must fight bravely, whether they
would or not; and thereupon they called for more
liquor, and swore one and all, if they must die, they
would die fighting.
The contest now soon began, and was opened by
ourselves letting fly at the schooner, which was
thought to be within reach of the gun, and was
approaching
in her usual insidious way, although she
must have seen from our efforts to escape, that we
understood or suspected her character. Our first
shot had no other effect than to make her run up a
black flag, and display her crew, which, though
more than half of them were, as I supposed with
truth, on board the Querida, was still pretty
numerous
;
but, by and by, she brought the long-tom to
bear upon us, and the battle was begun in earnest.
At first, both the vessels fired without doing any
injury to each other, being too distant for accurate
aim; but presently as the Viper drew nigher, the
shots began to tell, and we had after a while, the
inexpressible satisfaction of seeing the foremast of
the Viper go tumbling over her side.
It was now plain she could follow us no longer,
and we set up a shout of mingled joy and defiance.
But, alas, in the midst of our exultation, she sent a
return ball, by which her injury was avenged upon
the Fair American, the latter being almost as
seriously
crippled as herself. The consequence of this
was, that, although we had no more to fear from the
Viper, whom we found, notwithstanding our injury,
we could now outsail, we were brought within the
danger of the Querida, which came bearing down
upon us, assisted by a change of the wind, of which
she could reap all the benefit, and we none. It is true
our eighteen pounder gave us a great advantage
over her, which Captain Galley endeavoured to
make the subject of encouragement to the men; who
were still further animated by the appearance of a
strange sail, that seemed to have been attracted by
the sound of our firing, was evidently doing her best
to approach us, and was pronounced, while still at a
great distance, a ship of war by our sailors, who
burst into shouts of joy at sight of her, resolving at
all extremities to keep up the fight until she had
arrived to our assistance.
But our courage was not seconded by good for
tune. It was in vain we fired shot after shot at the
Querida, with the hope of crippling her; several of
them struck her in the hull, and even killed some of
her men, but masts, spars, and rigging all escaped;
and, finally, opening her own batteries upon us, by
which half of our men were slain, she succeeded at
last in closing and grappling with us; and then, with
yells of vengeance, and Hellcat himself at their
head, thirty pirates leaped on board, and it was all
over with us in a moment.
Galley, giving me a look of horror and despair,
ran down into the cabin to fire the train. A
musketshot
struck him at the head of the companion way
and he fell headlong on the floor; but gathering
strength for an effort, he raised himself upon his
arms, and flashed a pistol on the powder: it was
soaked with his own blood, and his life and the
ineffectual
flash were extinguished together. I would
have rushed after him to complete the design; but it
was too late; the path was intercepted, and I was
surrounded by pirates, from whom I expected
immediate
death, being at a single blow disarmed and
wounded, when some of them recognised me, and
called out my name; and Brown himself saved me
from their vindictive furythough not with a
purpose
of mercy.
You shall feed the sharks, dn my blood! he
cried, with furious exultation, taking me by the
throat, and demanding eagerly, where was the
girl? while, in the same breath, he ordered his men
to look her up, as if taking it for granted she was
concealed somewhere in the vessel. I could make
but one effort to save her from his brutal arms:
They will look in vain, I cried, unless they
look at the bottom of the sea, to which your
cruelty
consigned her.
How! drown'd? cried Brown.
Yes, drown'd, I replied; whereat he made a
furious blow at me with a cutlass; from which I was
saved by one of the men jerking me away, saying,
that was not the way to end a deserter! Ay,
sink me to h, he shall die like a dog! said
Brown; and I was immediately dragged into the
Querida, and there secured by being tied to one of
the guns; while the pirates searched the Fair
American
for the spoils of victory.
But the search was conducted in the utmost
hurry and confusion: the strange sail was now seen
approaching the Viper, making demonstrations of
hostility, which alarmed the pirates of the Querida
for the safety of their consort, now left far behind,
and perhaps for their own. A few moments served
to bring to light poor Galley's money, the proceeds
of his cargo; a few moments more, to show they
had, in this lucky windfall, secured the chief profits of
the voyage, with which they hastened back to their
own vessel, leaving Isabel and her companion
undiscovered
;
and then the Querida, crowding on all
sail, stood away from her prize, leaving her as I
anticipatednay, as I had hopedin flames. As I
raised my head from the gun to which I was tied,
and perceived the fire running up her rigging and
seizing upon her sails, I could thank God that my
sister had thus escaped the malice of the pirates.
But I could not look a second time upon her funeral
pile.
I dropped my head upon the gun, and closed my
21*
eyes, until a sudden cannonading in the direction of
the Viper, and exclamations of alarm from the
pirates, awoke me to life and the desire of
vengeance
.
The strange vessel, which I could now see
was a large brig of war, had overtaken the crippled
Viper, and was pouring into her a heavy and
continuous
fire, which the Viper returned manfully
with her great gun, as if relying upon speedy
assistance
from the Querida. But this assistance there
was no one in the Querida disposed to render. It
was manifest, the brig was superior in strength to
both the corsairs together; and I understood from
the expressions of Hellcat's crew, that she was
recognised
by some of them to be the Vengador, the
Spanish brig of war attached to the Pensacola
station
,
that very vessel of which Isabel had spoken
as designed by Colonel Aubrey to be sent in pursuit
of the pirates. Alas! had she but come a few hours
nay, but an hour sooner! I looked back to the
Fair American; one of her masts had fallen over
her side, and the flames were fast sapping the
strength of the other.
I turned away, looking again to the Viper; the
Vengador had closed with her; the black flag, which
had been a little before run up in defiance, was now
sinking to the deck; she was conquered; the
Querida had deserted her; and nothing remained
for her abandoned crew but to surrender at
discretion
,
or die fighting upon their own decks.
CHAPTER XXX.
The pirates are chased by the armed brig Vengador, and, in the
pursuit, both vessels are driven ashore.
The
pirates of the Querida took advantage of the
fall of their comrades to secure their own escape.
The night was fast approaching, and closing in with
the appearance of a storm: a few moments, and
darkness must separate the corsair and her too
powerful foe. Yet before the darkness had wholly
invested the ocean, the Vengador was seen to leave
her prize, and set her sails in pursuit of the Querida.
But the pirates were confident of escape; and
they laughed her hostile intentions to scorn; and
they turned to vent their exasperated feelings, their
passions, always infuriated by battle, and now more
than usually excited by the loss of the schooner and
her crew, upon me, their ready victim, guilty of the
crime of desertion; of attempting to poison them
and, still worse, of robbing them of the rich
ransom
they expected to obtain for the Intendant's
daughter; and they called upon their captain to do
justice upon me, according to the laws of seathat
is, I presume, pirate's law, for I know no other
which they acknowledged.
Ay, ay, said Captain Brown, with his usual
oaths, I have not forgotten him.
And with that, I was taken from the gun and
carried
to where he stood on the quarter-deck,
expecting
nothing but instant death, and now indifferent
to it, only that my flesh crept at the thought of the
tortures with which it might be accompanied. But
the fury had departed from the capricious breast of
Hellcat; he gave me a stare expressive rather of
humorous approbation than anger, and then burst into
a horse-laugh, still more strongly indicative of his
change of feelings.
Well done, dn my blood, my skilligallee!
he cried; and so you've set up for yourself at last,
sink me! poison'd a whole ship's company, captain
and allcarried away my wife, and drown'd her
robb'd my honest hell's kittens of their money!
Well, I'll be curst if this isn't a touch of the hellcat
in you, after all, for all I took you for no more than
a green gosling; and, shiver me, but I love you for
it. And with that, he asked me, with a facetious
affectation of anger, that proved how little he really
cared for the crime, or for the fate of Isabel, what
put me upon running away with her; demanding,
however, with more earnestness, if I had received
assistance in my project from any of his crew.
I was too well acquainted with the brutal
whimsicalities
of Captain Brown's temper to found any
hope of escaping death upon his apparent good
humour
;
I knew he could murder in cold blood, as
well as in hot; and I still expected he would
condemn
me to death, as soon as he had sufficiently
amused himself by examining me. This assurance,
together with despair of mind and anguish of body,
(for I had received a wound from a cutlass on my
right arm, which gave me inexpressible pain,)
enabled
me to answer his questions with a boldness that
disregarded his anger. I told him I had fled with
Isabel to save her from his villany; that I had
poisoned
his drink to facilitate the design, indifferent
if the drug should have killed him, whom I thought
a monster too great to live; and I was almost tempted
to play the part of the Athenian Aristogiton, and
accuse his worthiest followers as my assistants, with
the hope of bringing them also to execution. But
I could not die with a lie of malice in my mouth,
and I therefore confessed I had effected my escape
without any assistance whatever.
He then asked after my adventures in the boat,
and how it was my companion had been drowned,
and I saved. Upon this subject I could now safely
speak the truth; and I felt a kind of vindictive
triumph in admitting that I had snatched Isabel a
third time from his grasp, that I had concealed her
in the schooner, in which he had left her to perish
in flames, applied perhaps by his own hands.
Up to this moment, he had laughed very heartily
both at my adventures and invectives; but he was
furiously incensed at finding how grossly he had
been outwitted and robbed of his prey, thus brought
again within his grasp; and with a volley of
execrations
,
and a ferocious aspect, he asked me what I
expected would come of my dog's tricks? and he
made a sign to one of the sailors, who threw a noosed
rope round my neck, while a second one ran up aloft
to pass its other end through a block on the
yard-arm
.
I expect, replied I, not intimidated by the
prospect of a death so much less cruel than any I
had expected, that you will murder me, as you
murdered my father before me.
I
murder your father, shiver my topsails! cried
Brown, with surprise; and who was he?
He was John Aubrey, I replied boldly,
whom you killed in the Schooner Sally Ann, when
I, a little infant, was left alone in her to perish.
The reader will perceive how far my ingenuity,
or imagination, supplied the gaps in that story of
grief and mystery. But Hellcat's countenance
proved that I had supplied them correctly. He
looked confounded, and hastily exclaimedThat
blasted Duck!he has been 'peaching then?
You impeached yourself, I cried, when you
admitted both that your story to Colonel Aubrey
was false, and that you began the world by shedding
the blood of his family.
And so I did, dn my heart, said the
hardened
ruffian, I cut his throat while he was asleep
in his berth, and I should have served the baby the
same way; but as soon as I kill'd his father, the
blasted brat turned right up and hugged me. And
so I gave him his life, and was for carrying him off
in the boat, but the others said no; and so we left
him in the schooner, to go down with her. And,
hang me, now I think of it, she
did
go down; for
we scuttled her; and the boy sunk with her
Scuttled or not, I replied, the schooner drove
ashore on the coast of New Jersey, and the boyI
myselfwas taken alive from her. And if Duck
is ever able to speak again, he can tell you so; for
he knows all the circumstances.
Duck be dd, said the murderer; if you be
the boy, there was a chain on your neck
A chain of beads, said I; it is on my neck
still, with the name of Sally Ann scratched on it.
I scratch'd it there myself, said Brown, one
day with a jack knife; and Aubrey, he rail'd at me
for spoiling the trinket. But I spoil'd it more, before
I was done with it; for it was stuck all over with
gold and diamonds, and I scraped them off; for
where was the use of leaving them, when the beads
were good enough for the boy without them?and,
blast me, I sold them to a jeweller for something
handsome. And so
you
are my lad of the Sally
Ann? Curse me, but it is a very strange piece of
business!
And that was all the emotion expressed by the
blood-stained caitiff, who spoke to me of the murder
of my father without so much as a look of shame or
compunction, which in truth he seemed to have long
lost the power of feeling. Yet some feeling,
perhaps
,
he showed by giving over, as he immediately
did, his purpose of hanging me up like a dog; and
some glimmering suspicion that what he had done
was not the best thing in the world to commend him
to my friendship and gratitude, he indicated by
asking
me, what I would do, if he should cut me
loose, and forgive me the tricks I had played him.
I would kill you as you kill'd my father! I
cried, driven by a feeling of vindictive hatred which
I was neither able nor willing to conceal.
In that case, said Brown, laughing as if he
thought my hostility an excellent jest, you may
just lick the mainmast until you are in a better
humour.
And with that, he ordered his crew to tie me to
the mast, which they did, grumbling at the respite,
but not daring to resist the mandate of their leader.
And there, I may add, I remained bound during the
whole of the night, which had by this time gathered
around us; so that we could no longer see the
Vengador
or her prize. The Fair American had also
vanished: I cast my eye along the horizon in search of
the light, which I supposed would betray the
position
of the burning schooner; but none was to be
seen, and I doubted not she had already burnt to the
water's edge, and gone, with my poor sister and
her companion, to the bottom.
The night closed in very dark and cloudy; and
by and by, gusts began to sweep the sea, increasing
in frequency and force until about midnight, when
there arose a furious storm from the north, which
obliged us to lie to, the pirates being alarmed both
at the violence of the winds and our position, which
was not so far from the coast of Cuba but that we
were in some danger of being blown on shore. It
was, in truth, a terrible storm, the sea in a short
time running mountains high, the winds piping and
howling through the ropes and spars; and the
horror
of our situation was increased by the pitchy
darkness that prevailed during the first two hours
after midnight, at which the storm was at its height,
and still more by the terror of the pirates, most of
whom were Spaniards indifferently acquainted with
the sea, who fell to invoking all the saints of the
calendar for assistance and protection, and offering
up vows, some to perform pilgrimages to their
favourite
shrines, some to make presents to chapels
and convents, some to fast so many days in a month,
to say an unusual number of prayers, to scourge
themselves at certain stated periodsin short to do
a great many things, except to repent of their sins
and give up their lives of plunder and murder, none
of them whom I could hear, making any promises
on that score. The only person besides myself,
whom misery rendered indifferent how soon the
storm might overwhelm us, that seemed to preserve
his courage, was Brown, who vented continual
execrations
against the pusillanimity of his men, by
which the safety of the vessel was jeoparded; for he
could scarce prevail upon them to perform the
duties necessary to their own preservation.
About two hours after midnight, there began to
be much thunder with extremely vivid, and
sometimes
very long continued, flashes of lightning; in
the midst of which we suddenly descried another
vessel lying to in the storm like ourselves, and
scarce half a mile distant. It was, as we soon saw,
the Vengador, which accident or an overruling fate,
had brought after us as accurately and successfully
as if she had followed in our wake by daylight; and
to prove how furiously hostile and determined was
the spirit that governed her motives against us, she
no sooner caught sight of us than she began to fire
upon us, taking advantage of the flashes of lightning
to aim her guns. There was little danger to be
apprehended from such a cannonade in such a storm;
but it made a terrible addition to the horrors of the
tempest, the sound of the ordnance contending with
the peals of thunder, their lurid burst of flame
succeeding
,
and rivalling the flashes from the clouds; it
seemed as if the spirits of the air had taken upon
them visible shapes, to wage, with more than
ordinary
din and fury, the battle of the elements.
The crew of the Vengador perceived that their fire
was ineffectual; when, in the eagerness of their
animosity
,
disregarding the tempest, and the dangers of
such a manuvre, they suddenly changed their helm,
and bore towards us, to engage us nearer at hand, or,
perhaps, as the pirates apprehended, to run us down.
The terror of such a catastrophe prevailed over their
fears of the storm: the Querida's helm was also
turned, and the flight and pursuit were immediately
renewed, continued for an hour or more, with equal
spirit and at equal risk, and calamitously terminated
by both vessels suddenly going ashore upon a reef of
rocks, that was seen too late to be avoided.
Vol. II.22
CHAPTER XXXI.
The battle between the wrecked pirates and their wrecked enemies,
and what happened therein to Robin Day.
I have
no words to express the awful situation in
which we were now placed, stranded among
breakers
that went roaring over us, lifting the brig from
one rock only to dash her against another, until we
were at last wedged tight among them; still less am
I able to describe the confusion and dismay, the
prayers and shrieks of the pirates, some of whom
were washed overboard and drowned, while others
lashed themselves to different parts of the vessel for
safety.
Brown alone maintained his courage, and
continued
his oaths and maledictions, calling vociferously
for help to cut away the masts; which, at last, he
attempted
himself; at least, he began to hack away
with an axe at the shrouds of the mainmast, to which
I was still tied, with the expectation that it would
then fall over by its own weight. I called to him
for the love of life was not yet so completely
extinguished
as I thoughtbegging him to release me,
before he cut away, lest I should be killed by the
fall of the mast; but he replied only with a horrid
oath of disregard and indifference, and proceeded in
his work. The shrouds were cut, and the mast fell;
but it broke off above my head, and I was not hurt
by it, although injured by some of the ropes, which,
as it washed overboard, lashed violently against my
body.
We remained in this condition until the dawn of
day; by which time the storm had greatly abated,
although the breakers still ran very high; and
finding
that the land, which was very high, rocky, and
desolate, was but a mile off, and that the brig was
fast going to pieces, the despairing crew listened to
Brown's commands, and constructed hasty rafts,
which were our only means of reaching the shore,
the boats having been long since stove or washed
away.
Upon these perilous floats, in parties of five or six,
they launched themselves among the waves, one
party after another; and I thought they would have
abandoned me to perish alone; but presently Brown
came and cut me loose, saying, I should have as good
a chance for my life as another; and almost before I
knew what had happened, I found myself in the
surf, clinging to the same raft on which he had taken
refuge.
We reached the shore in safety, with fourteen
others, the only survivors out of a crew of
thirty-five
or six; and we reached it to find a peril staring
us in the face greater than we had left behind us on
the wreck.
The Vengador, whose disaster, similar to our own,
we had rather inferred than known, for none had
actually seen her go ashore, had struck upon the
reef scarce a quarter of a mile distant, where she
was still lying, but deserted by her crew, who had
left her, some on rafts like ourselves, but the greater
number in the long boat, which had survived the
shocks of the night. In this manner, some twenty
or twenty-five of them reached the land at the same
time with ourselves; and no sooner had they done
so, than, with a fury which the horrors of
shipwreck
had not quelled, they rushed upon the pirates,
with such arms as they had preserved, calling to one
another to give no quarter, nor let a dog of them
escape. Escape, indeed, was impossible: we had
landed upon a little cove scooped in a wall of
precipices
,
which, on one hand, ran out into the sea,
preventing
flight in that direction; while, on the other,
the path was intercepted by the enemy.
Flight was impossible, surrender equally so; the
pirates were armed only with their knives, and
some few with cutlasses; but if the enemy displayed
muskets and pistols, it scarcely needed the
encouraging
assurance of Brown, that no gun ever blew
out a man's brains, when full of salt water, to
convince
the desperadoes their enemy could boast no
actual superiority over them but in numbers.
Unfortunately for the pirates, who prepared to
meet the assailants with all the rancorous courage of
despair, the assurance that they had little to fear
from the fire-arms was disproved by a sudden volley
from six or seven guns, that sent among us as many
bullets, by one of which I was struck down,
without
,
at the time, knowing that I was hurt by it. I
had reached the shore benumbed and exhausted, and
was scarcely able to stand erect; and my feebleness
was increased by the agitation of mind I was thrown
into by the unexpected prospect of deliverance. I
summoned, or endeavored to summon, strength for
an effort which I was resolved to make; and I was
on the very point of running from the pirates to
their enemies, when I sank upon the beach, sick,
giddy, and powerless, and attributing my fall only
to the impotence of exhaustion.
My eyes closed, or my mind wandered for an
instant
:
I was recalled to my senses by the shrill tones
of a well-known voice crying above the roar of the
breakers
Bloody Volunteers! if there are any of you
with the enemy, step forward and join your
captain!
It was the voice of Dicky Dare; and as I raised
upon an elbowfor I could do no moreand
looked around for him, I beheld him at the head of
the Vengadores, marching among several officers
who led them on against the pirates. At the same
moment, four of the latter suddenly parted from
their comrades, and ran towards the assailants: they
were all that remained of the Bloody Volunteers, of
whom four others had been drowned in the wreck.
The next moment, the assailants came rushing on,
charging the pirates with their cutlasses. The latter
yielded to the fury of the attack, which was, indeed,
irresistible; but though broken, and reduced to
contend
singly, sometimes each man with several
antagonists
,
each better armed than himself, they fought
desperately, selling their lives only at the price of
lives.
Among others my eye was attracted by the
appearance
of Brown, who was pressed by three
enemies
,
one of them an officer, and that so warmly that
he was obliged to give back, approaching very near
where I lay; but he wielded his cutlass with
astonishing
address, defending himself from the blows of his
antagonists, inflicting others, in fact, many more than
he himself received. One dexterous thrust rid
him of the officer, who fell at his feet, mortally
wounded; but his place was immediately supplied
by another officer in military garb, who sprang
forward
,
crying, with a voice of thunder, in the Spanish
22*
tongueI have found the miscreantleave him
to me!
It was the Intendant, Colonel Aubrey, my uncle
the avenger of his brother and of Isabel.
Ready for all of you, dn my blood! cried
Hellcat, meeting the new assailant with the greater
intrepidity as the two others, obeying my uncle's
furious injunction, stepped back, leaving him to
subdue
the outlaw alone. A few ferocious blows were
exchanged between them; but the advantage of skill
and the energy that arises from deep passion and
determination, were on the side of my kinsman,
who with one savage blow wounded, and well nigh,
disabled his antagonist, and with another would have
slain him, but that the treacherous steel fell to pieces
in his hand. It is
my
turn now, sink me to h!
cried Brown, rushing forward and putting all his
remaining strength into an effort meant to despatch
his enemy; but was arrested by yet another
antagonist
,
no less a person, indeed, than the gallant
Captain
Dare, who, running suddenly up, struck Brown
at unawares under the sword-arm, and ran him
through the body.
You have robbed me of my vengeance, but you
have saved my life! cried Colonel Aubrey, as
Brown measured his length on the sands; and then,
catching up the wounded officer's sword, my
kinsman
sprang forward, to seek other objects of
vengeance
.
His eye fell upon me, and it was burning
with unsated lust of blood: I had raised myself again
upon my elbow, and strove to rise to my feet, but
could not; I endeavoured to speak, to call him by
name, to avert, by a single word, the wrath that
seemed about to destroy me; but nothing came from
my lips but a gush of bloody foam, and I fell down
upon my face without sense or motion.
CHAPTER XXXII.
In which Robin Day meets with many delightful surprises, takes
a new name, and explains such circumstances as require
explanation
.
It
was many, many days before I awoke again to
life. In truth, that unlucky musket-bullet, by which
I had been prostrated, without much suspecting its
agency in my downfall, had passed through my
body, inflicting desperate mischief in its way, from
which I never could have recovered, had not Heaven
sent me such assistance as could only be found in a
skilful and devoted physician, and endowed me with
a constitution capable of withstanding the severest
shocks and injuries.
I opened my eyes in a strange room, to look upon
a stranger sight; it was my friend and patron, Dr.
Howard, who was bending over me with looks of
deep anxiety, one hand lying upon my breast, as if
feeling whether life were yet beating at my heart, the
other holding a cup, from which he had just poured
some hot and pungent liquid between my lips. I could
express the sense of pleasure mingled with surprise,
which I felt at sight of him, only by a faint smile,
being incapable of any speech or motion; but the
look was perceived, and drew from him an
exclamation
God
be praised! he is yet alive! and I then
saw other countenances bending over me, that filled
me with still greater delight, though it was like the
delight of a dream, vague, confused, and confusing.
The first was that of my sister Isabel: I thought I
was in heaven with her; but she was sobbing over
me, and by her side was Colonel Aubrey, looking
haggard with grief; and I knew that such feelings
belonged not to heaven, but to earth. Was I not
dreaming? I was sure I must be; for the next visage
that met my eyes was that of Nanna Howard: yes,
it was Nanna herself, but pale and wasted, and with
the look that spoke of the canker-worm preying on
the heart. There were still others, about me,
shadowy
forms, in which I might dimly trace, or fancy,
the lineaments of other friends, my friend Dicky
Dare, little Tommy, the priest, and the casra; but
they soon vanished away, with all the former ones,
excepting Dr. Howard and Isabel who still remained
at my side. In fact, as I afterwards understood,
they had been summoned together to see me die,
and were only dismissed from the room, when it
was discovered I had taken a new lease of existence.
The powers of life rallied at the last gasp;
gathered, after a day or two of uncertainty, fresh
strength; and, in a week more, I was out of danger,
rejoicing, in the arms of my sister and uncle, (for
my claims to the relationship were now established
upon evidence much stronger than my own eager
belief,) and in the society of Nanna and her father,
over those wonderful circumstances to which we
owed the happiness of our meeting.
But let me take up the story of explanation at
the period when the invalids of the Querida, with
the priest and the
casra
, were committed to the
sea in the long-boat, and left to perish. Happier
than I, who sought so vainly, and indeed foolishly,
to join them, they had the good fortune to be
discovered
,
early the next morning, by a Spanish
vessel
bound to the port they had left, and which they
returned to, with the dismal story of the capture of
the brig, the murder of her crew, the fate of the
hapless Isabel. The Vengador was then in the bay:
in two hours she was under sail with the Intendant
on board, in pursuit of the Viper, though with little
hope of overtaking her. Captain Dicky, always
ready to volunteer where there was a prospect of
fighting, was also on board; and he was the more
anxious to accompany the expedition, as he hoped
to reclaim his unfortunate followers, seduced by a
strange error and misfortune, from the path of their
dutyand perhaps, also, to save their necks from
the halter.
Little Tommy was also carried with them, as it
was thought his acquaintance with a portion of
Hellcat's
followers, the original crew of the Jumping
Jenny, might be productive of useful testimony
against them.
The pirates had lost several days, cruising up
and down in search of the fugitive jolly boat; they
were returning in all the ill humour of
disappointment
,
to their accustomed harbour, when accident
threw in their way another prize, the Fair
American
:
the reports of the guns, heard at a great
distance
,
brought the Vengador to the scene of battle.
The Viper was immediately captured, and a
prize-crew put on board, with orders to despatch a
boat to the Fair American, to rescue, perhaps, some
of her mangled crew, who might be still living, and
could be easily saved; for, in reality, the torch had
been hurriedly applied to some of the sails, which,
with the rigging, had been consumed, leaving the
hull of the vessel almost unharmed; while the
Vengador gave immediate chase to the Querida.
The result of the pursuit has been already seen.
From one of the few pirates taken alive from the
Viper, Colonel Aubrey learned the escape of his
adopted daughter; but he could well believe, with
his informant, she had fled from the Querida only to
perish with her deliverer. And the assurance that
she had thus been driven to an untimely grave
among the waves of ocean did not abate the feeling
of rancorous revenge, which impelled him to attack
the pirate amid the horrors of the tempest; which
carried him with her among the breakers; and was
not sated, until the last of the freebooters had been
cut to pieces on the strand.
Then, indeed, his fury relented, and such of the
wretches as still survived, were collected, and, with
his own wounded, carried to a distant
hacienda
, or
plantation, where such assistance was given them as
could be obtained; and hearing that a foreign
physician
,
an American, who had visited the island with
a sick daughter, to enjoy the benefit of the tropical
air, was at another plantation, some miles off, he
despatched a messenger to solicit his attendance upon
the wounded.
That stranger physician was my patron, Dr.
Howard
;
and I was the first patient whom Colonel
Aubrey besought him to take in charge.
The account of my instrumentality in saving
Isabel
,
which he had received from the captive pirate,
after the previous stories told him by the chaplain
and
casra
of the attempt I had made in her favour
at the moment of capture, had long since driven
suspicion and anger from my uncle's mind; and I
had greatly mistaken his feelings, when, approaching
me as I lay wounded on the strand, I fancied I
beheld
fury and vengeance in his aspect. They were
feelings of amazement at my appearance, whom he
thought buried with Isabel in the sea; and, still more,
of sudden hope, of eager curiosity, of anxious
solicitude
on her account, for from me, perhaps, he might
learn the secret of her fate.
This secret he was destined soon to learn from
others. The boat from the Viper had reached the
Fair American; Isabel and the captain's wife were
discovered and released; the Viper, though
crippled
,
stood out the gale, and in the morning made a
harbour at no great distance from the scene of
shipwreck
and battle. The messenger despatched for
Dr. Howard found him already engaged in the
duties
of humanity among the wounded of the Viper;
he obeyed the summons, and Isabel attended him to
her amazed and rejoicing uncle.
The story of the rosary was soon told: it was
found upon my neck, and identified both by Dr.
Howard and my uncle: and, while I still lay
unconscious
,
hovering between life and death, the
evidence
of two living witnesses of my father's death,
Captain Brown and the miserable Skipper Duck,
had established my identity with the little Juan
beyond the possibility of doubt.
Brown survived his wounds three days, and died
the hardened villain he had lived; but being
appealed
to by my uncle, he readily confessed the
truth in regard to the fate of my father. The wealth
of the unhappy exile was a temptation Brown, a
dissolute
and unprincipled fellow, although not then a
pirate, could not resist. The crew of the Sally Ann
were, one by one, gained over to his purpose; they
rose in the night, killed the master, my father, and
his attendants, and then, scuttling the vessel, betook
them to a boat, and reached the land, some thirty or
forty miles off, the following day. Brown insisted
to the last that he wanted to save the babythat is,
myself; but that the others objected, lest it should
lead to a discovery of their villany; and all he could
obtain for me was the privilege of being left to go
down with the schooner alive. He did not know,
and could not understand, why the schooner did
not
go down, as he bored the holes through her
bottom
himself; but he supposed it was all owing to
me
, he said, ending his confession with a brutal jest,
because them that was born to be hang'd, dn his
blood, they could n't be drown'd.
Skipper Duck was captured on board the Viper,
where his miserable condition procured him quarter
and even pity. I have sometimes suspected it was
owing to his having been for so many days deprived
of my medical attentions; but he had grown much
better in the interim, and recovered his senses, and
Dr. Howard thought, at first, that he would recover.
In consideration of his not having taken, as, indeed,
he could not, any part in Brown's late atrocities,
(excepting the capture of the Viper alone,) and of
the importance of his testimony to my interests,
Colonel Aubrey pledged his influence to procure
him a free pardon, upon condition of his also making
a confession of all the circumstances attending the
catastrophe of the Sally Ann, which he immediately
did. He confirmed Brown's story in nearly all its
parts, and confessed that he had purchased his
vessel
,
the Jumping Jenny, out of his share of the
plunder
,
intending to live an honest life for the future,
and declared he
had
lived as honest a one as he
could. He insisted, however, that it was
he
who
saved my life, and not Brown; and that he had
bought me of old Mother Moll for the purpose of
befriending me; a pious intention, which he
admitted
he had not fulfilled, and could not, because the
devil was in him, and he never looked at me
without
hating me. His malice, I fancy, may be
explained
by the maxim of the philosopher, that he is
our bitterest enemy, who is conscious he has done
us the deepest wrong. The poor wretch did not
live to enjoy the offered pardon: his delirium
returned
after a few days; and before I had recovered
strength to leave my bed, he expired miserably of
gangrene, the consequence of the terrible scourging
he had received.
He made, before he died, another confession, by
which little Tommy's claims were as satisfactorily
established as my own. He admitted that the boy
was Dr. Howard's lost son, that he had kidnapped
him out of revenge against his father, to whose
efforts to bring him to justice for his barbarity to
me, he properly attributed all the punishments that
followed, the imprisonment, the heavy fine by
which he was robbed of all the gaining of years,
and the lynching that ended the chapter of
retributions
;
not to speak of the loss of so valuable a slave
as I had been. Accident brought little Tommy
into his power; for having swum ambitiously into
the river among the vessels lying at anchor, fatigue
compelled him to take refuge for a while in the one
nearest him, which unfortunately proved to be the
Jumping Jenny, then making her last visit to the
town. Upon being roughly questioned, he told his
name to Duck, who immediately thrust him into the
hold, and, soon after, setting sail, carried him off,
leaving his parents mourning for his supposed death.
From that moment, the unfortunate lad became the
object upon which he vented all the fury of his
brutality
and revenge; and it is not wonderful that five
years of cruelty had changed him from a bright and
generous boy, into the stupid, vindictive cub I had
found him. Alas! his restoration to the arms of his
Vol. II.23
father and sister produced less of rapture than pain
and humiliation: but they remembered that
I
had
been rescued from degradation as deep and
unpromising
,
and they hoped a similar happy resurrection
for him.
But what had brought them, my benefactor and
Nanna, thus so opportunely to the island? It was
an expedient adopted to save the life of Nanna, who,
while I was so ready to forget my allegiance, to
forget
her
, and fall so violently in love with my own
sister, (but that, after all, was mere nature and
instinct
,
a burst of preordained fraternal affection,
which a boy of nineteen, or rather less, might
naturally
mistake for love of another kind,) was
remembering
me in tears, and pining away with grief
over the supposed fall and ruin of one she loved
better than she, or I, or any one else, suspected.
The affair of M'Goggin, who was for more than
twenty-four hours supposed to be dying, though he
suddenly remitted, and got well in a very few days,
was of itself such a shock to Nanna's spirits and
health, that her father was doubly rejoiced upon
her
account, when the favourable change in M'Goggin's
symptoms allowed him to despatch a messenger with
a permission, or command for my immediate return.
The reader has seen how my return was prevented
by my suspicions of the messenger; the news of the
trick by which I effected my escape from Mr. John
Dabs reached my benefactor at the same moment
that he was made acquainted with my midnight
visit to the house of Mr. Bloodmoney; not to speak
of the rumours of the highway robbery, which had
also been brought to his ears. And, soon after,
there came an account, I know not how such an
unlucky truth could reach him, that I had entered
the British service, and, of course turned traitor to
my country. The effect of these unlucky stories, it
may be imagined, had the unhappiest effect upon the
little reputation I had left behind me, and upon the
minds of my friends. It was in vain Dr. Howard strove
to make others believe, and to believe himself, that
there was some inexplicable error and illusion at the
bottom of the affair, that it was impossible I could so
suddenly have been transformed from a thoughtless,
innocent
boy, into a desperate and accomplished rogue:
his visit to Mr. Bloodmoney proved my share in the
burglary beyond question; my hat and knapsack,
the latter full of Mr. Bloodmoney's plate, were
evidence
too strong to be resisted; and nothing spoke
in my favour except my parting asseveration to
Isabel
,
that I was no robber or villain; and this spoke
but faintly, as my actions seemed so clearly to
establish
the contrary.
A letter from me might have cleared up the whole
mystery, and one was long impatiently expected;
but expected in vain. It was many weeks before I
had an opportunity to write; and it was some
months before my letter, committed to a provincial
post office, and exposed to all the irregularities and
accidents of a period of war, reached its destination.
It cleared up my character, indeed, at least, to my
patron's mind; but it came too late to repair the
mischief inflicted upon poor Nanna's health. She
was rapidly sinking into a decline; and the
distracted
father, doubly distracted in consequence of the
wonderful story of little Tommy told in the letter,
leaving to others the task of recovering his lost son,
was glad to embrace the opportunity of a Spanish
vessel sailing to Cuba, to carry his daughter thither,
as the only means left of arresting a malady that
was fast threatening to become fatal.
A pleasant situation on a lonely plantation near
the coast, the benignant air, and the explanations in
my letter, with the hope which never abandons the
youthful spirit, had already produced a favourable
change in the maiden's health; which,
notwithstanding
the shock of my sudden and lamentable
appearance
,
wounded almost to death, was gradually
confirmed, and, indeed, thoroughly re-established,
before I myself was entirely restored to my wonted
strength.
CHAPTER XXXIII.
In which Robin Day takes leave of his adventures and the
reader.
With
the explanations contained in the
preceding
chapter, I might terminate my narrative, as
there is nothing to follow, which might not be
readily imagined. Yet as a few words will
complete
the story, it is but proper I should write
them.
As soon as I was well enough to be removed,
the whole party of friends whom destiny had thus
so strangely brought together, were carried by my
uncle to one of his estates, which, being near the
coast, we reached by water in a single day: and,
there we all passed a very happy winter, my uncle
having resigned his Intendancy at Pensacola, that he
might watch over my recovery, and repay by
hospitable
attentions, and his warmest friendship, the
debt of gratitude he professed to owe the protector
of my friendless youth.
The spring saw Nanna restored to health, as
blooming and as joyous as my sister, who, with the
enthusiasm of her nature, soon became her warm
and devoted friend.
But the spring did not see her removed from us.
Dr. Howard had experienced the happy effects of
the tropical air upon the maiden's health, and was
23*
easily seduced to prolong his stayto talk even of
purchasing an estate, and submitting to an exile of
an indefinite period, in a climate so auspicious to
the life of his dearest child! And, besides, after a
great deal of discussion on the subject between my
uncle and him, between Isabel and Nanna, and
between Nanna and me, it was at last unanimously
decided, that there was no reason why they should
ever leave the island at all, or, at least, no reason
why Nanna should. In short, it was agreed, with
the full consent of Isabel, who merrily absolved me
of all the vows I had made her, that a match should
be made between Nanna and myself; and a year
afterwards, I had the happiness of leading her to
the altar, little Tommy, who, by this time was
converted
into a Christian and a gentleman, although a
young one, playing the part of paranymph, while
Isabel, who had trained him with great care for the
purpose, appeared the happiest and most beautiful of
brides-maids.
If I had had my will in the premises, we should
have had a second wedding the same day. My
sister was not more anxious to make a match
between
me and
her
friend, than I was, or would have
been, to make another between her and mine. I
should have been glad to bestow her upon my friend
Dicky; and, I have no doubt, she would have fallen
heartily in love with him, had he asked her;
because Dicky was, in reality, a very handsome
fellow; and what maiden could have resisted so
gallant a soldier? But Dicky was wedded to glory;
he was as ready as Othello to recount to Isabel the
histories of his wars, but he never cared to take her
in the pliant hour, like that worthy blackamoor;
and, in fact, I doubt greatly whether any, the
remotest
,
idea of love and matrimony ever entered
his warlike brain. He was never truly content,
until my uncle had packed him off, with his four
volunteers, the poor wreck of his company, and
with some valuable presents of horses and arms,
which I was now able to make him, to Mobile;
after which, we lost sight of him; though we heard
he rejoined the American army, and fought through
the whole of the campaign that terminated in the
brilliant victory at New Orleans. The next year
a year, in the United States, of peace, of which
Captain Dicky soon grew sickfortune opened to
him a new field of combat: he went to Mexico with
the celebrated Mina, with whom he might have
had the honour of being shot as a heroic freebooter,
with a bandage round his eyes, had not ambition
conducted him to an earlier and more glorious
grave. The same great spirit which carried him,
with a single company, into the heart of the Creek
nation, to snatch the conquest out of the hands of
his brigadier, was revived in Mexico; he took an
opportunity one day, to separate himself from his
commander, and set out, with a force of fifty men,
and the commission, or title, of Colonel, which
Mina had conferred on him, to liberate the Mexican
nation on his own account. He, doubtless,
calculated
upon receiving great assistance from the
Mexican nation itself, and having his command
swelled by successive patriots into a countless army;
but before any reinforcements appeared, he had the
misfortune to be attacked by vastly superior
numbers
,
and was, with his whole company, cut to
pieces.
My brother Tommy, who, as his mind
re-expanded
,
betrayed a somewhat similar inclination for a
life of glory, has had a happier fate, but on another
element; for which, unlike me, he contracted a
passion
,
even under the rough tutelage of Skipper Duck.
His father, at his earnest desire, placed him in the
American navy, in which he is now a distinguished
officer.
Years have since passed away and effected other
changes in the circle of friends that originally graced
and gladdened my island home. My uncle and
father-in-law have vanished away; but they vanished
away in the fulness of years; and their places have
been filled by young strangers, who bear their names,
and the names of Nanna and Isabel.
With these around me, a loving wife and devoted
sister at my side, with peace, and affluence, and
happiness
under my roof, and the wisdom of advancing
years stealing into my head, I can look back
without
regret, and review with smiles, the tissue of
misfortunes by which I was led to such enviable
possessions; and Juan Aubrey can attribute his
felicity to the schoolboy follies and adventures of
Roibn Day
.
THE END.